vol. ii. 1
BEAUCHAMPE.
CHAPTER I.
Having
seen his enemy fairly mounted and under way,
as he thought, for Charlemont, Ned Hinkley returned to
Ellisland for his own horse. Here he did not suffer
himself
to linger, though before he could succeed in taking
his departure, he was subjected to a very keen and
searching
examination by the village publican and politician.
Having undergone this scrutiny with tolerable patience, if
not to the entire satisfaction of the examiner, he set
forward
at a free canter, determined that his adversary should
not be compelled to wait. It was only while he rode that
he began to fancy the possibility of the other having taken
a different course; but as, upon reflection, he saw no
other plan, which he might have adoptedfor lynching
for suspected offences was not yet a popular practice in and
about Charlemont,he contented himself with the
reflection
that he had done all that could have been done, and if
Alfred Stevens failed to keep his appointment, he, at least,
was one of the losers. He would necessarily lose the
chance of revenging an indignity, not to speak of the
equally serious loss of that enjoyment which a manly
fight usually gave to Ned Hinkley himself, and which, he
accordingly assumed, must be an equal gratification to all
other persons. When he arrived at Charlemont, he did
not make his arrival known, but repairing directly to the
lake among the hills, he hitched his horse, and prepared,
with what patience he could command, to await the
coming
of the enemy.
The reader is already prepared to believe that the worthy
rustic waited in vain. It was only with the coming on of
night that he began to consider himself outwitted. He
scratched his head impatiently, not without bringing away
some shreds of the hair, jumped on his horse, and,
without
making many allowances for the rough and hilly
character of the road, went off at a driving pace, for the
house of uncle Hinkley. Here he drew up only to ask
if Brother Stevens had returned.
No!
Then, dang it! he never will return. He's a skunk,
uncle,as great a skunk as ever was in all Kentucky.
How! what!what of Brother Stevens? demanded
the uncle, seconded by John Cross, who had only some
two hours arrived at the village, and now appeared at the
door. But Ned Hinkley was already off.
He's a skunk!that's all! His last words threw
very little light over the mystery, and certainly gave very
little satisfaction to his hearers. The absence of Alfred
Stevens, at a time when John Cross was expected, had
necessarily occasioned some surprise; but of course, no
apprehensions were entertained by either the worthy
parson
or the bigoted host, that he could be detained by any
cause whatsoever which would not fully justify his
absence.
The next course of Ned Hinkley was for the cottage of
Mr. Calvert. To the old man he gave a copious detail of
all his discoveries, not only the heads of what he heard
from the conspirators in the wood, but something of the
terms of the dialogue. The gravity of Calvert increased
as the other proceeded. He saw more deeply into the
signification of certain portions of this dialogue than did
the narrator; and when the latter, after having expressed
his disappointment at the non-appearance of Stevens on
the field of combat, at least congratulated himself at
having
driven him fairly from the ground, the other shook his
head mournfully.
I am afraid it's too late, my son.
Too late, gran'pa! How? Is it ever too late to send
such a rascal a-packing?
It may be for the safety of some, my son.
What! Margaret you mean. You think the poor fool
of a girl's too far gone in love of him, do you?
If that were all, Ned.
Why, what more? Eh! you don't mean!
The apprehensions of the simple, unsuspecting fellow,
for the first time began to be awakened to the truth.
I am afraid, my son, that this wretch has been in
Charlemont too long. From certain words that you have
dropped, as coming from Stevens, in speaking to his
comrade
,
I should regard him as speaking the language of
triumph
for success already gained.
Oh! hardly! I didn't think so. If I had only guessed
that he meant such a thing,though I can't believe it,I'd
ha' dropped him without a word. I'd have given him the
pacificator as well as the peace-breaker. Oh, no! I can't
think itI can't,I won't! Margaret Cooper is not a
girl to my liking, but, Lord help us! she's too beautiful
and too smart to suffer such a skunk, in so short a time, to
get the whip-hand of her. No, gran'pa! I can't and won't
believe it.
Yet, Ned, these words which you have repeated
convey
some such fear to my mind. It may be that the
villain
was only boasting to his companion. There are
scoundrels in this world who conceive of no higher subject
of boast, than the successful deception and ruin of the
artless and confiding. I sincerely hope that this may be
the case nowthat it was the mere brag of a profligate to
excite the admiration of his comrade. But when you
spea of the beauty and the smartness of this poor girl, as
of securities for virtue, you make a great mistake. Beauty
is more apt to be a betrayer than a protector; and as for
her talent, that is seldom a protection unless it be
associated
with humility. Hers was not. She was most
ignorant
where she was most assured. She knew just enough
to congratulate herself that she was unlike her neighbours,
and this is the very temper of mind which is likely to cast
down its possessor in shame. I trust that she had a better
guardian angle than either her beauty or her talents. I
sincerely hope that she is safe. At all events let me
caution
you not to hint the possibility of its being otherwise.
We will take for granted that Stevens is a baffled
villain
.
I only wish I had a-dropped him!
Better as it is!
What! even if the poor girl is
Ay, even then!
Why gran'pa, can it be possible you say so?
Yes, my son; I say so, here, in moments of
comparative
calmness, and in the absence of the villain. Perhaps,
were he present, I should say otherwise.
And
do
otherwise! You'd shoot him, gran'pa, as soon
as I.
Perhaps! I think it likely. But, put up your pistols,
Ned; You have nobody now to shoot. Put them up, and
let us walk over to your uncle's at once. It is proper that
he and John Cross should know these particulars.
Ned agreed to go, but not to put up his pistols.
For, you see, gran'pa, this rascal may return. His
friend may have kept him in long talk. We may meet
him coming into the village.
It is not likely, but come along. Give me that staff,
my son, and your arm on the other side. I feel that my
eyes are no longer young.
You could shoot still, gran'pa?
Not well.
What, couldn't you hit a chap like Stevens between
the eyes at ten paces? I'm sure I could do it, blindfolded,
by a sort of instinct.
And the youth shutting his eyes, as if to try the
experiment
,
drew forth one of his pistols from his bosom and
began to direct its muzzle around the room.
There was a black spider
there,
gran'pa! I'm sure,
taking him for Stevens, I could cut his web for him.
You have cut that of Stevens himself, and his comb
too, Ned.
Yes, yes, but what a fool I was not to make it his
gills!
By this time the old man had got on his spencer, and,
with staff in hand, declared himself in readiness. Ned
Hinkley lowered his pistol with reluctance. He was
very anxious to try the weapon and his own aim, on some
body or something. That black spider which lived so
securely in the domicile of Mr. Calvert would have stood
no chance in any apartment of the widow Hinkley. Even
the pacificator, would have been employed for its
extermination
,
if, for no other reason, because of the fancied
resemblance which it had always worn to Brother Stevens,
a resemblance which occurred to him, perhaps, in
consequence
of the supposed similarity between the arts of
the libertine, and those for the entrapping of his victims,
which distinguish the labours of the spider.
The two were soon arrived at old Hinkley's, and the
tale of Ned was told; but, such was the bigotry of the
hearers, without securing belief.
So blessed a young man! said the old lady.
A brand from the burning! exclaimed Brother Cross.
It's all an invention of Satan! cried old Hinkley,
to prevent the consummation of a goodly work.
We should not give our faith too readily to such
devices of the enemy, friend Calvert; said John Cross
paternally.
I never saw any thing in him that wasn't perfectly
saint-like
,
said Mrs. Hinkley. He made the most heartfelt
prayer, and the loveliest blessing before meat! I think I
hear him now`Lord, make us thankful'with his eyes
shut up so sweetly, and with such a voice.
There are always some people, Brother Cross, to hate
the saints of the Lord and to slander them! They lie in
wait like thieves of the night, and roaring lions of the
wilderness, seeking what they may devour.
Ah, exclaimed Brother Cross, how little do such
know that they devour themselves; for whoso destroyeth
his best friend is a devourer of himself.
The blindness of Satan is upon them, and they do his
work.
And thus,purr, purr, purr,they went on, to the end
of the chapter. Poor Ned Hinkley found the whole
kennel
was upon him. Not only did they deny every thing
that could by possibility effect the fair fame of the absent
brother, but, from defending him, they passed, with an
easy transition, to the denunciation of those who were
supposed to be his defamers. In this the worthy old man
Calvert came in for his share.
All this comes of your supporting that worthless boy
of mine in defiance of my will; said old Hinkley. You
hate Brother Stevens because that boy hated him, and
because
I love him.
You are mistaken, Mr. Hinkley; said Calvert, mildly.
I hate nobody; at the same time I suffer no mere
prejudices
to delude me against sight and reason.
Ah! said Brother Cross, gently, it's that very
reason
,
Brother Calvert, that ruins you worldlings. You
must not rely on human reason. Build on faith, and you
build on the Rock of Ages.
I propose to use reason only in worldly matters, Mr.
Cross, said the other; for which use, only, I believe it
was given us. I employ it in reference to a case of
ordinary
evidence, and I beg your regards now, while I draw
your attention to the use I make of it in the present
instance
.
Will you hear me without interruption?
Surely, Brother Calvert, but call me not Mr. Cross.
I am not a Mister. I am plain John Cross; by virtue of
my business, a brother, if it so please you to esteem me.
Call me Brother Cross, or Brother John Cross, or plain
John Cross, either of these will be acceptable unto me.
We are all brothers, or should be, said Calvert;
and it will not need that there should be any
misunderstanding
between us on so small a matter.
The matter is not small in the eye of the Lord; said
the preacher. Titles of vanity become not us, and
offend
in his hearing.
The old teacher smiled, but proceeded.
Now, Brother Cross, if you will hear me, I will
proceed
,
according to my reason, to dwell upon the proofs
which are here presented to you, of the worthlessness of
this man, Alfred Stevens; and when you consider how
much the feelings and the safety of the daughters of your
flock depend upon the character of those moral and
religious
teachers to whom the care of them is entrusted,
you will see, I think, the necessity of listening patiently,
and determining without religious prejudice, according to
the truth and reason of the case.
I am prepared to listen patiently, Brother Calvert,
said John Cross, clasping his hands together, setting his
elbows down upon the table, shutting his eyes, and
turning
his face fervently up to heaven. Old Hinkley
imitated
this posture quite as nearly as he was able; while
Mrs. Hinkley, sitting between the two, maintained a
constant
to and fro motion, first on one side, then on the
other, as they severally spoke to the occasion, with her
head deferentially bowing, like a pendulum, with a motion
quite as regular and methodical. The movements of her
nephew, Ned Hinkley, were almost as pleasant a study,
after a fashion of his own. Sitting in a corner, he amused
himself by drawing forth his puppies, and taking
occasional
aim at a candle or flowerpot; and sometimes, with
some irreverence, at the curved and rather extravagant
proboscis of his worthy uncle, which, cocked up in air,
was indeed something of a tempting object of sight to a
person so satisfied of his skill in shooting as the young
rustic. The parties being thus arranged in a fit attitude
for listening, Mr. Calvert began somewhat after the
following
fashion:
Our first knowledge of Alfred Stevens was obtained
through Brother John Cross.
And what better would you have? demanded old
Hinkley.
None, said the other, if Brother Cross knew any
thing about the party he introduced. But it so happens,
as we learn from Brother Cross himself, that the first
acquaintance
he had with Stevens was made upon the road,
where Stevens played a trick upon him by giving him
brandy to drink.
No trick, Brother Calvert; the young man gave it me
as a medicine, took it as a medicine himself, and, when I
bade him, threw away the accursed beverage.
Ordinary men, governed by ordinary reason, Brother
Cross, would say that Stevens knew very well what he
was giving you, and that it was a trick.
But only think, Mr. Calvert, said Mrs. Hinkley,
lifting
her hands and eyes at the same moment, the blessed
young man threw away the evil liquor the moment he
was told to do so. What a sign of meekness was that!
I will not dwell on this point, was the reply of
Calvert
.
He comes into our village and declares his
purpose
to adopt the profession of the preacher, and proceeds
to his studies under the direction of Brother Cross.
And didn't he study them? demanded Mrs. Hinkley.
Wasn't he, late and early, at the blessed volume? I
heard him at all hours above stairs. Oh! how often was
he on his bended knees in behalf of our sinful race,
ungrateful
and misbelieving that we are!
I am afraid, madam, said Calvert, that his studies
were scarcely so profound as you think them. Indeed, I
am at a loss to conceive how you should blind your eyes
to the fact that the greater part of his time was spent
among the young girls of the village.
And where is it denied, exclaimed old Hinkley, that
the lambs of God should sport together?
Do not speak in that language, I pray you, Mr.
Hinkley
,
said Calvert, with something of pious horror in his
look; this young man was no lamb of God, but, I fear,
as you will find, a wolf in the fold. It is, I say, very well
known that he was constantly wandering, even till a late
hour of the evening, with one of the village maidens.
Who was that one, Brother Calvert? demanded John
Cross.
Margaret Cooper.
Hem! said the preacher.
Well, he quarrels with my young friend, the worthy
son of Brother Hinkley
Do not speak of that ungrateful cub. Brother Stevens
did not quarrel with him. He quarrelled with Brother
Stevens, and would have murdered him, but that I put in
in time to save.
Say not so, Mr. Hinkley. I have good reason to
believe that Stevens went forth especially to fight with
William.
I would not believe it, if a prophet were to tell me it.
Nevertheless, I believe it. We found both of them
placed at the usual fighting distance.
Ah! but where were Brother Stevens's pistols?
In his pocket, I suppose.
He had none. He was at a distance from my
ungrateful
son, and flying that he should not be murdered.
The lamb under the hands of the butcher. And would
you believe it, Brother Cross, he had gone forth only to
counsel the unworthy boyonly to bring him back into
the foldgone forth at his own prayer, as Brother
Stevens
declared to Betsy, just before he went out.
I am of opinion that he deceived her and yourself.
Where were his pistols then?
He must have concealed them. He told Ned Hinkley,
this very day, that he had pistols, but that they were
here.
Run up, Betsy, to Brother Stevens's room and see.
The old lady disappeared. Calvert proceeded.
VOL. II. 2
I can only repeat my opinion, founded upon the known
pacific and honourable character of William Hinkley, and
certain circumstances in the conduct of Stevens, that the
two did go forth, under a previous arrangement, to fight
a duel. That they were prevented, and that Stevens had
no visible weapon, is unquestionably true. But I do not
confine myself to these circumstances. This young man
writes a great many letters, it is supposed to his friends,
but never puts them in the post here, but every Saturday
rides off, as we afterwards learn, to the village of Ellisland,
where he deposits them and receives others. This is a
curious circumstance, which alone should justify
suspicion
.
The ways of God are intricate, Brother Calvert, said
John Cross, and we are not to suspect the truth which
we cannot understand.
But these are the ways of man, Brother Cross.
And the man of God is governed by the God which
is in him. He obeys a law which, perhaps, is ordered to
be hidden from thy sight.
This doctrine certainly confers very extraordinary
privileges upon the man of God, said Calvert, quietly,
and, perhaps, this is one reason why the profession is so
prolific of professors now a-days; but the point does not
need discussion. Enough has been shown to awaken
suspicion and doubt in the case of any ordinary person;
and I now come to that portion of the affair which is
sustained
by the testimony of Ned Hinkley, our young friend
here, who, whatever his faults may be, has been always
regarded in Charlemont, as a lover and a speaker of the
truth.
Ay, ay, so far as he knows what the truth is, said
old Hinkley, scornfully.
And I'm just as likely to know what the truth is as
you, uncle! retorted the young man, rising and coming
forward from his corner. Come, come, he continued,
you're not going to ride rough shod over me as you did
over cousin Bill. I don't care a snap of the finger, I can
tell you, for all your puffed cheeks and big bellied speeches.
I don't, I tell you! and, suiting the action to the word, the
sturdy fellow snapped his fingers almost under the nose
of his uncle, which was now erected heavenward, with a
more scornful pre-eminence than ever. The sudden
entrance
of Mrs. Hinkley, from her search after Stevens's
pistols, prevented any rough issue between these new
parties, as it seemed to tell in favour of Stevens. There
were no pistols to be found. The old lady did not add,
indeed, that there was nothing of any kind to be found
belonging to the same worthy.
There! That's enough! said old Hinkley.
Did you find any thing of Stevens's, Mrs. Hinkley?
inquired Mr. Calvert.
Nothing, whatever.
Well, madam, said Calvert, your search, if it
proves any thing, proves the story of Ned Hinkley
conclusively
.
This man has carried off all his chattels.
John Cross looked down from heaven, and stared
inquiringly
at Mrs. Hinkley.
Is this true? Have you found nothing, Sister Betsy?
Nothing.
And Brother Stevens has not come back?
No!
And reason for it, enough; said old Hinkley. Didn't
you hear that Ned Hinkley threatened to shoot him if he
came back?
Look you, uncle, said the person thus accused, if
you was any body else, and a little younger, I'd thrash
you for that speech the same as if it was a lie! I would.
Peace! said Calvert, looking sternly at the youth.
Having obtained temporary silence, he was permitted at
length to struggle through his narrative, and to place, in
their proper lights, all the particulars which Ned Hinkley
had obtained at Ellisland. When this was done the
discussion
was renewed, and raged, with no little violence, for
a full hour. At length it ceased through the sheer
exhaustion
of the parties. Calvert was the first to withdraw from
it, as he soon discovered that such was the bigotry of old
Hinkley and his wife, and even of John Cross himself,
that nothing short of divine revelation could persuade them
of the guilt of one who had once made a religious
profession
.
Brother Cross, though struck with some of the
details
which Calvert had given, was afterwards prepared to
regard them as rather trivial than otherwise, and poor Ned
was doomed to perceive that the conviction was general in
this holy family, that he had, by his violence, and the
terror which his pistols had inspired, driven away, in
desperation
,
the most meek and saintly of all possible young
apostles. The youth was nearly furious ere the evening
and the discussion were over. It was very evident to
Calvert
that nothing was needed, should Stevens come back,
but a bold front and a lying tongue, to maintain his position
in the estimation of the flock, until such time as the truth
would make itself knowna thing which, eventually,
always happens. That night Ned Hinkley dreamed of
nothing but of shooting Stevens and his comrade and of
thrashing his uncle. What did Margaret Cooper dream of?
CHAPTER II.
What
did Margaret Cooper dream of? Disappointment,
misery, death. There was a stern presentiment in her
waking thoughts, sufficiently keen and agonizing to inspire
such dreadful apprehensions in her dreams. The
temperament
which is sanguine, and which, in a lively mood,
inspires
hope, is, at the same time, the source of those dark
images of thought and feeling, which appal it with the most
terrifying forms of fear;and when Saturday and Saturday
night came and passed, and Alfred Stevens did not appear,
a lurking dread that would not be chidden or kept down,
continued to rise within her soul, which, without assuming
any real form or decisive speech, was yet suggestive of
complete overthrow and ruin. Her dreams were of this
complexion. She felt herself abandoned. Nor merely
abandoned. She was a victim. In her desolation she had
even lost her pride. She could no longer meet the sneer
with scorn. She could no longer carry a lofty brow among
the little circle, who, once having envied, were now about
to despise her. To the impatient spirit, once so strong
so insolent in its strengthwhat a pangwhat a
humiliation
was here! In her dreams she saw the young
maidens
of the village stand aloof, as she had once stood
aloof from them:she heard the senseless titter of their
laugh; and she had no courage to resent the impertinence.
Her courage was buried in her shame. No heart is so
cowardly as that which is conscious of guilt. Picture on
picture of this sort did her fancy present to her that night;
and when she awoke the next morning, the sadness of her
soul had taken the colour of a deep and brooding
misanthropy
.
Such had been the effect of her dreams. Her
resolution came only from despair; and resolution from
such a source, we well know, is usually only powerful
against itself.
It is one proof of a religious instinct, and of a universal
belief in a controlling and benevolent Deity, that all men,
however abased, scornful of divine and human law,
invariably
,
in their moments of desperation, call upon God.
Their first appeal is, involuntarily, to him. The outlaw,
as the fatal bullet pierces his breastthe infidel, sinking
and struggling in the water,the cold stony heart of the
murderer, the miser, the assassin of reputation as of life
all cry out upon God in the unexpected paroxysms of
death. Let us hope that the instinct which prompts this
involuntary appeal for mercy, somewhat helps to secure its
blessings. It is thus also with one who, in the hey-day of
the youthful heart, has lived without thought or prayera
tumultuous life of uproar and riot,a long carnival of the
passionsthe warm blood suppressing the cool thought,
and making the reckless heart impatient of consideration.
Let the sudden emergency arise, with such a heartlet the
blood become stagnant with disease;and the involuntary
appeal is to that God, of whom before there was no thought.
We turn to him as to a father who is equally strong to help
and glad to preserve us.
Margaret Cooper, in the ordinary phrase, had lived
without God. Her God was in her own heart; beheld by
the lurid fires of an intense, unmethodized ambition. Her
own strength,or rather the persuasion of her own
strength,had been so great, that hitherto she had seen
no necessity for appealing to any other source of power.
She might now well begin to distrust that strength. She
did so. Her desperation was not of that sort utterly to
shut out hope;and while there is hope, there is yet a
moral assurance that the worst is not yetperhaps not to
be. But she was humblednot enough, perhaps, but
enough to feel the necessity of calling in her allies. She
dropped by her bedside, in prayer, when she arose that
morning. We do not say that she prayed for forgiveness,
without reference to her future earthly desires. Few of
2*
us know how to simplify our demands upon the Deity to
this one. We pray that he may assist us in this or that
grand speculation. The planter for a great cropthe
banker for investments that give him fifty per cent.the
lawyer for more copious fees, the parson for an increase of
salary. How few pray for mercyforgiveness for the
paststrength to sustain the struggling conscience in the
future. Poor Margaret was no wiser, no better, than the
rest of us. She prayed,silly woman!that Alfred
Stevens
might keep his engagement!
He did not! That day she was to be married! She had
some reference to this in making her toilet that morning.
The garments which she put on were all of white. A
white rose gleamed palely from amidst the raven hair upon
her brow. Beautiful was she, exceedingly. How
beautiful
!
But alas! the garb she wore,the pale sweet flower
on her forehead,they were mockeries;the emblems of
that purity of soulthat innocence of heart, which were
gone,gone for ever! She shuddered as she beheld the
flower, and meditated this thought. Silently she took the
flower from her forehead, and as if it were precious as that
lost jewel of which it reminded her, she carefully placed it
away in her toilet-case. Yet her beauty was heightened
rather than diminished. Margaret Cooper was beautiful
after no ordinary mould. Tall in stature, with a frame
rounded by the most natural proportions into symmetry,
and so formed for grace;with a power of muscle more
than common among women, which, by inducing activity,
made her movements as easy as they were graceful;
with an eye bright, like the morning star, and with a depth
of expression, darkly clear, like that of the same golden
orb at night;with a face exquisitely oval; a mouth of
great sweetness; cheeks on which the slightest dash of
hue from the red, red rose in June, might be seen to come
and go, under the slightest promptings of the active heart
within;a brow of great height and corresponding
expansion
;with
a bust that impressed you with a sense of the
maternal strength which might be harboured there,even
as the swollen bud gives promises of the full bosomed
luxuriance
of the flower when it opens;add to these, a lofty
carriage, a look where the quickened spirit seems ever
ready for utterance; a something of eager solemnity in her
speech; and a play of expression on her lips which, if the
brow were less lofty and the eye less keenly bright, might
be a smile;and you have some idea of that noble and
lovely temple, on which fires of lava had been raised by
an unholy hand; in which a secret worship is carried on
which dreads the lightshrinks from exposure,and
trembles to be seen by the very Deity whose favour it yet
seeks in prayer and apprehension. These beauties of
person as we have essayed, though most feebly to describe
them, were enhanced, rather than lessened, by that air of
anxiety by which they were now overcast. Her step was
no longer free. It was marked by an unwonted timidity.
Her glance was no longer confident; and when she looked
round, upon the faces of the young village maidens, it was
seen that her lip trembled and moved, but no longer with
scorn. If the truth were told, she now envied the meanest
of those maidens that security which her lack of beauty
had guaranteed. She, the scorner of all around her, now
envied the innocence of the very meanest of her
companions
.
Such was the natural effect of her unhappy
experience
upon her heart. What would she not have given
to be like one of them? She dared not take her place, in
the church, among them. It was a dread that kept her
back. Strange, wondrous power of innocence! The guilty
girl felt that she might be repulsedthat her frailty might
make itself known
must
make itself knownand she
would be driven with shame from that communion with
the pure to which she had no longer any claim! She sunk
into one of the humblest seats in the church, drawing her
reluctant mother into the lowly place beside her.
John Cross did not that day address himself to her case:
but sin has a family similitude amongst all its members.
There is an unmistakeable likeness, which runs through
the connexion. If the preacher speaks fervently to one
sin, he is very apt to goad, in some degree, all the rest:
and though Brother Cross had not the most distant idea of
singling out Margaret Cooper for his censure, yet there
was a whispering devil at her elbow that kept up a
continual
commentary upon what he said, filling her ears with
a direct application of every syllable to her own peculiar
instance.
See you not, said the demon, that every eye is
turned upon you? He sees into your soulhe knows your
secret. He declares it, as you hear, aloud, with a voice
of thunder, to all the congregation. Do you not perceive
that you sit alonethat every body shrinks from your
sidethat your miserable old mother alone sits with you
that the eyes of some watch you with pity, but more with
indignation? Look at the young damselslate your
companions
they
are your companions no longer. They
triumph in your shame. Their titter is only suppressed
because of the place in which they are. They ask`Is
this the maiden who was so wise, so strongwho scorned
usscorned
us,
indeed!and was not able to baffle the
serpent in his very first approaches?' Ha! ha! How they
laugh! Well, indeed, they may. It is very laughable,
Margaretnot less laughable and amusing than strange!
that you should have fallen!so easilyso blindly, and
not even to suspect what every one else was sure of! Oh!
Margaret, Margaret! Can it be true? Who will believe in
your wit, nowyour geniusyour beauty? Smutched
and smutted! Poor, weak, degraded! If there is pity for
you, Margaret, it is full of mockery tooit is a pity that is
full of bitterness. You should now cast yourself down
and cover yourself with ashes, and cry `wo is me,' and
call upon the rocks and the hills to cover you!
Such was the voice in her soul, which to
her
senses,
seemed like that of some jibing demon at her elbow.
Margaret tried to prayto expel him by prayer; but the
object of his mockery had not been attained. She could
not surrender herself entirely to the chastener. She was
scourged but not humbled; and the language of the demon
provoked defiance, not humility. Her proud spirit rose
once more against the pressure put upon it. Her bright,
dazzling eye flashed in scorn upon the damsels whom she
now fancied to be actually titteringscarce able to suppress
their laughterat her obvious disgrace. On John Cross
she fixed her fearless eye, like that of some fallen angel,
still braving the chastener, whom he cannot contend with.
A strange strengthfor even sin has its strength for a
season
came
to her relief in that moment of fiendish
mockery
.
The strength of an evil spirit was accorded her. Her
heart once more swelled with pride. Her soul once more
insisted on its ascendancy. She felt, though she did not
say,even as I am, overthrown, robbed of my treasure,
I feel that I am superior to these. I feel that I have
strength against the future. If they are pure and innocent,
it is not because of their greater strength, but their greater
obscurity. If I am overthrown by the tempter, it was
because
I was the more worthy object of overthrow. In their
littleness they live; if I am doomed to the shaft, at least, it
will be as the eagle is doomed! It will be while soaring
aloftwhile aiming for the sunwhile grasping at the
very bolt by which I am destroyed!
Such was the consolation offered by the twin demons of
pride and vanity. The latter finds its aliment in the heart
which it too completely occupies, even from those
circumstances
which, in other eyes, make its disgrace and
weakness. The sermon which had touched her sin had
not subdued it. Perhaps, no sermon, no appeal, however
powerful and touching, could, at that moment, have had
power over her. The paroxysm of her first consciousness
of ruin had not yet passed off. The condition of mind
was not yet reached in which an appeal could be felt. As
in the case of physical disease, so with that of the mind
and heart, there is a period when it is neither useful nor
prudent to administer the medicines which are yet most
nesessary to safety. The judicious physician will wait for
the moment when the frame is preparedwhen the pulse
is somewhat subduedbefore he tries the most powerful
remedy. The excitement of the wrong which she had
suffered was still great in her bosom. It was necessary
that she should have repose. That excitement was
maintained
by the expectation that Stevens would yet make his
appearance. Her eye, at intervals, wandered over the
assembly in search of him. The demon at her elbow
understood her quest.
He will not come; it saidyou look in vain. The
girls follow your eyesthey behold your disappointment
they laugh at your credulity. If he leads any to the
altar, think you it will be one whom he could command at
pleasure without any such conditionsone, who, in her
wild passions and disordered vanity, could so readily yield
to his desires, without demanding any corresponding
sacrifice
?
Margaret, they laugh now at those weaknesses of a
mind which they once feared if not honoured. They
wonder, now, that they could have been so deceived. If
they do not laugh aloud, Margaret, it is because they
would spare your shame. Indeed, indeed, they pity
you!
The head of the desperate, but still haughty woman,
was now more proudly uplifted, and her eyes shot forth
yet fiercer fires of indignation. What a conflict was going
on in her bosom. Her cheeks glowed with the strife
her breast heaved; with difficulty she maintained her seat
inflexibly, and continued, without other signs of
discomposure
,
until the service was concluded. Her step was more
stately than ever as she walked from church; and while
her mother lingered behind to talk with Brother Cross, and
to exchange the sweetest speeches with the widow
Thackeray
and others, she went on alone,seeing none, heeding
none,dreading to meet any face lest it should wear a
smile and look the language in which the demon at her
side still dealt.
He
still clung to her, with the tenacity of
a fiendish purpose. He mocked her with her shame,
goading her, with dart upon dart, of every sort of mockery.
Truly did he mutter in her ears
Stevens has abandoned you. Never was child, before
yourself, so silly as to believe such a promise as he made
you. Do you doubt?do you still hope? It is madness?
Why came he not yesterdaylast nightto-day? He is
gone. He has abandoned you. You are not only alone
you are lost! lost for ever!
The tidings of this unsolicited confident were confirmed
the next day, by the unsuspecting John Cross. He came
to visit Mrs. Cooper and her daughter among the first of
his parishioners. He had gathered from the villagers
already that Stevens had certainly favoured Miss Cooper
beyond all the rest of the village damsels. Indeed, it was
now generally bruited that he was engaged to her in
marriage
.
Though the worthy preacher had very stoutly
resisted the suggestions of Mr. Calvert, and the story of
Ned Hinkley, he was yet a little annoyed by them; and he
fancied that, if Stevens were, indeed, engaged to Margaret,
she, or perhaps the old lady, might relieve his anxiety by
accounting for the absence of his protg. The notion of
Brother John was, that, having resolved to marry the
maiden, he had naturally gone home to apprise his parents
and to make the necessary preparations. But this
conjecture
brought with it a new anxiety. It now, for the
first time, seemed something strange that Stevens had
never declared to himself, or to any body else who his
parents werewhat they werewhere they werewhat
business they pursued; or any thing about them. Of his
friends, they knew as little. The simple old man had
never thought of these things, until the propriety of such
inquiries was forced upon him by the conviction that they
would now be made in vain. The inability to answer
them, when it was necessary that an answer should be
found, was a commentary upon his imprudence which
startled the good old man not a little. But, in the
confident
hope that a solution of the difficulty could be afforded
by the sweetheart or the mother, he proceeded to her
cottage. Of course, Calvert, in his communication to him,
had forborne those darker conjectures which he could not
help but entertain; and his simple auditor, unconscious
himself of any thought of evil, had never himself formed
any such.
Margaret Cooper was in her chamber when Brother
Cross arrived. She had lost that elasticity of temper
which would have carried her out at that period among
the hills in long rambles filled with those wild, wooing
companions, which gambol along the paths of poetic
contemplation
.
The old man opened his stores of scandal to
Mrs. Cooper with little or no hesitation. He told her all
that Calvert had said, all that Ned Hinkley had fancied
himself to have heard, and all the village tattle touching
the engagement supposed to exist between Stevens and
her daughter.
Of course, Sister Cooper, said he, I believe
nothing
of this sort against the youth. I should be sorry to
think it of one whom I plucked as a brand from the
burning
.
I hold Brother Stevens to be a wise young man and
a pious; and truly I fear, as indeed I learn, that there is
in the mind of Ned Hinkley a bitter dislike to the youth,
because of some quarrel which Brother Stevens is said
to have had with William Hinkley. This dislike hath
made him conceive evil things of Brother Stevens and to
misunderstand and to pervert some conversation which he
hath overhead which Stevens hath had with his
companion
.
Truly, indeed, I think that Alfred Stevens is a
worthy youth of whom we shall hear a good account.
And I think so too, Brother Cross. Brother Stevens
will be yet a burning and a shining light in the church.
There is a malice against him; and I think I know the
cause, Brother Cross.
Ah! this will be a light unto our footsteps, Sister
Cooper.
Thou knowest, Brother Cross, resumed the old lady
in a subdued tone but with a loftier elevation of eye-brows
and head,thou knowest the great beauty of my
daughter
Margaret?
The maiden is comely, sister, comely among the
maidens; but beauty is grass. It is a flower which blooms
at morning and is cut down in the evening. It withereth
on the stalk where it bloomed, until men turn from it with
sickening and with sorrow, remembering what it hath been.
Be not boastful of thy daughter's beauty, Sister Cooper
it is the beauty of goodness alone which dieth not.
But said I not, Brother Cross, of her wisdom, and her
wit, as well as her beauty? replied the old lady with
some little pique. I was forgetful of much, if I spoke
only of the beauty of person which Margaret Cooper
surely possesseth, and which the eyes of blindness itself
might see.
Dross, dross all, Sister Cooper. The wit of man is a
flash which blindeth and maketh dark; and the wisdom of
man is a vain thing. The one crackleth like thorns
beneath
the potthe other stifleth the heart and keepeth
down the soul from her true flight. I count the wit and
wisdom of this daughter even as I count her beauty.
She hath all, I think,as they are known to and regarded
by men. But all is nothing. Beauty hath a day's life like
the butterfly; wit shineth like the sudden flash of the
lightning, leaving only the cloud behind it; and oh! for
the vain wisdom of man which makes him vain and
unsteady
likely
to falterliable to fallrash in his
judgment
erring
in his aimsblind to his dutywilful in
his weaknessinsolent to his fellowpresumptuous in the
sight of God. Talk not to me of worldly wisdom. It is
the foe to prayer and meekness. The very fruit of the
tree which brought sin and death into the world. Thy
daughter is fair to beholdvery fair among the maidens of
our flocknone fairer, none so fair: God hath otherwise
blessed her with a bright mind and a quick intelligence;
but I think not she is wise to salvation. No, no! she hath
not yearned to the holy places of the tabernacle, unless it
be that Brother Stevens hath been more blessed in his
ministry than I!
And he hath! exclaimed the mother. I tell you,
Brother John, the heart of Margaret Cooper is no longer
what it was. It is softened. The toils of Brother
Stevens
have not been in vain. Blessed young man, no
wonder they hate and defame him. He hath had a power
over Margaret Cooper such as man never had before; and
it is for this reason that Bill Hinkley and Ned conspired
against him, first to take his life, and then to speak evil of
his deeds. They beheld the beauty of my daughter, and
they looked on her with famishing eyes. She sent them
a-packing, I tell you. But this youth, Brother Stevens,
found favour in her heart. They beheld the two as they
went forth together. Ah! Brother John, it is the sweetest
sight to behold two young, loving people walk forth in
amityborn, as it would seem, for each other; both so
tall, and young, and handsome; walking together with
such smiles, as if there was no sorrow in the world; as if
there was nothing but flowers and sweetness on the path;
as if they could see nothing but one another; and as if
there were no enemies looking on. It did my heart good
to see them, Brother Cross; they always looked so happy
with one another.
And you think, Sister Cooper, that Brother Stevens
hath agreed to take Margaret to wife?
She hath not told me this yet, but in truth, I think it
hath very nigh come to that.
Where is she?
In her chamber.
Call her hither, Sister Cooper; let us ask of her the
truth.
Margaret Cooper was summoned, and descended with
slow steps and an unwilling spirit to meet their visiter.
Daughter, said the good old man, taking her hand, and
leading her to a seat, thou art, even as thy mother sayest,
one of exceeding beauty. Few damsels have ever met mine
eyes with a beauty like to thine. No wonder the young men
look on thee with eyes of love; but let not the love of
youth betray thee. The love of God is the only love
that is precious to the heart of wisdom.
Thus saying, the old man gazed on her with as much
admiration as was consistent with the natural coldness of
his temperament, his years, and his profession. His
address, so different from usual, had a soothing effect upon
VOL. II. 3
her. A sigh escaped her, but she said nothing. He then
proceeded to renew the history which had been given to
him and which he had already detailed to her mother. She
heard him with patience, in spite of all his interpolations
from Scripture, his ejaculations, his running commentary
upon the narrative, and the numerous suggestive topics
which took him from episode to episode, until the story
seemed interminably mixed up in the digression. But
when he came to that portion which related to the
adventure
of Ned Hinkley, to his espionage, the conference of
Stevens with his companion,then she started,then her
breathing became suspended, then quickened,then again
suspendedand then, so rapid in its rush, that her emotion
became almost too much for her powers of suppression.
But she did suppress it, with a power, a resolution, not
often paralleled among menseldom among women.
After the first spasmodic acknowledgment given by her
surprise, she listened with comparative calmness. She,
alone, had the key to that conversation. She, alone, knew
its terrible signification. She knew that Ned Hinkley
was honestwas to be believedthat he was too simple,
and too sincere, for any such invention; and, sitting with
hands clasped upon that chairthe only attitude which
expressed the intense emotion which she feltshe gazed
with unembarrassed eye upon the face of the speaker,
while every word which he spoke went like some keen,
death-giving instrument into her heart. The whole
dreadful
history of the villany of Stevens, her irreparable ruin
was now clearly intelligible. The mocking devil at her
elbow had spoken nothing but the truth. She was indeed
the poor victim of a crafty villain. In the day of her
strength and glory she had fallenfallen, fallen, fallen!
Why am I called to hear this? she demanded with
singular composure.
The old man and the mother explained in the same
breaththat she might reveal the degree of intercourse
which had taken place between them, and, if possible,
account
for the absence of her lover. That, in short, she
might refute the malice of enemies and establish the
falsehood
of their suggestions.
You wish to know if I believe this story of Ned
Hinkley?
Even so, my daughter.
Then, I do!
Ha!what is it you say, Margaret?
The truth.
What? demanded the preacher, you cannot surely
mean that Brother Stevens hath been a wolf in sheep's
clothingthat he hath been a hypocrite.
Alas! thought Margaret Cooperhave I not been
my own worst enemydid I not know him to be this
from the first?
Her secret reflection remained, however, unspoken.
She answered the demand of John Cross.
I believe that Alfred Stevens is all that he is charged
to bea hypocritea wolf in sheep's clothing!I see no
reason to doubt the story of Ned Hinkley. He is an
honest youth.
The old lady was in consternation. The preacher
aghast and confounded.
Tell me, Margaret, said the former, hath he not
engaged himself to you? Did he not promiseis he not
sworn to be your husband?
I have already given you my belief. I see no reason
to say any thing more. What more do you need? Is he
not gonefledhas he not failed
She paused abruptly, while a purple flush went over her
face. She rose to retire.
Margaret! exclaimed the mother.
My daughter! said John Cross.
Speak out what you knowtell us all
No! I will say no more. You know enough already.
I tell you, I believe Alfred Stevens to be a hypocrite and a
villain. Is not that enough? What is it to you whether
he is so or not? What is it to me, at least? You do not
suppose that it is any thing to me? Why should you?
What should he be? I tell you he is nothing to me
nothingnothingnothing! Villain or hypocrite, or what
nothe is no more to me than the earth on which I tread.
Let me hear no more about him, I pray you. I would
not hear his name! Are there not villains enough in the
world, that you should think and speak of one only?
With these vehement words she left the room, and
hurried to her chamber. She stopped suddenly before the
mirror.
And it is thus! she exclaimedand I am
The mother by this time had followed her into the
room.
What is the meaning of this, Margaret?tell me!
cried the old woman in the wildest agitation.
What should it be, mother? Look at me!in my
eyesdo they not tell you? Can you not read?
I see nothingI do not understand you, Margaret.
Indeed! but you shall. I thought my face would tell
you without my words.
I
see it there, legible enough,
myself. Look again!spare me if you canspare your
own earsthe necessity of hearing me speak!
You terrify me, MargaretI fear you are out of your
mind.
No! no! that need not be your fear; nor, were it
true, would it be a fear of mine. It might be something
to hopeto pray for. It might bring relief. Hear me,
since you will not see. You ask me why I believe
Stevens
to be a villain. I
know
it.
Ha! how know it!
How! How should I know it? Well, I see that I
must speak. Listen then. You bade me seek and make a
conquest of him, did you not? Do not deny it, mother
you did.
Well, if I did?
I succeeded! Without trying, I succeeded! He
declared
to me his lovehe did!he promised to marry
me. He was to have married me yesterdayto have met
me in church and married me. John Cross was to have
performed the ceremony. Well! you saw me thereyou
saw me in whitethe dress of a bride!Did he come?
Did you see him there? Did you see the ceremony
performed
?
No, surely notyou know without asking.
I know without asking!surely I do!but look
you, motherdo you think that conquests are to be made,
hearts won, loves confessed, pledges given, marriage-day
fixeddo these things take place, as matters of pure form?
Is there no sensationno agitationno beating and
violence
about the heartin the bloodin the brain! I tell
you there isa blinding violence, a wild, stormy
sensation
,
fondness, forgetfulness, madness! I say, madness!
madness! madness!
Oh, my daughter, what can all this mean? Speak
calmly, be deliberate!
Calm, deliberate! What a monster if I could be! But
I am not mad now. I will tell you what it means. It
means that, in taking captive Alfred Stevensin winning
a loversecuring that pious young manthere was some
difficulty, some peril. Would you believe it?there were
some privileges which he claimed. He took me in his
arms. He held me panting to his breast. His mouth
filled mine with kisses
No more, do not say more, my child!
Ay, more! more! much more! I tell youthen came
blindness and madness, and I was dishonouredmade a
woman before I was made a wife! Ruined, lost, abused,
despised, abandoned! Ha! ha! ha! no marriage
ceremony
,
though I went to the church. No bridegroom
there, though he promised to come. Preacher, church,
bride, all present, yet no wedding. Ha! ha! ha! How
do I know!Good reason for it, good reasonHa! ha!
ah!
The paroxysm terminated in a fit. The unhappy girl
fell to the floor as if stricken in the forehead. The blood
gushed from her nostrils, and she lay insensible in the
presence of the terrified and miserable mother.
CHAPTER III.
For
a long time she lay without showing any signs of
life. Her passions rebelled against the restraint which her
mind had endeavoured to put upon them. Their
concentrated
force breaking all bonds, so suddenly, was like the
terrific outburst of the boiling lava from the gorges of the
frozen mountain. Believing her dead, the mother rushed
headlong into the highway, rending the village with her
screams. She was for the time a perfect madwoman.
The neighbours gathered to her assistance. That much
abused woman, the widow Thackeray, was the first to
come. Never was woman's tenderness more remarkable
3*
than hersnever was woman's watch by the bed of
sickness
and sufferingthat watch which woman alone knows
so well how to keepmore rigidly maintained than by
her! From the first hour of that agony under which
Margaret Cooper fell to earth insensible, to the last
moment
in which her recovery was doubtful, that widow
Thackeraywhose passion for a husband had been
described
by Mrs. Cooper as so very decided and evident
maintained her place by the sick bed of the stricken girl
with all the affection of a mother. Widow Thackeray
was a woman who could laugh merrily, but she could shed
tears with equal readiness. These were equally the signs
of prompt feeling and nice susceptibility; and the proud
Margaret, and her invidious mother, were both humbled
by that spontaneous kindness for which, hitherto, they
had given the possessor so very little credit, and to which
they were now equally so greatly indebted.
Medical attendance was promptly secured. Charlemont
had a very clever physician of the old school. He
combined
,
as was requisite in the forest region of our country,
the distinct offices of the surgeon and mediciner. He was
tolerably skilful in both departments. He found his
patient
in a condition of considerable peril. She had broken
a blood-vessel; and the nicest care and closest attendance
were necessary to her preservation. It will not need that
we should go through the long and weary details which
followed, to her cure. Enough, that she did recover.
But for weeks her chance was doubtful. She lay for that
space of time, equally in the arms of life and death. For
a long period, she herself was unconscious of her
situation
.
When she came to know, the skill of her attendants
derived very little aid from her consciousness. Her mind
was unfavourable to her cure; and this, by the way, is a
very important particular in the fortunes of the sick. To
despond, to have a weariness of life, to forbear hope as
well as exertion, is an hundred to one, to determine against
the skill of the physician. Margaret Cooper felt a
willingness
to die. She felt her overthrow in the keenest
pangs of its shame; and, unhappily, the mother, in her
madness, had declared it. The story of her fallof the
triumph of the serpent, was now the village property, and
of course put an end to all farther doubts on the score of
the piety of Brother Stevens; though, by way of
qualification
of his offence, old Hinkley insisted that it was the
fault of the poor damsel. She, he said, had tempted
himhad thrown herself in his wayhad been brazen,
and all that, of which so much is commonly said in all
similar cases. We, who know the character of the
parties
,
and have traced events from the beginning, very well
know how little of this is true. Poor Margaret was a
victim before she was well aware of those passions which
made her so. Never was woman more unsophisticated
less moved by unworthy and sinister design. She had her
weaknessesher pride, her vanity; and her passions,
which were tremendous, worked upon through these, very
soon effected her undoing. But, for deliberate purpose
of evilof any evil of which her own intellect was
conscious
the
angels are not more innocent.
But mere innocence of evil design, in any one
particular
condition, is not enough for security. We are not
only to forbear evil; virtue requires that we should be
exercised for the purposes of good. She lacked the
moral strength which such exercises, constantly pursued,
would have assured her. She was a creature of impulse
only, not of reflection. Besides, she was ignorant of
her particular weaknesses. She was weak where she
thought herself strong. This is always the error of a
person having a very decided will. The will is constantly
mistaken for the power. She could not humble herself,
and in her own personal capacitiescapacities which had
never before been subjected to any ordeal-trialshe
relied
for the force which was to sustain her in every
situation
.
Fancy a confident country girlsupreme in her
own district over the Hobs and Hinnies thereaboutsin
conflict with the adroit man of the world, and you have
the whole history of Margaret Cooper, and the secret of
her misfortune. Let the girl have what natural talent you
please, and the case is by no means altered. She must
fall if she seeks or permits the conflict. She can only
escape by flight. It is in consideration of this human
weakness, that we pray God, nightly, not to suffer us to
be exposed to temptation.
When the personal resources of her own experience
and mind failed Margaret Cooper, as at some time or
other they must fail all who trust only in them, she had
no further reliance. She had never learned to draw equal
strength and consolation from the sweet counsels of the
sacred volume. Regarding the wild raving and the
senseless
insanity, which is but too frequently the language of
the western preacher, as gross ignorance and debasing
folly, she committed the unhappy error of confounding the
preacher with his cause. She had never been taught to
make an habitual reference to religion; and her own
experience
of life, had never forced upon her those sage
reflections
which would have shown her that
true
religion
is all of life, and without it life has nothing. The humility
of the Psalmist, which was the real source of all the
strength allotted to the monarch minstrel, was an unread
lesson with her; and never having been tutored to refer
to God, and relying upon her own proud mind and daring
imagination, what wonder that these frail reeds should
pierce her side while giving way beneath her.
It was this very confidence in her own strengththis
fearlessness of danger (and we repeat the lesson here,
emphatically, by way of warning)a confidence which
the possession of a quick and powerful mind naturally
enough inspiresthat effected her undoing. It was not
by the force of her affections that she fell.
The affections
are not apt to be strong in a woman whose mind leads her
out from her sex!
The seducer triumphed through the
medium
of her vanity. Her feeling of self-assurance had been
thus active from childhood, and conspicuous in all her sports
and employments.
She led always in the pastimes of her
playmates, many of whom were older than herself
. She
had no fears, when others trembled; and, if she did not,
at any time, so far transcend the bounds of filial duty as
to defy the counsels of her parents, it was certainly no
less true that she never sought for, and seldom seemed to
need them.
It is dangerous when the woman, through
sheer confidence in her own strength, ventures upon the
verge of the moral precipice. The very experiment, where
the passions are concerned, proves her to be lost
.
Margaret
Cooper, confident in her own footsteps, soon learned
to despise every sort of guardianship. The vanity of her
mother had not only counselled and stimulated her own,
but was of that gross and silly order, as to make itself
offensive to the judgment of the girl herself. This had
the effect of losing her all the authority of a parent; and
we have already seen, in the few instances where this
authority took the shape of counsel, that its tendency was
to evil rather than to good.
The arts of Alfred Stevens had, in reality, been very
few. It was only necessary that he should read the
character
of his victim. This, as an experienced worldling,
experienced in such a volume,he was soon very able
to do. He saw enough to discover, that, while Margaret
Cooper was endowed by nature with an extraordinary
measure of intellect, she was really weak because of its
possession. In due proportion to the degree of exercise
to which she subjected her mere mindmaking that
busy and restlesswas the neglect of her sensibilities
those nice
antenn of the heart,
Whose instant touches, slightest pause,
teach the approach of the smallest forms of danger,
however
inoffensive their shapes, however unobtrusive their
advance. When the sensibilities are neglected and
suffered
to fall into disrepute, they grow idle first and finally
obtuse; even as the limb which you forbear to exercise
loses its muscle, and withers into worthlessness. When
Alfred Stevens discovered this condition, his plan was
simple enough. He had only to stimulate her mind into
bolder exerciseto conduct it to topics of the utmost
hardihoodto inspire that sort of moral recklessness
which some people call couragewhich delights to sport
along the edge of the precipice, and to summon audacious
spirits from the great yawning gulfs which lie below.
This practice is always pursued at the expense of those
guardian feelings which keep watch over the virtues of
the tender heart. The analysis of subjects commonly
forbidden to the sex, necessarily tends to make dull those
habitual sentinels over the female conduct. These
sentinels
are instincts rather than principles. Education can
take them away, but does not often confer them. When,
through the arts of Alfred Stevens, Margaret Cooper
was led to discuss, perhaps to despise, those nice and
seemingly purposeless barriers which societyhaving the
experience of ages for its authorityhas wisely set up
between the sexes,she had already taken a large stride
towards passing them. But of this, which a judicious
education would have taught her, she was wholly
ignorant
.
Her mind was too bold to be scrupulous; too
adventurous
to be watchful; and if, at any moment, a
pause in her progress permitted her to think of the
probable
danger to her sex of such adventurous freedom,
she certainly never apprehended it in her own case. Such
restraints she conceived to be essential only for the
protection
of
the weak
among her sex. Her vanity led her
to believe that she was strong; and the approaches of the
sapper were conducted with too much caution, with a
progress too stealthy and insensible, to startle the ear or
attract the eye of the unobservant, yet keen-eyed
guardian
of her citadel. An eagle perched upon a rock, with
wing outspread for flight, and an eye fixed upon the
rolling clouds through which it means to dart, is thus
heedless of the coiled serpent which lies beneath its feet.
The bold eye of Margaret Cooper was thus heedless.
Gazing upon the sun, she saw not the serpent at her feet.
It was not because she sleptnever was eye brighter,
more far-stretching; never was mind more busy, more
active, than that of the victim at the very moment when
she fell. It was because she watched the remote, not the
near,the region in which there was no enemynothing
but glory,and neglected that post which is always in
danger. Her error is that of the general, who expends
his army upon some distant province, leaving his chief
city to the assault and sack of the invader.
We have dwelt somewhat longer upon the moral causes
which, in our story, have produced such cruel results,
than the mere story itself demands; but no story is
perfectly
moral unless the author, with a wholesome
commentary
,
directs the attention of the reader to the true
weaknesses of his hero, to the point where his character
fails; to the causes of this failure, and the modes in which
it may be repaired or prevented. In this way, alone, may
the details of life and society be properly welded together
into consistent doctrine, so that instruction may keep pace
with delight, and the heart and mind be informed without
being conscious of any of those tasks which accompany
the lessons of experience.
To return now to our narrative.
Margaret Cooper lived! She might as well have died.
This was her thought, at least. She prayed for death.
Was it in mercy that her prayer was denied? We shall
see! Youth and a vigorous constitution, successfully
resisted
the attacks of the assailant. They finally obtained
the victory. After a weary spell of bondage and suffering
she recovered. But she recovered only to the
consciousness
of a new affliction. All the consequences of her
fatal lapse from virtue have not yet been told. She bore
within her an indelible witness of her shame. She was
destined to be a mother without having been a wife!
This, to
her
mother at least, was a more terrible
discovery
than the former. She literally cowered and
crouched
beneath it. It was the
written
shame, rather than the
actual, which the old woman dreaded. She had been so
vain, so criminally vain of her daughter. She had made
her so constantly the subject of her brag, that, unwitting
of having declared the whole melancholy truth, in the first
moment of her madness, she shrunk, with an unspeakable
horror, from the idea that the little world in which she lived
should become familiar with the whole cruel history of
her overthrow. She could scarce believe it herself, though
the daughter, with an anguish in her eyes that left little to
be told, had herself revealed the truth. Her pride, as
well as her life, was linked with the pride and the beauty
of her child. She had shared in her constant triumphs
over all around her; and overlooking, as a fond, foolish
mother is apt to do, all her faults of temper or of
judgment
,
she had learned to behold nothing but her
superiority
.
And now to see her fallen! a thing of scorn, which
was lately a thing of beauty!the despised, which was
lately the worshipped and the wondered at! No wonder
that her weak, vain heart was crushed and humbled, and
her head bowed in sorrow to the earth. She threw
herself
upon the floor, and wept bitter and scalding tears.
The daughter had none. Without sob or sigh, she
stooped down and tenderly assisted the old woman to
rise. Why had she no tears? She asked herself this
question, but in vain. Her external emotions promised
none. Indeed, she seemed to be without emotions. A
weariness and general indifference to all things was the
expression of her features. But this was the deceitful
aspect of the mountain, on whose breast contemplation
sits with silence, unconscious of the tossing flame which,
within, is secretly fusing the stubborn metal and the rock.
Anger was in her breastfeelings of hate mingled up with
shamescorn of herself, scorn of allfeelings of defiance
and terror, striving at mastery; and, in one corner, a
brooding image of despair, kept from the brink of the
precipice
only by the entreaties of some fiercer principle of
hate. She felt life to be insupportable. Why did she
live? This question came to her repeatedly. The demon
was again at work beside her.
Die! said he. It is but a blowa moment's pang
the driving a needle into an arterythe prick of a pin
upon the heart. Die! it will save you from exposure!
the shame of bringing into the world an heir of shame!
What would you live for? The doors of love, and fame,
even of society, are shut against you for ever. What is
life? a long deniala protracted draught of bitterness
the feeling of a death-spasm carried on through sleepless
years; perhaps, under a curse of peculiar bitterness,
carried
on even into age! Die! You cannot be so base
as to wish for longer life!
The arguments of the demon were imposing. His
suggestions
seemed to promise the relief she sought. Hers
seemed the particular case where the prayer is justified
which invokes the mountains and the rocks upon the head
of the guilty. But the rock refused to fall, the mountain
to cover her shame, and its exposure became daily more
and more certain. Death was the only mode of escape
from the mountain of pain which seemed to rest upon
her heart. The means of self-destruction were easy.
With a spirit so impetuous as hers, to imagine was to
determine. She did determine. Yet, even while making
so terrible a resolve, a singular calm seemed to
overspread
her soul. She complained of nothingwished for
nothingsought for nothingtrembled at nothing. A
dreadful lethargy, which made the old mother declaim as
against a singular proof of hardihood, possessed her spirit.
Little did the still idolizing mother conjecture how much
that lethargy concealed.
The moment that Margaret Cooper conceived the idea
of suicide, it possessed all her mind. It became the one
only thought. There were few arguments against it, and
these she rapidly dismissed or overcame. To leave her
mother in her old age was the first; but this became a
small consideration when she reflected that the latter could
not, under any circumstances require her assistance very
long; and to spare her the shame of public exposure was
another consideration. The evils of the act to herself,
were reduced, with equal readiness to the transition from
one state to another by a small process, which, whether
by the name of stab or shot, was productive only of a
momentary spasm, for, though as fully persuaded of the
soul's immortality as the best of us, the unhappy girl, like
all young free-thinkers, had persuaded herself that, in dying
by her own hands, she was simply exercising a
discretionary
power under the conviction that her act in doing
so, was rendered by circumstances a judicious one. The
arguments by which she deceived herself are sufficiently
commonplace, and too easy of refutation, to render
necessary
any discussion of them here. Enough to state the
fact. She deliberately resolved upon the fatal deed which
was to end her life and agony together; and save her from
that more notorious exposure which must follow the birth
of that child of sin, whom she deemed it no more than a
charity to destroy.
There was an old pair of pistols in the house which had
been the property of her father. She had often, with a
boldness not common to the sex, examined these pistols.
They were of brass; well made; of English manufacture;
with common muzzles, and a groove for a sight instead of
the usual drop. They were not large, but, in a practised
hand, were good travelling pistols, being capable of
bringing
down a man at twelve paces, provided there was any
thing like deliberation in the holder. Often and again had
she handled these weapons, poising them and addressing
them at objects as she had seen her father do. On one
occasion she had been made to discharge them, under his
own instruction. She had done so without terror. She
recalled these events. She had seen the pistols loaded.
She did not exactly know what quantity of powder was
necessary for a charge,but she was in no mood to
calculate
the value of a thimblefull. Availing herself of the
temporary absence of her mother, she possessed herself of
these weapons. Along with them in the same drawer, she
found a horn which still contained a certain quantity of
powder. There were bullets in the bag with the pistols
which precisely fitted them. There, too, was the mould
there were flintsthe stock was sufficiently ample for
all her desires; and she surveyed the prize, in her own
room, with the look of one who congratulates himself in
the conviction that he holds in his hand the great medicine
vol. ii. 4
which is to cure his disease. In her chamber she loaded
the weapons, and, with such resignation as belonged to
her philosophy, she waited for the propitious moment
when she might complete the deed.
CHAPTER IV.
It
was the Sabbath and a very lovely day. The sun
never shone more brightly in the heavens; and as
Margaret
Cooper surveyed its purple and mellow light, lying,
like some blessed spirit, at sleep upon the hills around her,
and reflected that she was about to behold it for the last
time, her sense of its exceeding beauty became more strong
than ever. Now that she was about to lose it for ever, it
seemed more beautiful than it had ever been before. This
is a natural effect, which the affections confer upon the
objects which delight and employ them. Even a
temporary
privation increases the loveliness of the external
nature. How we linger and look. That shade seems so
inviting; that old oak so venerable! That rock,how
often have we sat upon it, evening and morning, and
mused strange, wild, sweet fancies! It is an effort to tear
one's self awayit is almost like tearing away from life
itself, so many living affections feel the rending and the
strainingso many fibres that have their roots in the heart,
are torn and lacerated by the separation. Poor Margaret!
she looked from her window upon the bright and beautiful
world around her. Strange that sorrow should dwell in a
world so bright and beautiful! Stranger still, that,
dwelling
in such a world, it should not dwell there by sufferance
only and constraint! that it should have such swaysuch
privilege. That it should invade every sanctuary and leave
no home secure. Ah! but the difference between mere
sorrow and guilt! Poor Margaret could not well
understand
that! If she couldbut no! She was yet to learn
that the sorrows of the innocent have a healing effect.
That they produce a holy and ennobling strength, and a
juster appreciation of those evening shades of life which
render the lights valuable and make their uses pure. It is
only guilt which finds life loathsome. It is only guilt that
sorrow weakens and enslaves. Virtue grows strong
beneath
the pressure of her enemies, and with such a power
as was fabled of the King of Pontus, turns the most
poisonous
fruits of earth into the most healthy food.
But even in the heart of Margaret Cooper, where the
sense of the beautiful was strong the loveliness of the
scene was felt. She drank in, with strange satisfaction,
a satisfaction to which she had long been a stranger,its
soft and inviting beauties. They did not lessen her sense
of suffering, perhaps, but they were not without their effect
in producing other moods, which, once taken in company
with the darker ones of the soul, may in time succeed in
alleviating them. Never, indeed, had the prospect been
more calm and wooing. Silence, bending from the hills,
seemed to brood above the valley even as some mighty
spirit, at whose bidding strife was hushed, and peace
became the acknowledged divinity of all. The humming
voices of trade and merriment were all hushed in homage
to the holy day; and if the fitful song of a truant bird, that
presumed beside the window of Margaret Cooper, did
break the silence of the scene, it certainly did not disturb
its calm. The forest minstrel sung in a neighbouring tree,
and she half listened to his lay. The strain seemed to
sympathize with her sadness. She thought upon her own
songs, which had been of such a proud spirit; and how
strange and startling seemed the idea that with her, song
would soon cease for ever. The song of the bird would be
silent in her ears, and her own song! What song would
be hers?What strain would she take up? In what
abodebefore what altars?
This train of thought, which was not entirely lost,
however
,
was broken, for the time, by a very natural
circumstance
.
A troop of the village damsels came in sight, on
their way to church. She forgot the song of birds, as her
morbid spirit suggested to her the probable subject of their
meditations.
They have seen me, she muttered to herself as she
hastily darted from the window. Ay, they exult. They
point to meme, the abandonedthe desolatesoon to
be the disgraced! But, no! no! that shall never be.
They shall never have that triumph, which is always so
grateful a subject of regale to the mean and envious!
The voice of her mother from below disturbed these
unhappy meditations. The old lady was prepared for
church, and was surprised to find that Margaret had not
made her toilet.
What! don't you mean to go, Margaret?
Not to day, mother.
What, and the new preacher too, that takes the place
of John Cross! They say he makes a most heavenly
prayer.
But the inducement of the heavenly prayer of the new
preacher was not enough for Margaret. The very
suggestion
of a new preacher would have been conclusive against
her compliance. The good old lady was too eager herself
to get under way to waste much time in exhortation, and
hurrying off, she scarcely gave herself time to answer the
inquiry of the widow Thackeray, at her own door, after
the daughter's health.
I will go in and see her; said the lighthearted but
truehearted woman.
Do, do, ma'am,if you please! She'll be glad to
see you. I'll hurry on, as I see Mrs. Hinkley just ahead.
The widow Thackeray looked after her with a smile,
which was exchanged for another of different character when
she found herself in the chamber of Margaret. She put her
arms about the waist of the sufferer; kissed her cheeks,
and with the tenderest solicitude spoke of her health and
comfort. To her, alone, with the exception of her mother
according to the belief of Margarether true situation
had been made known.
Alas! said she, how should I feelhow should I
be! You should know. I am as one curseddoomed,
hopeless of any thing but death.
Ah! do not speak of death, Margaret, said the other
kindly. We must all die, I know, but that does not
reconcile me any more to the thought. It brings always a
creeping horror through my veins. Think of lifetalk of
life only.
They say that death is life.
So it is, I believe, Margaret; and now I think of it,
dress yourself and go to church where we may hear
something
on this subject to make us wiser and better. Come,
my dear,let us go to God.
I cannot,not to-day, dear Mrs. Thackeray.
Ah, Margaret, why not? It is to the church, of all
places, you should now go.
What! to be stared at? To see the finger of scorn
pointing at me wherever I turn? To hear the whispered
insinuation? To be conscious only of sneer and sarcasm on
every hand? No, no, dear Mrs. Thackeray, I cannot go
for this. Feeling this, I should neither pray for myself,
nor find benefit from the prayers of others. Nay,
they
would not pray. They would only mock.
Margaret, these thoughts are very sinful.
So they are, but I cannot think of any better. They
cannot but be sinful since they are mine.
But you are not wedded to sin, dearest. Such thoughts
can give you no pleasure. Come with me to church!
Come and pray! Prayer will do you good.
I would rather pray here. Let me remain. I will
try to go out among the hills when you are all engaged in
church, and will pray there. Indeed I must. I must pray
then and pray there, if prayer is ever to do me good.
The church is the better place, Margaret. One prays
better where one sees that all are praying.
But when I
know
that they are not praying! When I
know that envy is in their hearts, and malice, and jealousy
and suspicionthat God is not in their hearts, but their
fellow; and not him with friendly and fond, but with
spiteful and deceitful thoughts!
Ah! Margaret, how can you know this? Judge not
lest ye be judged.
It matters not, dear Mrs. Thackeray. God is here, or
there. He will be among the hills if any where. I will
seek him there. If I can command my thoughts any
where, it will be in the woods alone. In the church I
cannot
.
Those who hate me are there,and their looks of hate
would only move my scorn and defiance.
Margaret, you do our people wrong. You do
yourself
wrong. None hate younone will point to you, or
think of your misfortune; and if they did, it is only what
you might expect, and what you must learn patiently to
bear, as a part of the punishment which God inflicts on
sin. You must submit, Margaret, to the shame as you
4*
have submitted to the sin. It is by submission only that
you can be made strong. The burden which you are
prepared to bear meekly, becomes light to the willing
spirit. Come, dear Margaret, I will keep with you, sit by
youshow you, and all, that I forget your sin and
remember
only your suffering.
The good widow spoke with the kindest tones. She
threw her arms around the neck of the desolate one and
kissed her with the affection of a sister; but the demon
of pride was uppermost. She withstood entreaty and
embrace.
I cannot go with you. I thank you, truly thank you,
dear Mrs. Thackeray, but I cannot go. I have neither the
courage nor the strength.
They will comethe courage and the strength,only
try. God is watchful to give us help the moment he sees
that we really seek his assistance. By prayer,
Margaret
I will pray, but I must pray alone. Among the hills
I will pray. My prayer will not be less acceptable offered
among his hills. My voice will not remain unheard,
though no chorus swells its appeal.
Margaret, this is pride.
Perhaps!
Ah! go with me and pray for humility?
My prayer would rather be for death.
Say not so, Margaretthis is impiety.
Ay, death! The peace, the quiet of the graveof a
long sleepan endless sleep; where the vulture may no
longer gnaw the heart, nor the fire burn within the brain.
For these I must pray. And thus speaking, the unhappy
woman smote her throbbing head with violent hand.
Shocking thought! But you do not believe in such a
sleep? Surely, Margaret, you believe in life eternal?
Would I did not!
Oh, Margaret!but you are sick. You are very
feverish. Your eyeballs glare like coals of fireyour
face seems charged with blood. I am afraid you are going
to have another attack like the last.
Be not afraid. I have no such fear.
I will sit with you, at least, said the kindhearted
woman.
Nay, that I must positively forbid, Mrs. Thackeray;
I will not suffer it. I will not sit with you. Go you to
church. You will be late. Do not waste your time on
me. I mean to ramble among the hills this morning.
That,
I think, will do me more good than any thing else.
There, I am surethere onlyI will find peace.
The worthy widow shook her head doubtfully.
But I am sure of it, said Margaret. You will see.
Peace! peace! The repose of the heartthe slumber of
the brain! I shall find all there!
Mrs. Thackeray, finding her inflexible, rose to depart,
but with some irresoluteness.
If you would let me walk with you, Margaret?
No! no!dear Mrs. Thackeray,I thank you very
much, but with a mood such as mine, I shall be much
better alone.
Well, if you are resolved.
I am resolved! never more so.
These words were spoken in tones which might have
startled a suspicious mind. But the widow was none.
God bless you, she said, kissing her at parting. I
will see you when I come from church.
Will you! said Margaret with a significant but sad
smile. Then, suddenly rising, she exclaimed
Let me kiss you, dear Mrs. Thackeray, and thank
you again before you go. You have been very kind to
me, very kind, and you have my thanks and gratitude.
Mrs. Thackeray was touched by her manner. This
was the first time that the proud spirit of Margaret Cooper
had ever offered such an acknowledgment. It was one
that the gentle and unremitting kindnesses of the widow
amply deserved. After renewing her promise to call on
her return from church, Mrs. Thackeray took her
departure
.
Margaret Cooper was once more alone. When
she heard the outer door shut, she then threw herself
upon the bed, and gave way to the utterance of those
emotions which, long restrained, had rendered her mind
a terrible anarchy. A few tears, but very few, were
wrung from her eyes; but she groaned audibly, and a
rapid succession of shivering fits passed through her
frame, wracking the whole nervous system, until she
scarce found herself able to rise from the couch where
she had thrown herself. A strong determined will alone
moved her, and she rose, after a lapse of half an hour, to
the further prosecution of her purpose. Her temporary
weakness and suffering of frame had no effect upon her
resolves. She rather seemed to be strengthened in them.
This strength enabled her to sit down and dictate a letter
to her mother, declaring her intention, and justifying it by
such arguments as were presented by the ingenious
demon who assists always in the councils of the erring
heart. She placed this letter in her bosom that it might
be found upon her person. It was curious to observe,
next, that she proceeded to tasks which were scarcely in
unison with the dreadful deed she meditated. She put
her chamber in nice order. Her books, of which she had
a tolerably handsome collection for a private library in
our forest country, she arranged and properly classed
upon their shelves. Then she made her toilet with
unusual
care. It was for the last time. She gazed upon
the mirror, and beheld her own beauties with a shudder.
Ah! she thought, though she gave no expression to
the thought, to be so beautiful, yet fail! It was a
reflection
to touch any heart with sorrow. Her dress was
of plain white, she wore no ornamentnot even a
riband. Her hair which was beautifully long and thick,
was disposed in a clubbed mass upon her head, very
simply but with particular neatness; and when all was
done, concealing the weapon of death beneath a shawl
which she wrapped around her, she left the house and
stole away unobserved along the hills, in the seclusion
and sacred silence of which she sought to avoid the evil
consequences of one crime by the commission of another
far more heinous.
CHAPTER V.
At
the risk of seeming monotonous, we must repeat
the reflection made in our last chapter, that the things we
are about to lose for ever, seem always more valuable in
the moment of their loss. They acquire a newer interest
in our eyes at such a time, possibly under the direction
of some governing instinct which is intended to render us
tenacious of life to the very last. Privation teaches us
much more effectually than possession, the value of all
human enjoyments; and the moralist has more than once
drawn his sweetest portraits of liberty from the gloom
and the denials of a dungeon. How eloquent of freedom
is he who yearns for it in vain. How glowing is that
passion which laments the lost! To one dying, as we
suppose few die, in the perfect possession of their senses,
how beautiful must seem the fading hues of the sunlight,
flickering along the walls of a chamberhow heavenly
the brief glimpses of the blue sky through the half-opened
windowhow charming the green bit of foliage that
swings against the panehow cheering and unwontedly
sweet and balmy, the soft, sudden gust of the sweet south
breathing up from the flowers, and stirring the loose
drapery around the couch. How can we part with these
without tears? How reflect, without horror, upon the
close coffin, the damp clod, the deep hollows of the earth
in which we are to be cabined? Oh! with what
earnestness
,
at such a moment, must the wholly conscious spirit
pray for life. How greedily will he drink the nauseous
draught in the hope to secure its boon. How fondly will
he seize upon every chimera, whether of his own or of
another's fancy, in order to gain a little respitein order
still to keep within the grasp of mind and sight, these
lovely agents of earth and its master, which, in our day
of strength and exultation, we do not value at one half
their worth! And how full of dread and horror must be
that first awful conviction which assures him that the
struggle is in vainthat the last remedy is triedthat
nothing is left him now but despairdespair and death!
Then it is that Christianity comes to his relief. If he
believes
,
he gains by his loss. Its godlike promise assures
him then, that the things which his desires make dear his
faith has rendered immortal.
The truth of many of these reflections made their way
into the mind of Margaret Cooper, as she pursued the
well-known path along the hills. She observed the objects
along her route more narrowly than ever. She was
taking that path for the last time. Her eyes would
behold
these objects no more. How often had she pursued
the same route with Alfred Stevens! But then she had
not seen these things; she had not observed these
thousand
graces and beauties of form and shadow which now
seemed to crowd around, challenging her regard and
demanding
her sympathies. Then she had seen nothing
but him. The bitterness which this reflection occasioned
made her hurry her footsteps; but there was an
involuntary
shudder that passed through her frame, when, in
noting the strange beauty of the path, she reflected that
it would be trodden by her for the last time. Her
breathing
became quickened by the reflection. She pressed
forward up the hills. The forests grew thick around
her, deep, dim, solemn and inviting. The skies above
looked down in little blessed blue tufts, through the
crowding
tree tops. The long vista of the woods led her
onward
in wandering thoughts.
To fix these thoughtsto keep them from wandering!
This was a difficulty. Margaret Cooper strove to do so,
but she could not. Never did her mind seem such a
perfect
chaosso full of confused and confusing objects and
images. Her whole life seemed to pass in review before
her. All her dreams of ambition, all the struggles of her
genius! Were these to be thrown away? Were these
all to be wasted? Was her song to be unheard? Was
her passionate and proud soul to have no voice? If death
is terrible to man, it is terrible, not as a pang, but as an
oblivion; and to the soul of genius, oblivion is a soul-death,
and its thought is a source of tenfold terror.
But of what avail were life to me now? Even should
I live, said the wretched woman, would it matter more
to the ambition which I have had, and to the soul which
flames and fevers within me? Who would hearken to
the song of the degraded? Who, that heard the story of
my shame, would listen to the strains of my genius? Say
that its utterance is even as proud as my own vanity of
heart would esteem itsay that no plaint like mine had
ever touched the ear or lifted the heart of humanity!
Alas! of what avail? The finger of scorn would be
uplifted
long before the voice of applause. The sneer and
sarcasm of the worldling would anticipate the favouring
judgment of the indulgent and the wise. Who would do
justice to my cause? Who listen? Alas! the voice of
genius would be of little avail speaking from the lips of
the dishonoured.
To the talent which I have, and the ambition which still
burns within me, life then can bring nothingno exercise
no fruition. Suppose then, that the talent is left to
slumberthe ambition stifled till it has no further
longings
!
Will life yield any thing to the mere creature of
societyto my youthto my beautyto my sense of
delight, if still there be any such sense left to me? Shall
I be less the creature of social scorn, because I have
yielded my ambitionbecause I have forborne the
employment
of those glorious gifts which heaven in its bounty
has allotted me? Alas! no! am I not a woman, one of
that frail, feeble sex, whose name is weakness?of whom,
having no strength, man yet expects the proofs of the
most unyieldingof a firmness which he himself cannot
exerciseof a power of self-denial and endurance of which
he exhibits no example. If I weep, he smiles at my
weakness
.
If I stifle my tears, he denounces my unnatural
hardihood. If I am cold and unyielding, I am masculine
and neglectedif I am gentle and pliant, my confidence
is abused and my person dishonoured. What can society,
which is thus exacting, accord to me, then, as a mere
woman? What shame will it not thrust upon me,a
womanand as I am?
Life then promises me nothing. The talent which I
have, lies with me idle and without hope of use. The
pure name of the woman is lost to me for ever. Shame
dogs my footsteps. Scorn points its finger. Life, and
all that it brings to otherslove, friends, fame, fortune
which are the soul of lifethese are lost to me for ever.
The moral death is here already. The mere act of dying,
is simply the end of a strife, and a breathing and an agony.
That is all!
The day became overcast. A cloud obscured the
sunlight
.
The blue tufts of sky no longer looked downwards
through the openings of the trees. The scene, dim and
silent before, became unusually dark. The aspect of
nature
seemed congenial with the meditated deed. She had
reasoned herself into its commission, and she reproached
herself mentally with her delay. Any self-suggestion of an
infirmity of purpose, with a nature such as hers, would
have produced precipitation. She turned down a slight
gorge among the hills where the forest was more close.
She knelt beneath a tree and laid down her pistols at its
foot. She kneltstrange contradiction!she knelt for
the purposes of prayer. But she could not pray. It would
seem that she attributed this effort to the sight of the
pistols
,
and she put them behind her without changing her
position. The prayer, if she made any, was internal;
and, at all events it did not seem to be satisfactory. Yet,
before it was ended, she started with an expression of
painful
thought upon her face. The voice of her reason had
ceased its utterance. The voice of her conscience,
perhaps
,
had been unheard; but there was yet another voice to
be heard which was more potent than all.
It was the mother's voice!
She placed her hand upon her side with a spasmodic
effort. The quickening of a new life within her, made that
new voice effectual. She threw herself on the ground and
wept freely. For the first time she wept freely. The
tears were those of the mother. The true fountain of tears
had been touched. That first throb of the innocent pledge
of guilty passion subdued the fiend. She could have taken
her own life, but dared not lift the deadly weapon against
that. The arm of the suicide was arrested. She groaned,
she wept, bitterly and freely. She was at once feebler and
more strong. Feebler as regarded her late resolution;
stronger as regarded the force of her affections, the sweet
humanities, not altogether subdued within her heart. The
slight pulsation of that infant in her womb had been more
effectual than the voice of reason, or conscience, or
feminine
dread. The maternal feeling is, perhaps, the most
imperious of all those which gather in the heart of woman.
Margaret Cooper, however, had not altogether resolved
against the deed. She only could not do it there and then.
Her wretched determination was not wholly surrendered,
but it was touched, impaired; and with the increasing
powers of reflection, the impetuosity of the will became
naturally lessened. Those few glimpses along the
roadside
which had made her sensible to the beauties she was
about to lose, had prepared her mind to act in
counteraction
of her impulse; and the event which had brought into
play the maternal instinct, naturally helped the cause of
reason in her soul. Still, with the erring pride of youth
she reproached herself with her infirmity of purpose. She
resolved to change her ground, as if the instinct which had
been awakened in one spot would not every where pursue
her. Time was gained, and in such cases, to gain time is
every thing. Perhaps no suicide would ever take place if
the individual would wait ten minutes. The soul takes its
colour from the cloud, and changes its moods as often. It
is one of the best lessons to the young, to wait! wait!
wait! One of the surest signs of strength is where the
individual
waits patiently and makes no complaint.
Margaret Cooper changed her ground. The spot was a
wild one. A broken ledge of rock was at her feet, and just
below it ran a dark, narrow winding footpath half-obscured
by the undergrowth. Here she once more proceeded to
nerve her mind for the commission of the deed, but she
had not been there an instant when she was surprised to
hear the sound of voices. This was unusual. Who could
they be? The villagers were not apt to stray from church
service whenever a preacher was to be found, and there
was a new one, and consequently a new attraction that
day for the spiritual hungry of Charlemont. The path
below was seldom trodden except by herself and an
occasional
sportsman. The idea that entered her mind was
that her purpose had been suspected and that she was
pursued
.
With this idea she placed the pistol to her breast.
She had already cocked the weapon. Her finger was on
the trigger. But the tones of another voice reached her
ears from below. They were those of a womansweet,
musical and tender. A new light broke in upon her mind.
This was the language of love. And who were these new
lovers in Charlemont? Could it be that the voice of the
male speaker was that of Stevens? Something in the tone
sounded like it. Involuntarily, with this impression, the
weapon was turned from her own bosom, and addressed in
the direction in which the persons below were approaching.
A sudden joyous feeling touched her soul. The thought
to destroy the criminal by whom she had been destroyed
was a source of exultation. She felt that she could do it.
Both pistols were in her hand. The pathway was not
more than twenty paces distant, and her nerves, for the
first time, braced to an unusual tension, trembled with the
new excitement in her soul.
The intruders continued to approach. Their voices
became
more distinct, and Margaret Cooper was soon
undeceived
as to one of them being that of Alfred Stevens. She
was compelled to lie close that she might not betray her
position and purpose. The male speaker was very
urgent
the
VOL. II. 5
voice seemed that of a stranger. That of the
female was not so clearly distinguishable, yet it seemed
more familiar to the unintentional listener. Something of
feminine curiosity now entered the bosom of Margaret
Cooper. Crouching where she was, she deposited the
pistols at her feet. She remained breathlessly, for the
slightest movement would have revealed her to the persons
who were now just below. They passed close beneath
the place of her concealment; and she soon discovered
that they were lovers, and what their language was, even
if she had not heard it, might have been conjectured. The
girl was a very pretty brunette of Charlemont, a sweet
retiring damsel of her own age named Rivers, whom she
knew only slightly. She was a shy, gentle,
unpresuming
girl, whom, for this reason, perhaps, Margaret had
learned to look upon without dislike or scorn. Her
companion
was a youth whom Margaret had known when a
lad, but who had been absent on the Mississippi for two
years. His tall and masculine, but well made and graceful
person, sufficiently accounted for, while it justified, the
taste of the maiden. He was a youth of fine, frank, manly
countenance. His garb was picturesque, that of a bold
border hunter, with hunting frock of yellow buckskin, and
Indian leggings. The girl looked up to him with an
expression
at once of eagerness and timidity. Confidence and
maiden bashfulness spoke equally in the delight which
glowed upon her features. The bright eyes and
sunburned
features of the youth, denoted a feeling of happy
triumph and assuring love. The relation of the two was
sufficiently evident from their looks, even had they no
other language. What were the emotions of Margaret
Cooper as she looked down upon this pair! At first she
thought, as will most personssurely there is nothing in
nature so lovely as the union of two fond devoted hearts.
The picture is one equally of moral and physical beauty.
The slight, fragile, depending damsel hanging in perfect
confidence on the arm of the manly, lofty and exulting
youthlooking up into his eyes in hope, while he returns
the gaze with pride and fondness. Unconscious of all
things but the love which to them is life and all things
beside
,
they move along the covered way and know not its
solitudethey linger and loiter along the protracted paths,
and see not their lengththey cling together through the
lengthened hours, and fancy they have lost no timethey
hear each other's voices, and believe that life is all music
and delight.
While Margaret Cooper looked down and heard the
pleadings and promises of the youth, and beheld the sweet
emotions of his companion, engaged in a pleasant struggle
between her hopes and misgivings, she scarcely restrained
herself from rising where she was and crying aloud, like
another Cassandra, not to be believed
Beware! Beware!
But the warning of Margaret Cooper would have been
unnecessary. The girl was not only free from danger, but
she was superior to it. She had the wholesome fear of
doing wrong too strongly impressed upon her by
education
she
had too little confidence in herselfwas too well
assured of her own weakness, to suffer herself, even for a
moment, to depart, either in thought or deed, from those
quiet but stern proprieties of conduct which are among the
best securities of the young. While she looked in her
lover's face with confidence, and held his arm with the
grasp of one who is sure of a right to do so, there was an
air of childish simplicity in her manner which was wholly
at variance with wild passions and improper fancies.
While the hunter maintained her on his arm and looked
down into her eyes with love, his glance was yet as
respectful
,
as unexpressive of presumption, as her own. Had the
eyes of all Charlemont been looking on, they would have
beheld nothing in the conduct of either which could have
incurred the censure of the most becoming delicacy.
Keen was the emotion and bitter was the thought which
worked in the mind of Margaret Cooper. She looked on
the deportment of that young maiden, whose intellect at
another day she would have despised, with envy and regret.
Truer thoughts and feelings came to her as she listened to
the innocent but fond dialogue between the unconscious
pair. The hunter was pursuing an erratic life of enterprise
and industry, then very common among the western youth.
He had been down upon the Mississippi seeking his
fortune
in such adventures as make border life in our country
something like the more civilized life of the middle ages.
He had returned after a long absence, to claim the bride
whose affections he had won long before he had departed.
Never had knight errant been more true to his mistress.
Her image had been his talisman as well against danger
from without, as against the demon within. It had never
left his mind, and he now returned for his reward. He
had returned to Charlemont just before the church service
had begun, and being unprepared to go thither, had found
no difficulty in persuading his sweetheart to give the hour
of morning service to himself. Mixed up with his
professions
of love was the story of his wanderings. Never
were adventures more interesting to any auditor. Never
was auditor more easily moved by the transitions of the
tale, from tears to smiles, and from smiles again to tears.
His risks and rewards; his defeats and successes; his wild
adventures by fell and flood,not perhaps so perilous as
those of Othello, but such as proved he had the soul to
encounter
the worst in Othello's experience, and maintain
himself as well,drew largely on the maiden's wonder and
delight; increased her tenderness and tremors, and made
her quite as devoted to her hero as ever was Desdemona
to her dusky chief. As they went from hearing below,
the manner in which the hunter concluded his narrative
provided a sufficient test for the faith of his companion.
And now, Selina, you see all the risks and the dangers.
There's work and perhaps trouble for you to go down with
me along the Choctaw borders. But if there's work, I am
the man to do my own share and help you out in yours;
and if there's trouble here's the breast to stand it first, and
here's the arm to drive it back, so that it'll never trouble
yours. No danger shall come to you, so long as I can
stand up between it and you. If so be that you love me
as you say, there's one way to show it, you'll soon make
up your mind to go with me. If you don't, why,
But you know I do love you, John murmured
the girl.
Don't I believe it? Well, if what you say means
what it should, you're ready. Here's my hand and all
that it's good for. It can work for you and fight for you,
Selina, and it's yours etarnally, with all that I have.
The hand of the girl was silently put into that of the
speaker. The tears were in her eyes; but if she made
any other answer it was unheard by Margaret Cooper.
The rustic pair moved from sight even as they spoke, and
the desolate woman once more remained alone!
CHAPTER VI.
Margaret Cooper
was at length permitted to emerge
from the place of her concealment. The voice of the
lovers were lost, as well as their forms, in the wooded
distance. Dreaming, like children as they were, of life
and happiness, they had wandered off, too happy to fancy
for a moment that the world contained, in its wide vast
bosom, one creature half so wretched as she who hung
above them, brooding, like some wild bird of the cliff, over
the storm which had robbed her of her richest plumage.
She sank back into the woods. She no longer had the
heart to commit the meditated crime. This purpose had
left her mind. It had given place to another, however,
scarcely less criminal. We have seen her, under the first
impression that the stranger whose voice she heard was
Alfred Stevens, turning the muzzle of the pistol from her
breast to the path on which he was approaching. Though
she discovered her error and laid the weapon down, the
sudden suggestion of her mind, at that moment, gave a
new direction to her mood. Why should she not seek to
avenge her wrong? Was he to escape without penalty?
Was she to be a quiescent victim? True she was a
woman
,
destined it would seem to suffer, perhaps, with a
more than ordinary share of that suffering which falls to
her sex. But she had also a peculiar strengththe strength
of a man in some respects; and in her bosom she now
felt the sudden glow of one of his fiercest passions.
Revenge
might be in her power. She might redress her
wrong by her own hand. It was a weapon of death which
she grasped. In her grasp it might be made a weapon of
power. The suggestion seemed to be that of justice only.
It was one that filled her whole soul with a triumphant and
a wild enthusiasm.
I shall not be stricken down without danger to mine
enemy. For
this,
this, at least, strength was allotted me.
Let him tremble. In his place of seeming security let
him tremble. I shall pursue his steps. I will find him
5*
out. There shall be a day of retribution! Alfred Stevens,
there is a power within me, which tells me you are no
longer safe!
And why may I not secure this justicethis
vengeance
?
Why? Because I am a woman. Ha! We shall
see. If I am a woman, I can be an enemyand such an
enemy! An enemy not to be appeased, not to be
overcome
.
War always with my foewar to the knifewar
to the last!
Such a nature as that of Margaret Cooper needed some
such object to give it the passionate employment without
which it must recoil upon itself and end either in suicide
or madness. She brooded upon this new thought. She
found in it a grateful exercise. From the moment when
she conceived the idea of being the avenger of her own
wrong, her spirit became more elasticshe became less
sensible to the possible opinions upon her condition which
might be entertained by others. She found consolation,
in retreating to this one thought, from all the rest. Of the
difficulties in the way of her design, it was not in her
impetuous
character to think. She never once suspected that
the name of Alfred Stevens had been an assumed one. She
never once asked how she was to pursue and hunt him up.
She thought of a male disguise for herself, it is true, but
of the means and modes of travelin what direction to go,
and after what plan to conduct her pursuit, she had not the
most distant idea.
She addressed herself to her new design, however, in
one respect, with amazing perseverance. It diverted her
from other and more oppressive thoughts. Her pistols
she carried secretly to a very distant wood, where she
concealed them in the hollow of a tree. To this wood she
repaired secretly and daily. Here she selected a tree as
a mark. A small section of the bark, which she tore
away, at a given height, she learned to regard as the breast
of her seducer. This was the object of her aim.
Without
any woman fears she began her practice and continued
it, day by day, until, as we are told by one of the
chroniclers
of her melancholy story, she could place a ball
with an accuracy, which, were it universally equalled by
modern duellists, would render duelling much more fatal
than it commonly is. In secret she procured gunpowder
and lead, by arts so ingenious as to baffle detection. At
midnight when her mother slept she moulded her bullets.
Well might the thoughts and feelings which possessed her
mind, while engaged in this gloomy labour, have endowed
every bullet with a wizard spell to make it do its bidding
truly. Bitter, indeed, were the hours so appropriated;
but they had their consolations. Dark and terrible were
the excited moods in which she retired from her toils to
that slumber which she could not always secure. And
when it did come, what were its images! The tree, the
mark, the weapon, the deep, dim forest, all the scenes and
trials of the day, were renewed in her sleep. A gloomy
wood filled her eyesa victim dabbled in blood lay before
her; and, more than once, her own fearful cry of
vengeance
and exultation awakened her from those dreams of
sleep, which strengthened her in the terrible pursuit of the
object which occasioned them.
Such thoughts and practices, continued with religious
pertinacity, from day to day, necessarily had its effect
upon her appearance as well as her character. Her beauty
assumed a wilder aspect. Her eye shot forth a
supernatural
fire. She never smiled. Her mouth was rigid and
compressed as if her heart was busy in an endless conflict.
Her gloom, thus nurtured by solitude and the continual
presence of a brooding imagination of revenge, darkened
into something like ferocity. Her utterance became brief
and quickher tones sharp, sudden, and piercing. She
had but one thought which never seemed to desert her,
yet of this thought no ear ever had cognizance. It was
of the time when she should exercise the skill which she
had now acquired upon that destroyer of herself, whom
she now felt herself destined to destroy. Of course we
are describing a madnessone of those peculiar forms of
the disease which seems to have its origin in natural and
justifiable suggestions of reason. Not the less a madness
for all that. Succeeding in her practice at one distance,
Margaret Cooper changed it. From one point to another
she constantly varied her practice, until her aim grew
certain
at almost any distance within the ordinary influence
of the weapon. To strike her mark at thirty paces,
became
,
in a little while, quite as easy as to do so at five;
and, secure now of her weapon, her next objectthough
there was no cessation of her practicewas how to seek
and where to find the victim.
In this new object she meditated to disguise herself in
the apparel of a man. She actually commenced the
making
up of the several garments of one. This was also the
secret labour of the midnight hour, when her feeble-minded
mother slept. She began to feel some of the difficulties
lying in the way of this pursuit, and her mind grew
troubled
to consider them, without, however, relaxing in its
determination. That seemed a settled matter. While
she brooded over this new feature of her purposeas if
fortunately to arrest the mad designher mother fell
seriously
sick, and was for some time in danger. The duty of
attending upon her, put a temporary stop to her thoughts
and exercises; though without having the effect of
expelling
them from her mind. But another event, upon her
mother's recovery, tended to produce a considerable
alteration
in her thoughts. A new care filled her heart and
rendered her a different being, in several respects. She
was soon to become a mother. The sickness of soul
which oppressed her under this conviction, gave a new
direction to her mood without lessening its bitterness; and,
in proportion as she found her vengeance delayed, so was
the gratification which it promised, a heightened desire in
her mind.
For the humiliating and trying event which was at hand,
Margaret Cooper prepared with a degree of silent firmness
which denoted quite as strongly the resignation of despair
as any other feeling. The child is born. Margaret Cooper
has at length become a mother. She has suffered the
agony, without being able to feel the compensating pride
and pleasure of one. It was the witness of her shame
could she receive it with any assurances of love? It is
doubtful if she did. For some time after its birth, the
hapless woman seemed to be unconscious, or half-conscious
only, of her charge. A stupor weighed upon her senses.
When she did awaken, and her eyes fell upon the face and
form of the infant with looks of recognition, one long, long
piercing shriek burst from her lips. She closed her eyes
she turned away from the little unoffending, yet
offensive
object with a feeling of horror. Its features were
those of Alfred Stevens. The likeness was indelible; and
this identity drew upon the child a share of that loathing
hatred with which she now remembered the guilty father.
It may very well be supposed that the innocent babe
suffered under these circumstances. The milk which it
drew from the mother's breast, was the milk of bitterness,
and it did not thrive. It imbibed gall instead of nutriment.
Day after day it pined in hopeless misery; and though
the wretched mother strove to supply its wants and soothe
its little sorrows, with a gradually increasing interest which
overcame her first loathing, there was yet that want of
sweetest sympathy which nothing merely physical could
well supply. Debility was succeeded by diseasefever
preyed upon its little frame, which was now reduced to a
skeleton. One short month only had elapsed from its
birth, and it lay, in the silence of exhaustion upon the arm
of its mother. Its eyes, from whence the flickering light
was escaping fast, looked up into hers, as she fancied,
with an expression of reproach. She felt, on the instant,
the pang of the maternal conscience. She forgot the
unworthy
father, as she thought of the neglectful mother.
She bent down, and, for the first time, imprinted on its
little lips the maternal kiss. A smile seemed to glimmer
on its tiny features; and, from that moment, Margaret
Cooper resolved to forget her injuries, for the time at least,
in the consideration of her proper duties. But her
resolution
came too late. Even while her breast was within
its boneless gums, a change came over the innocent. She
did not heed it. Her eyes and thoughts were elsewhere;
and thus she mused, gazing vacantly upon the wall of her
chamber until her mother entered the room. Mrs. Cooper
gave but a single glance at the infant when she saw that
its little cares were over.
Oh, Margaret! she exclaimed, the child is dead.
The mother looked down with a start and shudder. A
big tear fell from her eyes upon the cold cheek of the
innocent. She released it to her mother, turned her
face upon the couch, and uttered her thanks to Heaven
that had so decreed itthat had left her again free for
that darker purpose which had so long filled her mind.
Better so, she murmured to her mother. It is at
peace. It will neither know its own nor its mother's griefs.
It is free from that shame for which I must live!
But there are other things to live for besides shame,
Margaret, said the mother.
There are! said Margaret solemnly. There are!
Were there not I should, indeed, be desperate!
When all the cares of the burial were over, and the
crowd gone, and the cottage of the widow Cooper was
once more abandoned to the cheerlessness and wo within,
Margaret Cooper spoke to her mother in the language of
that will which the latter had not often found courage to
resist.
Let us leave this place, mother. I cannot, I will not
live here any longer.
Why, where would you go?
Back to that old farm of which you speak so much,
and from which, in evil hour, you brought me. It was
my childhood's homewould it could receive me as a
child again. At all events let us leave this place. Here,
every thing offends meevery face, every spot. The
eyes of people mock me with their looks of pity, or it
may be of scorn. Let us go. We cannot depart too
soon.
But, Margaret
Mother, if I stay here I madden!
The entreaties of the unhappy girl prevailed. The
mother
had not often prevailed in their controversies. The
strong naturally swayed the feebler will. A few days
were devoted to necessary arrangements, and then they
left Charlemont for ever.
She retired, says the rude chronicle from which
many of our facts have been borrowed, to a romantic
little farm in, there to spend, in seclusion, with
her aged mother, and a few servants, the remainder of her
days.
With their departure, we also take leave of Charlemont.
We shall meet some of its people hereafter, but our scene,
henceforward will lie in another region, to which our
readers
are implored to follow us.
CHAPTER VII.
Time
does not move the less rapidly because his
progress
is so insensible. The reader will suppose, that,
from the close of the last chapter to the opening of this, a
period of five years has elapsed. There is not only a
change in time but in place. We have abandoned
Charlemont
for ever; and so, at a subsequent period, have all
the well known villagers. Our scene opens at a very
beautiful town, surrounded by a cluster of steep hills, on
the banks of the Kentucky river. The city of Fis a
capitalbeautifully built, laid out in rectangular sections,
and presenting altogether a view at once pleasing and
surprising from any of the numerous eminences which
wall it in. A city of considerable opulence, and tolerably
large population, it is abundantly distinguished by talent,
of which the Union has been presented with numerous
proofs, at this and subsequent periods. Upon the
resources
of the city, however, it is not our purpose to
dwell. We confine ourselves to some few among its
members. Let us introduce them.
The reader will suppose himself within one of those
dark, dusty tabernacles, which, in silent, narrow streets,
and parts of a city secluded from the more uproarious
clamours of trade, have been usually assigned to the
professors
of the law. Like the huge spiders to which they
have been likened, these gentlemen have always exhibited
a decided preference to the dim and dusty corners. A
neat, well-painted suite of rooms, among these, rightly
incurs
the imputation of professional dandyism; and is an
error of taste and judgment into which none of the adepts
of the profession will readily fall. That to which we now
repair, is evidently one belonging to a veteran. If ever
dust and dismals could sanctify one spot more than
another
,
in the eye of a grave and thoughtful lawyer, this
was the one. It consisted of two small snug chambers,
dimly lighted by a single window in each, the panes of
which were not often subjected to the influence of soap
and water. Shelves of cumbrous books, of that uniform
complexion which distinguishes a lawyer's office, added to
the dusky gravity of the apartments. A huge table
occupied
the centre of one of the rooms, which also bore its
burden of volumes. Rigid cases of painted pine occupied
the niches on each side of the chimney, divided into
numerous
sections, each filled with its portly bundles of
closely written papers;
Strange words, scrawled with a barbarous pen.
In short, all the proofs were there of a law office, the
proprietor
of which was in very active and successful
practice
.
But the gravity which distinguished the solemn
fixtures, and the silent volumes, did not extend to the
human inmates of this dim lodging house of law. Two
of these sat by the table in the centre of the room. Their
feet were upon it at opposite quarters, while their chairs
were thrown back and balanced upon their hind legs, at
such an angle as gave most freedom and ease of position
to the person. Something of merriment had inspired them,
for the room was full of cachination from their rival voices,
long before our entrance. Of the topics of which they
spoke, the reader must form his own conjectures. They
may have a significance hereafter, of which we have no
present intimation. It may be well to state, however,
that it is our present impression that we have been
introduced
to both of these persons on some previous
occasion
.
We certainly remember that tall, slender form, that
sly, smiling visage, and those huge bushy whiskers.
That chuckling laugh enters into our ears like a well
remembered
sound; and, for the companion of him from
whom it proceeds, we cannot mistake. Every word
and look is familiar. It is five years gone, indeed, but
the impression was too strongly impressed to be so easily
obliterated. Our companions were still merry. The
conversation
was still disjointedjust enough being said to
renew the laughter of both parties. As, for example:
Such an initiation! said one.
Ha! ha! ha! roared the other, at the bare
suggestion
.
And did you mark the uses made of old Darby,
Warham?
No: I missed him before eleven. Did he not escape?
Where was he?
Quiet as a mouse, unconscious as a pillow, under the
feet of Barnabas. Barnabas used him as a sort of
foot-stool
.
First one foot, then another, came down upon his
breast; and you know the measure of Barnabas' legs.
Ha! ha! ha!
Ha! ha! ha!
Hundred pounds each, by Jupiter. Whenever they
came down you could hear the squelch. Poor Darby did
not seem to breathe at any other time, and the air was
driven out of him with a gush. Ha! ha! ha! It was
decidedly the demdest fine initiation I ever saw at the
club.
But Beauchampe!
Ah! that was a dangerous experiment. He can't
stand the stuff.
No, Ben, and that's not all. It will not do to put it in
him, or there will be no standing him. What passions!
Egad, I trembled every moment lest he should draw knife
upon the Pope. He's more a madman when drunk than
any man I ever saw.
He's no gain to the club. He has no idea of joking.
He's too serious.
Yet what a joke it was, when he took the Pope by
his nose, in order to show how a cork could be pulled
without either handkerchief or corkscrew.
Ha! ha! ha! I thought he'd have wrung it off.
That was the Pope's fear also: but he was too much
afraid of provoking the madman to do worse, to make the
slightest complaint, and he smiled too, with a desperate
effort, while the water was trickling from his eyes.
Ha! ha! ha! and the chuckling was renewed, until
the sound of footsteps in the front room induced their
return to sobriety.
Who's there? demanded one of the merry
companions
.
Me!the Pope, answered the voice of the intruder.
Ha! ha! ha! was the simultaneous effusion of the
two, concluded, however, with an invitation to the other
to come in.
Come in, Pope, come in.
VOL. II. 6
A short, squab, but active little man, whose eyes
snapped
continually, and whose proboscis was of that
truculent
complexion and shape which invariably impresses
you with the idea of an experienced bottle-holder, at once
made his appearance.
Ha! ha! ha! Your reverence, how does your
dignity
feel this morningyour nose, I mean?
Don't talk of it, Warham, I was never so insulted in
all my life.
Insulted! How? By what?
By what! why that dd fellow pulling my nose.
Indeed, why that was universally esteemed a
compliment
,
and it was supposed by every one to give you
pleasure
,
for you smiled upon him in the most gracious
manner
,
while he was most stoutly tugging at it.
So I did, by the ghost of Naso, but reason good was
there why I should? The fellow was madstark mad.
Oh, I don't think he would have done any harm.
Indeed, eh! don't you. By the powers, and if you
have your doubts on that point, get your nasal eminence
betwixt his thumb and finger, as mine was, and you will
be ready enough to change your notion, before the next
sitting of the Symposia. Dn it, I have no feeling in the
region. It's as perfectly dead to me ever since, as if it
were frozen.
It certainly does wear a very livid appearance, eh,
Ben? remarked the other, gravely.
Do you think so, responded the visiter, with some
signs of disquiet.
Indeed, I think so. Will you pass Dr. Filbert's this
morningif so, take his opinion.
I will make it a point to do so. I will.
It's prudent only. I have heard of several disastrous
cases of the loss of the nose. Perhaps there is no feature
which is so obnoxious to injury. The most fatal
symptom
is an obtuseness,a sort of numbnessa deficiency
of sensibility.
My very symptom.
Amputation has been frequently resorted to, but not
always in season to prevent the spread of mortification.
The devil, you say,amputation!
Yes,but this is a small matter.
What! to lose one's noseand such a nose!
Yes, a small matter. Such is the progress of art that
noses of any dimensions are supplied to answer all
purposes
.
Is this true, Warham? But dang it, even if it were
there's no compensating a man for the loss of his own.
No nose could be made to answer my purposes half so
well as the one I was born with.
But you do not suppose that you were born with that
nose.
Why not?
You were born of the flesh. But that nose is
decidedly
more full of the spirit.
That's an imputation. But I can tell you that a man's
nose may become very red, yet he be very temperate.
Granted. But temperance, according to the Club,
implies any thing but abstinence. Besides, you were
made perpetual Pope only while your nose lasted, and
colour, size, and the irregular prominences by which
yours is so thickly studded, were the causes of your
selection
.
The loss of your nose itself would not be your
only loss. You would be required to abdicate.
But you are not serious, Warham, about the
susceptibility
of the nose to injury.
Ask Ben!
It's a dem'd dangerous symptom, you have, your
reverence.
Coldnessat once a sign of inferior capacity, for it is
the distinguishing trait of cat and dog.
And the dem'd numbness.
Ay, the want of sensibility is a bad sign. Besides, I
think the Pope's nose has lost nearly all its colour.
Except a dark crimson about the roots.
And the bridge is still passable.
Yes, but how long. That has grown pale also.
To a degree, only, Ben: I don't think it much faded.
Perhaps not; and now I look again, it does seem to
me that one of the smaller carbuncles on the main
prominence
keeps up appearances.
Look you, lads, dn it, you're quizzing me! was the
sudden interruption of the person whose nose furnished
the subject of discussion, but his face wore a very
bewildered
expression, and he evidently only had a latent
idea of the waggery of which he was the victim.
Quizzing! exclaimed one of the companions.
Quizzing! echoed the other. Never was more
dem'd serious in all my life! and he stroked his black,
bushy whiskers in a very conclusive manner. The visiter
applied his fingers to the nasal prominence which had
become
so fruitful a source of discussion, and passed them
over its various outline with the tenderness of a man who
handles a subject of great intrinsic delicacy.
It feels pretty much as ever! said he, drawing a long
breath.
Ay, to
your
fingers. But what is its own feeling?
Try now and snuff the air.
The ambigious member was put into instant exercise,
and such a snuffing and snorting as followed, utterly
drowned the sly chuckling in which the jeering
companions
occasionally indulged. They played the game,
however, with marvellous command of visage.
I can snuffI can draw in, and drive out the air!
exclaimed the Pope, with the look of a man somewhat
better satisfied.
Ay, but do you feel it cutis it sharpdoes the air
seem to scrape against and burn, as it were, the nice,
delicate nerves of that region.
I can't say that it does.
Ah! that's bad. Look you, Ben. There's a paper
of snuff, yellow snuff, on the mantelpiece in t'other room.
Bring it,let the Pope try that.
The other disappeared, and returned, bringing with him
one of those paper rolls which usually contain Sanford's
preparation of bark. Nor did the appearance belie the
contents. The yellow powder was bark.
Now, Pope, try that! The test is infallible, that is
the strongest Scotch snuff, and if that don't succeed in
titillating your nostrils, run to Filbert with all possible
despatch. He may have to operate!
The Pope's hand was seen to tremble, as a portion of
the powder described as so very potent, was poured into
it by the confederate. He put it to his nose, and, in his
haste and anxiety, fairly buried his suspected member in
the powder. His cheeks shared freely in the bounty, and
his mouth formed a better idea of the qualities of the
snuff, than ever could his proboscis. The application
over, the patient prepared himself to sneeze, by clapping
one hand upon the pit of his stomach, opening his mouth,
and carefully thrusting his head forward and his nose
upward
.
Oh! you're trying to sneeze! said one of the two.
You shouldn't force the matter.
No, I don't. But is the snuff so very strong?
The demdest strongest Scotch that I ever nosed yet.
I can't sneeze! said the Pope, in accents of
consternation
.
His companions shook their heads dolefully. He looked
from one to the other as if not knowing what to do.
A serious matter, said one.
Dem'd serious! There's no telling, Warham, what
sort of a looking person the Pope would be without his
nose.
Difficult, indeed, to imagine. A valley for a
mountain
!
It's as if we went to bed to-night with the town
at the foot of the hills, and rose to-morrow to find it on
the top of them. There's nothing more important to a
man's face than his nose. Appearances absolutely
demand
it. The uses of a nose, indeed, are really less
important
than its presence.
I can't agree with you there, Warham;a sneeze
Is a joy, Ben,a luxury; but a nose is necessity.
What show could a man make without a nose?
Rather what a show he would make of himself. A
monstrous show!
You're right. Besides, the Pope's loss would be
greater than that of most ordinary men.
Much, much! Let us take the dimensions, Pope.
Three inches from base to apexfrom root to the same
point
Four at leastthe dromedary's hump alone calls for
two.
And in the spirit of unmeasured fun, the person who is
called Ben by his companion, arming himself with a string,
was actually about to subject the proboscis of the Pope to
rule and line, when the eyes of the latter, which had really
exhibited some consternation before, were suddenly
illuminated
.
He caught up the paper of supposed snuff which
Ben had incautiously laid down upon the table and read
the label upon it.
Ah! villains! he exclaimed, at your old tricks. I
6*
should have known it. But I'll pay you, and starting up
he proceeded to fling the yellow powder over the
merry-makers
.
This lead to a general scramble, over chairs and
tables from one room to another. The office rang with
shouts and laughterthe cries of confusion and exultation,
and the tumbling of furniture. The atmosphere was filled
with the floating particles of the medicine, and while the
commotion was at its height, the party were joined
unexpectedly
by a fourth person who suddenly made his
appearance from the street.
Ha, Beauchampe! that you; you are come in time.
Grapple the Pope there from behind, or he will suffocate
us with Jesuit's bark.
And a proper fate for such Jesuits as ye are,
exclaimed
the Pope, who, however, ceased the horse-play the
moment that the name of the new-comer was mentioned.
He turned round and confronted him as he spoke with a
countenance in which dislike and apprehension were
singularly mingled and very clearly expressed.
Mr. Lowe, I am very glad to see you here, said
Beauchampe respectfully but modestly,it saves me the
necessity of calling upon you.
Calling upon me, sir? For what?
To apologize for my rudeness to you last night. I was
not conscious of it; but some friends this morning tell
me that I was rude.
That you were, sir! You pulled my nose! You
did!
I am sorry for it.
No man's nose should be pulled, Mr. Beauchampe,
without an object. If you had pulled my nose with
an intention, it might have been excused; but to pull it
without design is, it appears to me, decidedly inexcusable.
Decidedly, decidedly! was the united exclamation of
the two friends.
I am very sorry, indeed, Mr. Lowe,it was, sir, a
very unwarrantable liberty, if I did such a thing, and I know
not how to excuse it.
It is not to be excused, said the Pope, or Lowe,
which was his proper name; whose indignation seemed to
increase in due proportion with the meekness and humility
of the young man. A nose, he continued, a nose is
a thing perhaps quite as sacred as any other in a man's
possession.
Quite! said the jesters with one breath.
No man, as I have said before, should pull the nose of
another, unless he had some distinct purpose in view.
Now, sir, had you any such purpose?
Not that I can now recollect.
Let me assist you, Beauchampe. You had a purpose.
You declared it at the time. The purpose was even a
benevolent one; nay, something more than benevolent.
The corkscrew had been mislaid, and you undertook to
show to the Poperemember, the presiding officer of the
societythat a cork might be drawn without any other
instrument than the ordinary thumb and forefinger of a free
white man. You illustrated the principle on the Pope's
proboscis, and so effectually, that every body was
convinced
,
not only that the cork might be drawn in this way
from every bottle, but that the same mode would be equally
effectual in drawing any nose from any face. If this was
not a purpose, and a laudable one, then I am no judge of
the matter.
But, Sharpe, my dear fellow, said Lowe, you
overlook
the fact that Beauchampe has already admitted that he
had no purpose.
Beauchampe is no witness in his own case, nor is it
asked whether he has a purpose now, but whether he had
one when the deed was done.
It was a drunken purpose then, colonel, said
Beauchampe
gravely.
Drunk or sober, it matters not, said the otherit
was not less a purpose, and I say a good one. The act
was one
pro bono publico;
and I moreover contend that
you did not pull the nose of our friend except in his
official
capacity. You pulled the nose, not of Daniel Lowe,
Esq., but of the Supreme Pontiff of our microcosm; and
I really think that the Pope does wrong to remember the
event in his condition as a mere man. I am not sure that
he does not violate that rule, 17th section, 7th clause, of
the `ordinance, for the better preservation of the
individuality
of the fraternals,' which provides that `all persons,
members who shall betray the discoveries, new truths, and
modern inventions, the progress of discovery and
proselytism
;
the processes deemed essential to be employed;
&c.'you all remember the section, clause and penalty.
Pshaw, how can you make out that I violate the clause.
What have I betrayed that should be secret?
The new mode of extracting a cork from a bottle
which our new member, Beauchampe, displayed last
evening to the great edification of every fraternal present.
But it was no cork!My nose
Symbolically, it was a cork, and your nose had no
right to any resentments. But come, let us take the back
room again and resume our seats, when we can discuss the
matter more at leisure.
The motion was seconded and the dusty particles of
Jesuit's bark having subsided from the atmosphere of the
adjoining room, the parties drew chairs around the table
as before with a great appearance of comparative
satisfaction
.
CHAPTER VIII.
The
name of Beauchampe, of which our readers have
heard nothing until this period, though it confers its name
on our story, renders it necessary that we should devote a
few moments in particular to him by whom it is borne.
He was a young man, not more than twenty-one, tall and
of very handsome person. His eye was bright and his
whole face full of intelligence. His manners and features
equally denoted the modesty and the ingenuousness of
youth. There was a gentleness in his deportment,
however
,
which, though natural enough to his nature when in
repose, was not its characteristic at other periods. He was
of excitable constitution, passionate and full of enthusiasm;
and when aroused, not possessed of any powers of
self-government
or restraint. At present, and sitting with the
rest about the table, his features were not only subdued and
quiet, but they wore an air of profound humility and
self-dissatisfaction
which was sufficiently evident to all.
Our new member, said one of the party, does not
seem to have altogether got over the pains of initiation.
Eh, Beauchampe! How is it? Does the head ache still.
Are the nerves still disordered?
No, colonel, but I feel inexpressibly mean and
sheepish
.
I am very sorry you persuaded me to join your
club.
Persuade! It was not possible to avoid it. Every new
graduate at the bar, to be recognised, must go through the
initiate. Your regrets and repentance are treasonable.
I feel them nevertheless. I must have been a savage
and a beast if what I am told be true. I never was drunk
before in my life, and club or no club, if I can help it,
never will be drunk again. Indeed, I cannot even now
understand it. I drank no great deal of wine.
No, indeed, precious littleno more than would dash
the brandy. You may thank Ben there for his adroitness
in mingling the liquors.
I
do
thank him! said the youth with increased
gravity
,
and a glance which effectually contradicted his words,
addressed to the offender. That worthy did not seem
much annoyed however.
It was the demdest funny initiation I did ever see!
Ha! ha! ha! I say, Pope, how is your reverence's
nose?
Let my nose alone, you grinning, big-whiskered, little
creature.
Noses are sacred, said Sharpe.
To be pulled only with a purpose, Warham.
Symbolically, pursued the first.
By way of showing how corks are to be drawn.
Oh! dn you for a pair of blue devils; exclaimed
Lowe, starting to his feet and shaking his fist at the
offenders.
What are you off, Pope? demanded Sharpe.
Yes, I am. There's no satisfaction in staying with
you.
Call at Filbert's on your way, be sure.
For what, I want to know?
Why, for his professional opinion. The worst sign
you know is that numbness
Coldness.
Insensibility to Scotch snuff.
And remember, though your nose was pulled officially,
may yet be personally injured. The official pulling
simply acquits the offender; the liability of the nose is
not lessened by the legalization of the act of pulling.
The devil take you for a pair of puppies, cried the
victim with a queer expression of joint fun and vexation
on his face. Of course, Mr. Beauchampe, he said,
turning to the young man; of course I don't believe
what these dogs say about my nose having suffered any
vital injury; but I must tell you, sir, that you hurt me very
much last night; and I feel the pain this morning.
I am truly sorry, Mr. Lowe, for what I have done.
Truly, sincerely sorry. I assure you, sir, that your pain
of body is nothing to that which I suffer in mind from
having exposed myself as I fear I did.
You did expose yourself and me too, sir. I trust you
will never do so again. I advise you, sir, never do so
again,not unless you have a serious and sufficient
motive. Don't let these fellows gull you with the idea that
it was any justification for such an act that corks might be
drawn from bottles in such a manner. Corks are not
noses. Nobody can reasonably confound them. The
shape, colour, every thing is different. There is nothing
in the
feel
of the two to make one fancy a likeness. You
are young, sir, and liable to be abused. Take the advice
of an older man. Look into this matter for yourself, and
you will agree with me not only that there is no likeness
between a nose and a cork, but that, even admitting that your
plan of drawing a cork from a bottle by the thumb and
forefinger is a good one, it would be impossible to teach
the process by exercising them upon a nose in the same
manner. These young men are making fun of you, Mr.
Beauchampe;they are, believe me!
Ha! ha! ha! roared the offenders. Very good,
your reverence.
He! he! he! you puppies. Do you think I mind
your cackling! and shaking his fist at the company, Mr.
Lowe took his departure, involuntarily stroking with
increased
affection the nasal eminence which had furnished
occasion for so much misplaced merriment.
Well, Beauchampe, said one of the companions,
you still seem grave about this business, but you should
not. If even a man may forget himself and be mad for a
night, after the fashion of old Anacreon, it is surely the
night of that day when he is admitted to the temple
when he takes his degree, and passes into the brotherhood
of the bar.
Nay, on such a day least of all.
Pshaw, you were never born for a Puritan. Old
Thurston, your parson teacher, has perverted you from
your better nature. You are a fellow for fun and flash,
high frolic, and the complete abandonment of blood. You
look at this matter too seriously. Do I not tell youI
that have led you through all the thorny paths of legal
knowledgedo I not tell you that your offence is venial.
`A good sherris-sack hath a twofold operation in it.'
Beauchampe found it fourfold, said the
bush-whiskered
gentlemanthat is, fourth proof; and he showed
proofs enough of it. By Gad! never did a man play such
pleasant deviltries with his neighbour's members. The
nose-pulling was only a small part of his operations. It
was certainly a most lovely initiation.
At least it's all over, Mr. Coalter; and as matters have
turned out, nothing more need be said on the subject; but
were it otherwise, I assure you that your practice upon my
wine would be a dangerous experiment for you. I speak
to you by way of warning, and not with the view to
quarrel. I presume you meant nothing more than a
jest?
Dem the bit more, said the other, half dissatisfied
with himself at the concession, yet more than half
convinced
of the propriety of making it. Dem the bit more.
Sharpe will tell you that it's a trick of the gamea
customary
trickmust be done by somebody, and was done by
me, only because I like to see a demmed fine initiation
such as yours was, my boy. But, good morning,
Beauchampe
good
morning, SharpeI see you have business
to dosome dd political business, I suppose; and so
I leave you. I'm no politician, but I see that Judge
Tompkins
is in the field against your friend Desha. Eh! don't
you think I can guess the rest, Warhameh?
Sagacious fellow! said Sharpe as the other
disappeared
;
and, in this particular, not far from the mark.
Tompkins is in the field against Desha, and will run him a
tight race. I too must go into the field, Beauchampe. The
party requires it, and though I have some reasons not to
wish it just at this time, yet the matter is scarcely
avoidable
.
I shall want every assistance, and I shall expect
you to take the stump for me.
Whatever I can do I will.
You can do much. You do not know your own
abilities
on the stump. You will do famous things yet; and
this is the time to try yourself. The success of a man in
our country depends on the first figure. You are just
admitted; something is expected of you. There can be
no better opportunity to begin.
I am ready and willing.
Scarcely,
mon ami
. You are going to Simpson. You
will get with sisters and mamma, and waste the daylight.
Believe me this is no time to play at mammets. We want
every man. We will need them all.
You shall find me ready. I shall not stay long at
Simpson. But do not think that I will commit myself for
Desha. I prefer Tompkins.
Well, but you will do nothing on that subject. You
do not mean to come out for Tompkins?
No! I only tell you I will do nothing on the subject
of the gubernatorial canvass. You are for the assembly. I
will turn out in your behalf. But who is your opponent?
One CalvertWilliam Calvert. Said to be a smart
fellow. I never saw him but he is spoken of as no mean
person. He writes well. His letter to the people of
lies on the desk there. Put it in your pocket and read it
at your leisure. It is well donequite artfulbut rather
prosing and puritanical.
Beauchampe took up the pamphlet, passed his eyes over
the page, and placed it without remark in his pocket.
Barnabas, continued Sharpe, who has seen this
fellow Calvert, says he's not to be despised. He's a mere
country lawyer, however, who is not known out of his
own precinct. In taking the field now, he makes a
miscalculation
.
I shall beat him very decidedly. But he has
friends at work, who are able, and mine must not sleep.
Do I understand you as promising to take the field against
him?
If he is so clever, he will need a stronger opponent.
Why not do it yourself?
Surely, I will. I long for nothing better. But I
cannot
be every where, and he and his friends are every where
busy. I will seek him in his stronghold, and grapple
with him tooth and nail; but there will be auxiliary
combatants
,
and you must be ready to take up the cudgel at
the same time with some other antagonist. When do you
leave town?
To-daywithin the hour.
So soon! Why I looked to have you to dinner. Mrs.
Sharpe expects you.
I am sorry to deprive myself of the pleasure of doing
justice to her good things; but I wrote my sisters and they
will expect me.
Pshaw! what of that! The disappointment of a day
only. You will be the more welcome from the delay.
They will apprehend some misfortuneperhaps, my
rejection,and I would spare them the mortification if not
the fear. You must make my compliments and excuse to
Mrs. S.
You
will
be a boy, Beauchampe. Let the girls wait a
day, and dine with me. You will meet some good fellows,
and get a glimpse into the field of war,see how we open
the campaign, and so forth.
Temptations, surely, not to be despised; but I confess
to my boyhood in one respect, and will prove my manhood
in another. I am able to resist your temptationsso much
for my manhood. My boyhood makes me keep word
with my sisters, and the shame be on my head.
Shame, indeed; but where shall we meet?
At Bowling Greenwhen you please.
Enough then on that head. I will write you when
you are wanted. I confess to a strong desire, apart from
my own interests, to see you on the stump; and if I can
arrange it so, I will have you break ground against
Calvert
.
But that is not so easy. What is there against him?
You will find out from his pamphlet. Nothing more
easy. He is obscure, that is certain. Little known among
the people. Why? For a good reasonhe is a haughty
aristocrata man who only knows them when he wants
their votes!
Is that the case?
Simple fellow! we must make it appear so. It may
be or not,what matter? That he is shy, and reserved,
and unknown, is certain. It's just as likely he is so,
because
of his pride, as any thing else. Perhaps he's a
fellow
VOL. II. 7
of delicate feelings! This is better for us, if you can
make it appear so. People don't like fellows of very
delicate
feelings. That alone would be conclusive against him.
If we could persuade him to wear silk gloves, now, it
would be only necessary to point them out on the canvass,
to turn the stomachs of the electors, and their votes with
their stomachs. They would throw him up instantly.
Beauchampe shook his head. The other interpreted
the motion incorrectly.
What! you do not believe it. Never doubt. The
fact is certain. Such would be the case. Did you ever
hear the story of Barnabas in his first campaign?
No!not that I recollect.
He was stumping it through your own county of
Simpson
.
There were two candidates against him. One of
them stood no chance. That was certain. The other,
however, was generally considered to be quite as strong if
not stronger than Barnabas. Now Barnabas, in those days,
was something of a dandy. He wore fine clothes, a long
tail blue, a steeple crowned beaver, and silk gloves. Old
Ben Jones, his uncle, saw him going out on the canvass in
this unseasonable trimtold him he was a dd fool,
that the very coat and gloves and hat would lose him the
election. `Come in with me,' said the old buck. He did
so, and Jones rigged him out in a suit of buckskin breeches:
gave him an old slouch tied with a piece of twine; made
him put on a common homespun roundabout, and sent
him on the campaign with these accoutrements.
A mortifying exchange to Barnabas.
Not a bit. The fellow was so eager for election that
he'd have gone without clothes at all, sooner than have
missed a vote. But one thing the old man did not
remember
the
silk gloves, and Barnabas had nearly reached the
muster ground, before he recollected that he had them on
his hands. He took 'em off instantly and thrust 'em into
his pocket. When he reached the ground, he soon
discovered
the wisdom of old Jones' proceedings. He was
introduced to his chief opponent, and never was there a
more rough-and-tumble looking ruffian under the sun.
Barnabas swears that he had not washed his face and
hands for a week. His coat was out at the elbows, and
though made of cloth originally both blue and good, it was
evidently not made for the present wearer. His breeches
were common homespun, and his shoes of yellow belly,
were gaping on both feet. He had on stockings, however.
Barnabas looked and felt quite genteel alongside of him;
but he felt his danger also. He saw that the appearance
of the fellow was very much in his favour. There was
already a crowd around him; and when he talked, his
words were of that rough staple which is supposed to
indicate
the true staple of popular independence. As there was
nothing much in favour or against any of the candidates,
unless it was that one of themnot Barnabaswas
suspected
of horse stealing, all that the speakers could do was
to prove their own republicanism, and the aristocracy of
the opponent. Appearances would help or dissipate this
charge, and Barnabas saw, shabby as he was, that his rival
was still shabbier. A bright thought took him that night.
Fumbling in his pockets while they were drinking at the
hotel, he felt his silk gloves. What does he do but going
to his room he takes out his pocket inkstand and pen, and
marks in large letters the initials of his opponent upon
them. This done, he watches his chance, and the next
morning when they were about to go forth to the place of
gathering, he slips the gloves very slyly into the other
fellow's
pocket. The thing worked admirably. In the midst
of the speech, Joel Peguayfor that was his rival's name
endeavouring to pull out a ragged cotton
pocket-handkerchief
,
drew out the gloves which fell behind him on the
ground. Barnabas was on the watch, and pointing the
eyes of the assembly to the tokens of aristocracy,
exclaimed
`This, gentlemen, is a proof of the sort of democracy
which Joel Peguay practises.'
A universal shout mixed with hisses arose. Peguay
looked round, and when he was told what was the matter,
answered with sufficient promptness, and a look of
extraordinary
exultation.
`Fellow citizens ain't this only another proof of the
truth of what I'm a telling you, for look you, them nasty
fine things come out of this coat pocket, did they?'
`Yes, yes! we saw them drop, Joel,' was the cry
from fifty voices.
`Very good,' said Joel, nowise discomfited, `and the
coat was borrowed for this same occasion, from Tom
Meadows
.
I hain't a decent coat of my own, my friends, to
come before younone but a round jacket, and that's tore
down in the back, and so, you see, I begged Tom
Meadows
for the loan of his'n, and reckon the gloves must be
his'n too, since they fell out of the pocket.'
This explanation called for a triumphant shout from
the friends of Peguay, and the affair promised to redound
still more in favour of the speaker, when Barnabas, shaking
his head gravely, and picking up the gloves, which he held
from him as if they had been saturated in the dews of the
bohon upas, drew the eyes of those immediately at hand
to the letters which they bore.
`I am sorry,' said he, `to interrupt the gentleman; but
there is certainly some mistake here. These gloves are
marked J. P., which stands for Joel Peguay and not Tom
Meadows. See for yourselves, gentlemenyou all can
read, I knowhere is J. P. I'm not much of a reader,
being too poor to have much of an education, but I know
pretty much what you all do, that if these gloves belonged
to Tom Meadows, they would have been marked T. M.
the T for Tom, and the M for Meadows. I don't mean
to say that they are not Tom's; but I do say that it's very
strange that Tom Meadows should write his name Joel
Peguay. I say it's strange, gentlemenvery strange
that's all!'
And that was enough. There was no more shouting
from the friends of Peguay. He was completely
confounded
.
He denied and disputed of course, but the proofs
were too strong, and Barnabas had done his part of the
business with great skill and adroitness. Joel Peguay
descended from the stump swearing vengeance against
Meadows, who, he took for granted, had contrived the
exhibition secretly, only to defeat him. No doubt a fierce
feud followed between the parties, but Barnabas was
elected by a triumphant vote.
And do you really think, Colonel, said Beauchampe,
that this silly proceeding had any effect in producing the
result?
Silly, indeed! by my soul such silly things, Master
Beauchampe, have upset empires. The tumbling of an
old maid's cap has done more mischief. I can tell you,
from my own experience, that a small matter like this has
turned the scale in many a popular election. Barnabas
believes to this day, that he owes his success entirely to
that little
ruse de guerre
.
I know not how to believe it.
Because you know not yet that little, strange, mousing,
tiger-like, capricious, obstinate, foolish animal, whom we
call man. When you know him more, you will wonder
less.
Perhaps so, said Beauchampe. At all events, I can
only say, that while I will turn out for you and do all I can
to secure your election as in duty bound, I will endeavour
to urge your claims on other grounds.
As you please, my good fellow. Convince them that
I am a patriot and a prophet, and the best man for them,
and I care nothing by what process it is done. And if you
can lay bare the corresponding deficiencies of mine
opponent
this
fellow Calvertit is a part of the same policy,
to be sure.
But not so obviously, replied the other, for as yet,
you remember, we know nothing of him, and cannot
accordingly
pronounce upon his deficiencies.
You forgethis aristocracy!
Ah! that was conjectural, you know.
Granted, said the other, but what more do you
want. A plausible conjecture is the very sort of
argument
in a popular election.
But scarcely an honorable one!
Honourable! poh! poh! poh! Old Thurston has
seriously
diseased you, Beauchampe. We must undertake
your treatment for this weaknessthis boyish weakness.
It is a boyish weakness, Beauchampe.
Perhaps so, but it makes my strength.
It will always keep you feeblecertainly keep you
down in the political world.
The young man smiled. The other, speaking hastily,
continued
But this need not be discussed at present. Enough
that you will take the field, and be ready at my summons.
Turn the state of parties in your mind, and that will give
you matter enough for the stump. Read that letter of
Calvert, I doubt not it will give you more than sufficient
material. From a hasty glance I see that he distrusts the
people;
that,
as a stern democrat, you can resent happily.
I leave that point to you. You will regard that opinion
7*
as a falsehoodI think it worse,a mistake. It is to this
same people that he addresses his claims. How far his
opinion is an impertinence, may be seen in his appeal to
the very judgment which he decries. This, to my mind,
is conclusive against his own. But this must not make
us remiss. I will write to you when the time comes, and
at intervals, should there be any thing new to
communicate
.
But you had better stay dinner. Seriously, my
wife expects you.
Excuse me to her,but I must go. I so long to see
my sisters, and they will be on the lookout for me. I
have already written them.
With a few words more, and the young lawyer
separated
from his late legal preceptor. When he was gone,
the latter stroked his chin complacently as he
soliloquized
He will do to break ground with this fellow, Calvert.
He is ardent, soon roused; and if I am to judge of Calvert
from his letter, he is a stubborn colt whose heels are very
apt to annoy any injudicious assailant. Ten to one, that
with his fiery nature, Beauchampe finds cause of quarrel
in any homely truth. They may fight, and this hurts me
nothing. At least Beauchampe may be a very good foil
for the first strokes of this new enemy. Barnabas says
he is to be feared. If so he must be grappled with
fearlessly
.
There is no hope else. At all events I will see
by his issue with Beauchampe of what stuff he is made.
Something in that. And yet, is all so sure with this boy?
He has his whims, is sometimes suspiciousobstinate as
a mule when roused, andat least he must be managed
cautiouslyvery cautiously!
We leave the office of Colonel Warham P. Sharpe for
a while, to attend the progress of the young man of whom
he was speaking.
CHAPTER IX.
Beauchampe
was on his way to the maternal mansion.
We have already endeavoured to afford the reader some
idea of the character of this person. It does not need
that we should dilate more at large on the abstract
constituents
of his nature. We may infer that his mind was
good, from the anxiety which his late teacher displayed to
have it in requisition in his behalf, during the political
campaign which was at hand. The estimate of his
temperament
,
by the same person will also be sufficient for
us. That he was of high, dignified bearing and
honourable
purpose, we may also conclude from the share which
he took in the preceding dialogue. Of his judgment,
however
,
doubts may be entertained. With something more
than the ardour of youth, Beauchampe had all of its
impatience
.
He was of that fiery mood, when aroused,
which too effectually blinds the possessor to the strict
course of propriety. His natural good sense was but too
often baffled by this impetuosity of his temper, and though
in the brief scenes in which he has been suffered to appear,
we have beheld nothing in his deportment which was not
becomingly modest and deliberate, we are constrained to
confess that the characteristic of much deliberation is not
natural to him, and was induced in the present instance
by a sense of his late elevation to a new and exacting
professionthe fact that he was in the presence of his
late teacher; and that he had, the night before
participated
,
however unconsciously, in a debauch, of the
performances
of which he was really most heartily ashamed.
His manner has therefore been subdued, but only for a
while. We shall see him before long under very different
aspects; betraying all the ardour and impetuosity of his
disposition, and, as is usual in such cases, not always in
that way which is most favourable to the shows of
judgment
.
Beauchampe was the second son of a stanch Kentucky
farmer. He had received quite as good an education as
the resources of the country at that time could afford.
This education was not very remarkable it is true, but
with the advantage of a lively nature and retentive
memory
,
it brought into early exercise all the qualities of his
really excellent intellect. He became a good English
speaker, and a tolerable Latin scholar. He read with
avidity, and studied with industry; and, at the age of
twenty-one, was admitted to the practice of law in the
courts of the state. This probation over, with the natural
feeling of a heart which the world has not yet utterly
weaned from the affections and dependencies of its youth,
he was hurrying home to his mother and sisters, to
receive
their congratulations, and share with them the
pride and delight which such an occasion of his return
would naturally inspire. Hitherto, his mother and sisters
have had all his affections. The blind deity has never
disturbed his repose, diverted his eyes from these objects
of his regard, or interfered with his mental cogitations.
Dreams of ambition were in his mind, but not yet with
sufficient strength or warmth as to subdue the colours of
that domestic love which the kindnesses of a beloved
mother, and the attachments of dear sisters, had impressed
upon his heart. He had his images of beauty, perhaps,
along with his images of glory, but they were rather the
creations of a lively fancy, in moments of mental
abstraction
,
than any more real impressions upon the unwritten
tablets of his soul. These were still fair and smooth.
His life had not been touched by many griefs or
annoyances
.
His trials had been few, his mortifications brief.
He was not yet conscious of any wants which would
induce feelings of care and anxiety; and with a spirit
gradually growing lighter and more elastic, as the number
of miles rapidly diminished beneath the feet of his horse,
he forgot that he was alone in his journeyings, a light
heart, and a lively fancy brought him pleasant companions
enough, that beguiled the time, and cheered the
tediousness
of his journey. The youth was thinking of his home,
and what a thought is that in the bosom of youth. The
old cottage shrunk up in snug littleness among the
venerable
guardian trees, and the green grass plat, and the
half blind house dog, and a thousand objects besides,
forced themselves through the medium of his memory
upon his delighted imagination. Then he beheld his
sisters
hurrying out to meet him,Jane running for dear
life, half mad, and shouting back to Mary, the more grave
sister, who slowly followed. Jane shrieking with laughter,
and Mary with not a word, but only her extended hand
and her tears!
Strange! that even at such a moment as this, while
these were the satisfying images in his mind, there should
intrude another which should either expel these utterly,
or should persuade him that they were not enough to
satisfy his mind or confer happiness upon his heart. Why,
when, in his dreaming fancy, these dear sisters appeared
so lovely and were so fond, why should another form,
itself a fancy,arise in the midst, which should make
him heedless and forgetful of all others, and fixed only on
it! The eye of the youth grew sadder as he gazed and
felt. He no longer spurred his steed impatiently along
the path, but forgetful in an instant of his progress, he
mused upon the heart's ideal, which a passing fancy had
presented, and all the bright sweet domestic forms
vanished
from his sight. The feeling of Beauchampe was natural
enough. He felt it to be so. It was an instinct which
every heart of any sensibility must feel in progress of
time; even though the living object be yet wanting to the
sight, upon which the imagination may expend its own
colours in seeking to establish the identity between the
sought
and the
found
. But was it not late for him to
feel this instinct. Why had he not felt it before? Why,
just at that moment,just when his fancy had invoked
around him all the images which had ever brought him
happiness before,forms which had supplied all his
previous
wantssmiles and tones which had left nothing
which he could desirewhy, just then, should that
foreign instinct arise and expel, as with a single glance,
the whole family of joys known to his youthful heart.
Expelling them, indeed, but only to awaken him to the
conviction of superior joys and possessions far more
valuable
.
It was an instinct, indeed; and never was youthful
mind so completely diverted, in a single instant, from the
consideration of a long succession of dear thoughts, to
that of one, now dearer perhaps than all, but which had
never made one of his thoughts before. He now
remembered
that, of all his schoolmates and youthful associates,
there had not been one, who had not professed, a
passionate
flame for some smiling damsel in his
neighbourhood
.
Among his brother students at law, that they
should love was quite as certain as that they should have
frequent attacks of the passion, and of course, on each
occasion, for some different object. He alone had gone
unscathed. He alone had run the gauntlet of smiles and
glances, bright eyes and lovely cheeks, without detriment.
The thought had never disturbed him then, when he was
surrounded by beauty;why should it now, when none
was nigh him, and when but a small distance from his
mother's farm he had every reason to think only of that
and the dear relatives which there awaited him. There
was an instinct in it.
At that moment, he was roused from his reveries by a
pistol shot which sounded in the wood a little distance
before
him. The circumstance was a singular one. The
wood was very close and somewhat extensive. He knew
the spot very well. It was scarcely more than a mile
from his mother's cottage. He knew of no one in the
neighbourhood who practised pistol shooting; but on this
head he was not capable to judge. He had been absent
from his home for two years. There mightthere must
have been changes. At all events no mischief seemed to
be afoot. There was but one shot. He himself was safe,
and he rode forward, relieved somewhat of his reveries, at
a trifling increase of speed. The road led him round the
wood in which the shot had been heard, making a sweep
like a crescent, in order to avoid some rugged inequalities
of the land. As he followed its windings he was startled
to see, just before him, a female, well dressed, tall, and of
a carriage unusually firm and majestic. Under her arm
she carried a small bundle wrapped up in a dark silk
pocket-handkerchief. She crossed the road hastily, and
soon buried herself out of sight in the woods opposite.
She gave him but a single glance in passing, but this
glance enabled him to distinguish features of peculiar
brilliancy
and beauty. The moment after, she was gone from
sight, and it seemed as if the pathway grew suddenly dark.
Her sudden appearance and rapid transition was like that
of a gleam of summer lightning. Involuntarily he spurred
his horse forward, and his eyes peered keenly into the
wood which she had entered. He could still see the white
glimmer of her garments. He stopped, like one
bewildered
,
to watch. At one moment he felt like dismounting
and darting in pursuit of her. But such an impertinence
might receive the rebuke which it merited. She did not
seem to need any service, and on no other pretence could
he have pursued. He grew more and more bewildered
while he gazed. This vision was so strange and startling,
and so singularly in unison with the fancies which had
just before possessed his mind. That his heart should
present him with an ideal form, and that, a moment after,
a form of beauty should appear, so unexpectedly, in so
unusual a place, was at least a very strange coincidence.
Nothing could be more natural than that the fancy of the
young man should find these two forms identical. It is
an easy matter for the ardent nature to deceive itself. But
here another subject of doubt presented itself to the mind
of Beauchampe. Was this last vision more certainly real
than the former? It was no longer to be seen. Had he
seen it except in his mind's eye, where the former bright
ideal had been called up? So sudden had been the
appearance
,
so rapid the transition, that he turned from the
spot now doubting its reality. Slowly he rode away,
musing strangely, and we may add sadlyoften looking
back, and growing more and more bewildered as he mused,
until relieved and diverted by the more natural feelings of
the son and brotheras the prospect opening before his
eyes, he beheld the farmstead of his mother. In the
door-way
of the old cottage stood the venerable woman, while
the two girls were approaching, precisely as his fancy had
shown them, the one bounding and crying aloud, the other
moving slowly, and with eyes which were already moist
with tears. They had seen him before he had sufficiently
awakened from his reveries to behold them.
Ah, Janedear Mary! were the words of the youth,
throwing himself from the horse and severally clasping
them in his arms. The former laughed, sang, danced and
capered. The latter clung to the neck of her brother,
sobbing as heartily as if they were about to separate.
Why, what's Mary crying for, I wonder? said the
giddy girl.
Because my heart's so full; I must cry, murmured
the other. Taking an arm of each in his own, he led them
to the old lady whose crowning embrace was bestowed
with the warmth of one who clasps and confesses the
presence
of her idol. We pass over the first ebullitions of
domestic love. Most people can imagine these. It is
enough to say that ours is a family of love. They have
been piously brought up. Mrs. Beauchampe is a woman
of equal benignity and intelligence. They have their own
little world of joy in and among themselves. The
daughters
are single-hearted and gentle, and no small vanities
and petty strifes interfere to diminish the confidence in one,
and another, and themselves, which brings to them the
hourly enjoyment of the all-in-all content. It will not be
hard to fancy the happiness of the household in the
restoration
of its tall and accomplished son. Tall and
handsome
,
and so kind, and so intelligent, and just now made
a lawyer too. Jane was half beside herself, and Mary's
tears were constantly renewed as they looked at the manly
brother, and thought of these things.
But why did you ride so slow, Orville? demanded
Jane, as she sat upon his knee and patted his cheek.
Mary was playing with his hair from behind. You
came at a snail's pace and didn't seem to see any body,
and there was I hallooing to make you hear and all for
nothing.
Don't worry Orville with your questions, Jane, said
the more sedate Mary. He was tired perhaps,
Or
his
heart was too full also, said Jane interrupting
her mischievously. But it's not either of these I'm sure,
Orville, for I know horseback don't tire you, and I'm sure
your heart's not so very full, for you hav'n't shed a tear
yet. No! no! it's something else, for you not only rode
slow, but you kept looking behind you all the while, as if
you were expecting somebody. Now who were you
looking for; tell me, tell Jane, dear brother.
Now you hit it, Janethe reason I rode slowly and
looked behind memind me, I rode pretty fast until I
came almost in sight of homewas because I did expect
to see some one coming behind me, though I had not
much cause to expect it either.
Who was it!
That's the question. Perhaps you can tell
me;
and, with these words, the young man proceeded to relate
the circumstance already described of the sudden advent of
that bright vision which had so singularly taken the place,
in our hero's mind, of his heart's ideal.
It must be Miss Cooke, mother, said the girls with
one breath.
And who is Miss Cooke?
Oh! that's the mystery. She's a sort of queen, I'm
thinking, said Jane, or she wants you to think her one
which is more likely.
Jane, Jane, said Mary, who was the younger sister,
in reproachful accents.
Well, what am I saying, but what's the truth? Don't
she carry herself like a queen? Isn't she as proud and
stately, as if she was better than any body else?
If she's a queen, it's a tragedy queen, said the graver
sister. I don't deny that she's very stately, but then
she's also very unhappy.
I don't believe in her unhappiness at all. I can't
think any person so very unhappy who carries herself so
proudly.
Pride itself may be a cause of unhappiness, Jane,
said the mother.
Yes, mamma, but are we to sympathize with it, I
want to know.
Perhaps! it is not less to be pitied because the owner
has no such notion. But your brother is waiting to hear
something of Miss Cooke, and instead of telling him
who
she is, you're telling him
what
she is.
And no better way, perhaps, said the brother; but
do you tell me, Mary; Jane is quite too much given to
scandal.
Oh! brother, said Jane.
Too true, Jane; but go on Mary, and let us have a
key to this mystery. Who is Miss Cooke?
She's a young lady
Very pretty?
Very! she came here about two years agojust after
you went from Parson Thurston to study lawshe and
her mother, and they took the old place of Farmer Davis.
They came from some other part of Simpson, so I have
heard, and bought this place from widow Davis. They
have a few servants, and are comfortably fixed, and Mrs.
Cooke is quite a chatty body, very silly in some things,
but fond of going about among the neighbours. Her
daughter
,
who is named Anna, though I once heard the old lady
call her Margaret
Margaret Anna, perhapsshe may have two names,
said the brother.
Very likely! but the daughter is not sociable. On
the contrary, she rather avoids every body. You do not
often see her when you go there, and she has never been
here but once, and that shortly after her first arrival. As
Jane says, she is not only shy, but stately. Jane thinks
it pride, but I do not agree with her. I rather think that
VOL. II. 8
it is owing to a natural dignity of mind, and to manners
formed under other circumstances; for she never smiles,
and there is such a deep look of sadness from her eyes,
that I can't help believing her to be very unhappy. I
sometimes think that she has probably been disappointed
in love.
Yes, Mary thinks the strangest things about her. She
says she's sure that she's been engaged, and that her lover
has played her false and deserted her.
Oh, Jane, you mistake; I said I thought he might
have been killed in a duel, or
Or that he deserted her; for that matter, Mary, you've
been having a hundred conceits about her ever since she
came here.
She is pretty, you say, Mary? asked the young
man, who, by this time had ejected Jane from his knee,
and transferred her younger sister to the same place.
Prettyshe is beautiful.
I can't see it for my part, said Jane, with her
solemn visage, and great dark eyes that seem always sharp
like daggers ready to run you through.
She is beautiful, brother, very beautiful, but Jane don't
like her because she thinks her proud. She's as beautiful
in her face, as she is noble in her figure. Her stateliness,
indeed, arises, I think, from the symmetry and perfect
proportion of her person; for when she moves, she does
not seem to be at all conscious that she is stately. Her
movements are very natural, as if she had practised them
all her life. And they say, brother, that she's very
smart.
Who says, sister, cried Janewho but old Mrs.
Fisher, and only because she saw her fixing a bushel of
books upon the shelves at her first coming.
No, Jane, Mr. Crump told me that he spoke to her,
and that he had never believed a woman could be so
sensible
till then.
That shows he's a poor judge. Who'd take old
Crump's opinion about a woman's sense? I'm sure I
wouldn't.
But Miss Cooke is very sensible, brother. Jane does
dislike her so!
Well, supposing she is sensible, it's only what she
ought to be by this time. She's old enough to have the
sense of two young women at least.
Old! exclaimed Beauchampe. The lady I saw
was not old, certainly.
The suggestion seemed to give the young man some
annoyance, which the gentlehearted Mary hastened to
remove.
She is not old, Orville; Jane how can you say so?
You know that Miss Cooke can hardly be over
twenty-one
,
or two, even if she's that.
Well, and ain't that old. You, Mary, are sixteen only,
and I'm but seventeen and three months. But I'm
certain
she's twenty-five if she's a day.
The subject is one fruitful of discussion where ladies
are concerned. Beauchampe having experience of the two
sisters, quietly sat and listened; and by the use of a
moderate
degree of patience, soon contrived to learn all that
could be known of that neighbour who, it appears, had
occasioned quite as great a sensation in the bosoms of the
sisters, though of a very different sort, as her momentary
presence had inspired in his own. The two girls,
representing
extremes, were just the persons to give him a
reasonable
idea of the real facts in the case of the person
under
discussion. It may be unnecessary to add, that the
result was, to increase the mystery, and heighten the
curiosity which the young man now felt in its solution.
CHAPTER X.
When
the first sensations following the return of our
hero to his home and family had somewhat subsided, the
enthusiastic and excitable nature of the former naturally
led him to dwell upon the image of that strange lady,
whose sudden appearance seemed to harmonize so
singularly
with the ideal of his waking dream. The very
morning after his arrival, he sallied forth at an early hour,
with his gun in hand, ostensibly with a view to birding,
but really to catch some glimpse of the mysterious lady.
For this purpose, as all the neighbourhood and
neighbouring
county was familiar, he traversed the hundred
routes to and from the farmstead of old Davis, which she
now occupied, and wasted some precious hours, in which
neither his heart nor his gun found game, in exploring
the deep wood from whence the pistol-shot, the day before,
had first challenged his attention. But no bright vision
blessed his search that day. He found nothing to interest
his mind or satisfy his curiosity, unless it were a tree
which he discovered barked with bullets, where some
person had evidently been exercising, and, assuming the
instrument to have been a pistol, with a singular degree
of success. The discovery did not call for the thought of
a single moment; and contenting himself with the
conjecture
that some young rifleman was thus teaching the
young idea how to shoot, he turned off, and, with some
weariness and more disappointment, made his way,
birdless
,
to his cottage. But the disappointment rather
increased
than lessened his curiosity, and before two days
had passed, he had acquired boldness enough to advance
so nearly to the dwelling of Miss Cooke, as, sheltered
beneath some friendly shade-trees, to see the passers by
the window, and, on one or more occasions, to catch a
glimpse of the one object for whom all these pains were
taken. These glimpses, it may be said, served rather to
inflame than to satisfy his curiosity. He saw enough to
convince him that Mary was right, and Jane wrong.
That he was not deceived in his first impression of her
exceeding lovelinessthat she was beautiful beyond any
comparison that he could make; of a rare, rich, and
excelling
beauty;and slowly he returned from his
wanderings
to muse upon the means by which he should
arrive at a more intimate knowledge of the fair one, who
was represented to be as inaccessible as she was fair
like one of those unhappy damsels of whom we read in
old romances, locked up in barred and gloomy towers,
lofty and well guarded, whose charms, if they were the
incentives to chivalry and daring, were quite as often the
cruel occasion of bloody strife and most unfortunate
adventure
.
The surpassing beauty of our heroine, so
strangely coupled with her sternness of deportment and
loneliness of habit, naturally enough brought into activity
the wild imagination and fervent temperament of our
young lawyer. By these means her beauty was
heigtened
,
and the mystery which enveloped her made the parent
of newer sources of attraction. Before three days had
passed, his sisters had discovered that his thought was
running only on their fair, strange neighbour, and at
length, baffled in his efforts to encounter the
mysterious
lady in his rambles, he was fain to declare himself
more openly at home, and to insist that his sisters should
call upon Miss Cooke and her mother, and invite them to
tea. This was done accordingly, but with only partial
success. Mrs. Cooke came but not the daughter, who
sent an excuse. Beauchampe paid his court to the old
lady, whom he found very garrulous and very
feeble-minded
;
but though she spoke with great freedom on
almost every subject, he remarked that she shrunk
suddenly
into silence whenever reference was made to her
daughter. On this point every thing tended to increase
the mystery, and of course the interest. He attended the
mother home that night, in the hope to be permitted to
see the daughter; but though, when invited to enter, he
did so, he found the tte--tte with the old ladya half
hour which curiosity readily gave to dulnessunrelieved
by the presence of the one object for whom he sought.
But a well-filled bookcase which met his eyes in the hall,
suggested to him a mode of approach in future of which
he did not scruple to avail himself. He complimented the
old lady on the extent of her literary possessions. Such
a collection was not usual at that time among the
country-houses
of that region. He spoke of his passion for
books, and how much he would be pleased to be
permitted
to obtain such as he wanted from the collection
before him. The old lady replied that they were her
daughter's, who was also passionately fond of books
that she valued her collection very highlythey were
almost her only friendsbut she had no doubt that Mr.
Beauchampe would readily receive her permission to
take any that he desired for perusal. Beauchampe
expressed
his gratitude, but judiciously declined to make
his selection that night. The permission necessarily
furnished
the sanction for a second visit, for which he
accordingly
prepared himself. He suffered a day,
however
,
to passa forbearance that called for the exercise
of no small degree of fortitudebefore repeating his visit.
The second morning, however, he did so. He saw the
8*
young lady, for a brief instant, at the window, while
making his approaches. He was admitted, was received
by the mother, treated with great kindness, and spent a
full hour,how we say notin company with the
venerable
and voluble dame. She conferred upon him the
permission of her daughter to use any book in the
collection
,
but the daughter herself did not appear. He
mustered courage enough to ask for her, but the inquiry
was civilly evaded. He was finally compelled, after
lingering
to the last, and hoping against hope, to take his
departure without attaining the real object of his visit.
He selected a volume, however, not that he cared to read
it, but simply because the necessity of returning it would
afford him the occasion and excuse for another visit.
The proverb tells us that grass never grows beneath
the footsteps of love. It is seldom suffered to grow
beneath
those of curiosity. Our hero either read, or
pretended
to have read, the borrowed volume, in a very
short space of time. The next morning found him with
it beneath his arm, and on his way to the cottage of the
Cookes. The grave looks of his mother, and the sly
looks of his sisters, were all lost upon him; and, pluming
himself somewhat upon the adroitness which disguised
the real purpose of his visits, he flattered himself that he
should still attain the object which he sought, without
betraying
the interest which he felt. Of course he himself
did not suspect the real motives by which he was
governed
.
That a secret passion stirring in his breast had
any thing to do with that interest which he felt to know
the strange lady, was by no means obvious to his own
mind. Whatever may have been the motive by which
his conduct was influenced, it did not promise to be
followed
by any of the results which he desired. His second
morning call was not more fortunate than the first.
Approaching
,
he saw the outline of Miss Cooke's person at
an upper window, but she instantly disappeared, and he
was received below, and wholly entertained, by the good
old mother.
It may readily be imagined, that with a fervent,
passionate
nature, such as Beauchampe's, this very baffling
of his desires, was calculated to stimulate and strengthen
them. He was a man equally of strong impulses and
indomitable
will. The necessary creature of such qualities
of mind is a Puritan tenacity of purposea persevering
energy which ceases, finally, to sleep in the work of
conquest
,
or, at least, converts even its sleeping hours into
tasks of thought and wild vague dreams of modes and
operations by which the work of conquest is to be carried
on. The momentary glimpses of the damsel's person,
which the ardent youth was permitted to obtain, still kept
alive in his mind the strong impression which her beauty
had originally made. We do not insinuate that this
exhibition
was designed by the lady herself for any such
object. Such might be the imputationnay, was, in after
days, by some of her charitable neighbours,but we have
every reason for thinking otherwise. We believe that
she was originally quite sincere in her desire to avoid the
sight, and discourage the visits of strangers. Whether
this was also the desire of the mother is not so very
certain
.
We should suppose, on the contrary, that the
course of her daughter was one that afforded little real
satisfaction to her. If the daughter remained inflexible,
the good mother soon convinced Beauchampe that she
was not; and, saving the one topic,the daughter
herself
,there
was none upon which good Mrs. Cooke did
not expatiate to her visited with the assured freedoms of a
friend of a thousand years. Any approach to this subject,
however, effectually silenced her. Not, it would seem,
because she herself felt any repugnance to the subject
for Beauchampe could not fail to perceive that her eyes
brightened whenever the other was referred to;but her
voice was hurried when she replied on such occasions,
and her glance stealthily turned to the entrance, as if she
dreaded lest the sound should summon other ears to the
apartment.
The curiosity of Beauchampe was farther stimulated
by a general examination of the contents of the library.
The selection was such, as in regions where books are
more in requisition, and seem more in place, would testify
considerably in behalf of the judgment and good taste of
the possessor. They were all English books, it is true,
but they were genuine classics of the best days of British
literature, including the more recent writers. There
were additional proofs in such as he took home with him,
of the equal taste and industry of their reader. The fine
passages were scored marginally with pencil lines, and
an occasional note in the same manner, indicated the
acquaintance
of the commentator with the best standards of
criticism. Beauchampe made another observation,
however
,
which had the effect of leaving it still doubtful
whether these notes were made by the present owner.
They were all in a female hand. He found that a former
name had been carefully obliterated in every volume, that
of Miss Cooke being written in its stead. Though
doubtful
,
therefore, whether to ascribe to her the excellent
criticism
and fine taste which thus displayed itself over the
pages which he read, this doubt by no means lessened
his anxiety to judge for himself of the attainments of their
possessor; and fortunewe may assume thus muchat
length helped him to the interview which he sought.
The mother, one day, with nice judgment, fell
opportunely
sick. It is easier to suspect that she willed this
event than to suppose the daughter guilty of duplicity.
It necessarily favoured the design of Beauchampe. He
made his morning visit, which had now become periodical,
was ushered into the parlour, where, after a few moments,
he was informed that Mrs. Cooke was not visible. She
pleaded indisposition. Miss Cooke, however, had
instructed
the servant to say to Mr. Beauchampe that he
was at liberty to use the library as before. By this time
the eager nature of Beauchampe was excited to the highest
pitch of anxiety. So many delays,such baffling,had
deprived his judgment of that deliberate action without
which the boundaries of convention are very soon
overpassed
.
A direct message from the mysterious lady,
was a step gained. It had the effect of still farther
unseating
his judgment, and, without scruple, he boldly
despatched
a message by the servant, soliciting permission
to see Miss Cooke. An answer was immediately
returned
in which she declined seeing him. He renewed the
request with the additional suggestion that he had a
communication
to make. This necessarily produced the
desired
effect. In a few minutes she descended to the
parlour
.
If Beauchampe had been fascinated before, he was
certainly
not yet prepared for the commanding character of
that beauty which now stood before him. He rose,
trembling and abashed, his cheeks suffused with blushes,
but his eyes, though dazzled, were full of the eager
admiration
which he felt. She was simply clad, in white.
Her person, tall and symmetrical, was erect and dignified.
Her face was that of matured loveliness, shaded, not
impaired
,
by sadness, and made even more elevated and
commanding by the expression of intense pain which
seemed to mingle with the fire of her eyes, giving a sort
of subdued fierceness to her glance, which daunted quite as
much as it dazzled him. Perhaps a something of severity
in her look added to his confusion. He stammered
confusedly
;
the courage which had prompted him to seek
the interview, failed utterly to provide him with the
intellectual
readiness by which it was to be carried on. But
the feminine instinct came to his relief. The lady seated
herself, motioning her visiter to do the same.
Sit down, sir, if you please. My mother presumes
that you are anxious to know how she is. She instructs
me to thank you for your courtesy, and to say that her
indisposition is not serious. She trusts in another day
to be quite restored.
By this time Beauchampe had recovered something of
his confidence.
It gives me pleasure, Miss Cooke, to hear this. I did
fear that your mother was seriously suffering. But I can
not do you and myself the injustice to admit that I came
simply to see her. No! Miss Cooke, an anxiety to see
you in person, and to acknowledge the kindness which
has given me the freedom of your library, were among
the objects of my visit.
The lady became instantly grave.
I thank you, sir, for your compliment, but I have long
since abandoned society. My habits are reserved. I
prefer solitude. My tastes and feelings equally require
it. I am governed so far by these tastes and feelings,
which have now become habits, that it will not suit me
to recognise any new acquaintance. My books are freely
at your service, whenever you wish them. Permit me,
sir, to wish you good morning.
She rose to depart. Beauchampe eagerly started to his
feet.
Stay, Miss Cooke. Do not leave me thus. Hear me
but for a moment.
She resumed her seat with a calm, inflexible demeanour,
as if, assured of her strength at any moment to depart,
she had no apprehensions on the subject of her detention.
The blush again suffused the cheeks of Beauchampe, and
the rigid silence which his companion observed, as if
awaiting his utterance, suddenly increased his difficulties
in this respect. But the ice once broken, his impetuous
temper was resolved that it should not freeze again.
I know, Miss Cooke, he observed, after what you
have just said, that I have no right any longer to trespass
upon you, but I dare not do otherwiseI dare not depart
I am the slave of a passion which has brought me, and
which keeps me here.
I must not listen to you, Mr. Beauchampe, she
replied
,
rising, as if to leave the room.
Forgive me! he exclaimed, gently detaining her
forgive me, but you must.
Must! her eyes flashed brighter fires.
I implore the privilege to use the word, but in no
offensive
sense. Nay, Miss Cooke,I release youI will
not seek to detain you. You are at liberty,with my
lips only do I implore you to remain.
The proud woman examined the face of the passionate
youth with some slight curiosity. To this, however, he
was insensible.
You are aware, Mr. Beauchampe, she remarked,
indifferently
,
that your conduct is somewhat unusual.
Yes, perhaps so. I believe it. Nay, were I to think,
Miss Cooke, I should perhaps, under ordinary
circumstances
,
agree to pronounce it unjustifiable. But, believe
me, it is meant to be respectful.
She interrupted him:
Unless I thought so, sir, I could not be detained here
a moment longer.
Surely, surely, Miss Cooke, you cannot doubt my
respect,my
I do not, sir.
Ah! but you are so coldso repulsive, Miss Cooke.
Perhaps I had better leave you, Mr. Beauchampe. It
will be better for both of us. You know nothing of me, I
nothing of you.
You mistake, Miss Cooke, in assuming that I know
nothing of you.
Ha! sir! she answered, rising to her feet, her face
glowing like scarlet, while a blue vein, like a chord, divided
the high white forehead in the midst. What mean you,
what know you?
Much! I know already that you are alone among
womenalone in beautyin intellect!
He paused. He marked a sudden and speaking change
upon her features which struck him as more singular than
the last. The flush had departed from her cheeks, the
blue vein had suddenly sunk from sighta complete
pallor overspread her face, and with a slight tremor over
her frame, she sunk upon the seat from which she had
arisen. He sprang forward, and was at once beside her
upon his knees. He caught her hand in his own.
You are sickyou are ill! he exclaimed.
No! I am better now! she answered in low tones.
Thank God! he exclaimed, I feared you had spasms
I dreaded I had offended you. You are still so pale,
Miss Cookeso very pale!and he again started to his
feet as if to call for assistance. She arrested him.
Do not alarm yourself, she said with more firmness.
I am subject to such attacks, and they form a sufficient
reason, Mr. Beauchampe, why I should not distress
strangers with them. Suffer me now to retire.
Bear with me yet awhile! he exclaimed, I will
try not to alarm or to annoy you. You ask me what I
know of you! nothing, perhaps, were I to answer
according
to the fashion of the world; every thing, if I answer
according to the dictates of my heart.
It is unprofitable knowledge, Mr. Beauchampe.
Do not say so, I implore you. I know that I am a
rash and foolish young man, but I mean not to offend
nay, my purpose is to declare the admiration which I
feel.
I must not hear you, Mr. Beauchampe. I must leave
you. As I said before, you are welcome to the use of
my books.
Ah! Miss Cooke, it is you, and not your books which
have brought me to your dwelling. Suffer me to see you
when I come. Suffer me to know youto make myself
knownto bring my sisters; to conduct you to them.
They will all be so glad to see and know you.
She shook her head mournfully, while a sad smile rested
upon her lips as she replied
Mr. Beauchampe, she said, I will not affect to
misunderstand
you; but I must repeat, as I have said to you
before, I have done with society. I am in fact done with
the world.
Done with the world! Oh! what a thought! You,
Miss Cooke, you so able to do all with it!
You cannot flatter me, Mr. Beauchampe. The world
can be nothing to me. I am nothing to it. To wear out
life in loneliness, forgot, forgetting, is the utmost of my
hopes from the world. Spare me more. It is not well,
it will not be desirable, that any intimacy should exist
between me and your sisters.
Oh! why not? they are so gentle, so pure!
Ah!no more, sir, I implore you; her brow had
suddenly become clouded, and she rose. Leave me
now, sir,I must leave you. I must hear you no longer.
Her voice was firm. Her features had suddenly put
on their former inflexibility of expression. The passionate
youth at once discovered that the moment for moving her
determination was past, and every effort now to detain
her would prejudice his cause.
You will leave me, Miss Cookeyou will drive me
from you,yet let me hope
Hope nothing from me, Mr. Beauchampe. I would
not have you hope fruitlessly.
The wish itself assures me that I cannot.
You mistake, siryou deceive yourself! she replied
with sterner accents.
At least let me not be denied your presence. Let me
see you. I am not in the world, nor of it, Miss Cooke.
Let me sometimes meet you here, and if I am forbid to
speak of other things, let me at least speak and hear you
speak of these old masters at whose feet I perceive you
have been no idle student.
Mr. Beauchampe, I can promise nothing. To consent
to receive and meet you would be to violate many an
internal
resolve.
But why this dreary resolution?
Why!but ask not, sir. No more from me now.
You knew not, sir,and you meant not,but you have
wakened in my mind this morning many a painful and
dreary thought, which you cannot dissipate. I say this
to excuse myself for what might seem rudeness. I do
not wish to excite your curiosity. I tell you, sir, but the
truth, when I tell you that I am cut off from the world
it matters not how, nor why. It is so,and the less I
see of it the better. When you know this, you will
understand
why it is that I should prefer not to see you.
Ah! but not why I should not seek to see you. No,
Miss Cooke, your dreary destiny does not lessen my
willingness to sootheto share it.
That can never be.
Do not say so. If you knew my heart
Keep its secrets, Mr. Beauchampe. Enough, sir,
that I know my own.
That,
sir, has but one prayer, and
that is for peace,but one passion, and that, sir,
Isspeak, say, Miss Cooke, tell me what this passion
is? Relieve me; but tell me not that you love another.
Not that,any thing but that.
Love! she exclaimed scornfullylove! no, sir, I
do not love. Happily, I am free from any such weakness
that weakness of my sex!
Call it not a weakness, dear Miss Cooke,but a
strengtha strength of the heart, not peculiar to your
sex, but the source of what is lofty and ennobling in the
heart of man.
Ay, he has a precious stock of it, no doubt; but no
more of this, Mr. Beauchampe. I have my passion,
perhaps
,
but surely love makes no part of it.
What then?
Hate!
Hate! ha! can it be that you hate, Miss Cooke?
Ay, sir, it is possible. Hate is my passion, not the
only one, since it produces another bearing its own
likeness
.
And that?
Is revenge!Ask yourself, with these passions
reigning
in my heart, whether there is room for any thing more
for any other! There is not, and you may not deceive
yourself with the vain hope to plant any feebler passion
in a spot which bears such poisonous weeds.
Thus speaking she left the room, and, astounded by
her vehemence, and by the strange though imperfect
revelation which she had made, Beauchampe found
himself
alone!
VOL. II. 9
CHAPTER XI.
Had
the words of the lady fallen from the lips of an
oracle, they could not have more completely fastened
themselves on the ears of our hero. Her sublime beauty
as she spoke those wild accents was that of one inspired.
Her eye flashed with fires of a supernatural brightness.
Her brow was lifted, and her hand smote upon her heart,
when she declared what fierce passions were its
possessors
,
as if they themselves were impelling the blow, and
the heart was that of some mortal enemy. Beauchampe
was as completely paralysed as if he had suffered an
electric stroke. He would have arrested her departure,
but his words and action were equally slow. He had lost
the power of hands and voice, and when he was able to
speak she had gone. Confused, bewildered, and mortified,
he left the house; and sad and silent he pursued his way
along the homeward paths. Before he had gone far he
was saluted with the laughter of merry voices, and his
sisters were at his side. What a contrast was that which
instantly challenged the attention of his mind, between
the girlish, almost childish and characterless damsels
beside
him, and the intense, soul-speaking woman he had
left! Howi mpertinent seemed the levity of Janehow
insipid the softness and milky sadness of the gentlehearted
Mary! The reflections of the brother were in no ways
favourable to the sisters, but he gave no utterance to the
involuntary thoughts.
Why, the Queen of Sheba has struck you dumb,
brother Orville; said the playful Janeyou have seen
her to-day, I'm certain. That's the way she always comes
over one. She has had on her cloudy cap to-day for your
especial benefit.
But have you seen her, brother? asked the more
timid Mary.
To be sure he hasdon't you see? nothing less could
make Orville look on us, as old Burke the schoolmaster
used to look on him when he put the nouns and verbs
out of countenance. He has seen her to be sure, and she
came out clothed in thunder, I reckon.
Jane, you vex Orville. But you did see her, brother?
Yes, Mary, Jane is right.
Didn't I tell you? I could see it the moment I set
eyes on him.
And don't you think her very beautiful, brother?
Very beautiful, Mary.
Yes! a sort of thunderstorm beauty, I grant you,
said Janedark and dismalwith such keen flashes of
lightning as to dazzle one's eyes and terrify one's heart.
Not a bad description, Jane; said the brother.
To be sure not. Don't I know her? Why, Lord love
you, the first time we were together I felt all crumpled
up, body and soul. My soul indeed was like a little
mouse looking every where for a hole to creep into and
be out of the way of danger; and I fancied she was a
great tigress of a mouser, with her eyes following the
mouse every which way, amusing herself with my terrors,
and ready to spring upon me and end them the moment
she got tired of the sport. I assure you, I didn't feel secure
a single moment while I was with her. I expected to be
gobbled up at a moment's warning.
How you run on, Jane, and so unreasonably, said the
gentle Mary. Now, brother, I think all this description
very unlike Anna Cooke. That she's sad, usually, and
gloomy sometimes, I'm willing to admit; but she was very
kind and gentle in what she had to say to me, and I believe
would have been much more so, if Jane hadn't continually
came about us making a great laughter. That she is very
smart, I'm certain, and that she is very beautiful every body
with half an eye must see.
I don't, and I've both eyes, and pretty keen ones
too.
Well, girls, said Beauchampe, I intend that you
shall have a good opportunity to form a correct opinion of
Miss Cookeher talents and her beauty. I intend to carry
you both to visit her to-morrow.
Oh, don't, don't, brother, I beg youshe 'll eat me up,
the great mouser. I sha'n't be a moderate mouthful for
her anger.
And the mischevious Jane darted from his side, and
lifted up her hand with a manner of affected deprecation.
Mary rebuked her as was usual on such occasions, and
her rebuke was somewhat seconded by one which was
more effectual. The brother betrayed some little
displeasure
as well in words as in looks, and poor Jane contrived
to make the
amende
by repressing some portion of that
lively temerity of temper which is not always innocuous
in its pleasantries. In this way they proceeded to the
cottage where, in private, the young man contrived to let
his mother know how much he was charmed with the
mysterious lady, but not how much of his admiration he
had revealed. On this head, indeed, he was as little
capable
as any body else of telling the whole truth. He knew
not in fact what he had said. He had felt the impulse to
say many things, and in his conscience felt that he might
have said them; but of the precise nature of his
confessions
he knew nothing. Something, indeed, he might
infer from what he recollected of the language of Anna
Cooke to himself. He could easily comprehend that the
freedom with which she declared her feelings must have
been induced in great degree by the revelation of his own;
but as he had not rightand, by the way, as little wish
to betray her secrets, so he naturally spared himself the
mortification of telling his own. Thus matters stood with
him. His mother listened gravely. She could see in the
faltering tongue and flushed face of her son much more
of the actual state of his feelings than his words declared.
She was not satisfied that her son should fall in love with
Miss Cooke; not that she had any thing against that
young ladyshe had none of the idle prejudices of her
eldest daughterbut that young lady did not impress her
favourably. Mrs. Beauchampe was a very pious lady, and
the feeling of society is so nearly allied to that of pure
religion, that when she found Anna Cooke deficient in the
one tendency, she naturally suspected her equal lack of
the other. But, in the next place, if the old lady had her
objections to the young one, she, at the same time, was
too fond of her son, to resist his wishes very long or very
urgently. She contented herself with suggesting some
grounds of objection which the ardency and eloquence of
the latter found but little difficulty in overcoming. At all
events it was arranged that Beauchampe should take his
sisters the next day to visit his fair, and, so far, tyrannical
enslaver.
From this visit Beauchampe, though without knowing
exactly why, had considerable expectations. At least he
did not despair of seeing the young lady. The old one
politely kept sick, much, it may be added, to the
annoyance
of her daughter. The day came, and breakfast was
scarcely over before the impetuous youth began to exhibit
his anxiety. But the sisters had to make their toilet, and
something, he fancied, was due to his own. A country
girl has her own ideas of finery, and the difference of
taste aside, the only other differences between herself and
the city maiden, are differences in degree. The toilet is
the altar where vanity not only makes her preparations
but says her prayers. We care not to ask whether love
be the image that stands above it or not. Perhaps there
are few calculations of the young female heart, in which
love does not enter as an inevitable constituent. Certainly,
few of her thoughts are altogether satisfactory, if they
bear not his figures in the woof. Beauchampe's sisters
fairly put his patience to the test; and strange to say, his
favourite sister, Mary, was much the most laggard in her
proceedings. She certainly had never before made such
an unnecessary fuss about her pretty little person. At
length, however, all were made ready. The party sallied
forth, reached the house of Mrs. Cooke, were admitted,
and after a brief delay, the daughter entered the room, to
a very quick march beaten by the heart of our ardent hero.
But, though this accompaniment was so very quick, the
entrance of Anna Cooke was calm, slow and dignified as
usual. She received the party very kindly; and her efforts
to please them while they stayed, seemed as natural and
unconstrained as if the business of pleasing had been a
habit of her life. Jane's apprehensions of being eaten up
soon subsided, and the gentle Mary had the satisfaction of
bringing about, by some inadvertent remark of her own,
an animating conversation between her brother and the
lovely hostess. We say animated conversation, but it
must not be supposed that it was a lively one. The
animation
of the parties arose from their mutual earnestness
of character. The sanguine temperament thus readily
throws itself into the breach, and identifies itself with the
most passing occasions. It was in this way that
Beauchampe
*9
found himself engaged in a brief and pleasant
discussion of one of those topics arising from books, in
which the parties may engage with warmth, yet without
endangering the harmony of the conference; even as a
wild strain of music,from the rolling, rising organ, or
the barbaric drum and saracenic trumpet, will make the
heart thrill and throb again, with a sentiment of awe which
yet it would be very loth not to have awakened.
Beauchampe
was perfectly ravished, the more particularly as
he did not fail to see that Miss Cooke was evidently not
insensible to the spirit and intelligence which he displayed
in his share of the dialogue. The presence of the sisters,
fortunately, had the effect of controlling the brother in the
utterance of those passionate and personal feelings which
had been forced, as it were, from his lips the day previous.
Love was unspoken by either, and yet, most certainly,
love was the only thought of one and, possibly, of both.
But love is the most adroit of logicians. He argues his
case upon the data and criteria of a thousand far less
offensive
topics. Religion, law, politics; art, science,
philosophy
;
all subjects he will discuss as if he had no other
purpose than to adjust their moot points and settle their
vexing contrarieties. The only misfortune is that when
he is donenay, while he is going on, one is apt to forget
the subject in the orator. Special pleader that he is, in
what a specialty all his labours terminate! When Anna
Cooke and Orville Beauchampe separated that day, what
of the argument did they remember. Each readily
remembered
that the speaker was most eloquent.
Beauchampe
could tell you that the fair debater was never so
beautiful in person, so high and commanding in intellect
before; and when Anna Cooke was alone, she found
herself
continually recalling to her mind's eye, the bright
aspect and beaming eyes of the enthusiastic young
lawyer
.
So earnest, so seemingly unconscious of himself as
he poured forth the overflowing treasures of a warm heart,
and a really well stored and vigorous intellect. She saw
too, already, how deeply she had impressed herself upon
his fancy. Beauchampe's heart had no disguises. Strange
feelings rose into her own. Strange, terrible thoughts
filled her mind; and the vague musings of her wild and
scarcely coherent spirit, formed themselves into words
upon her tongue.
Is not this an avenger! she muttered. Is not this
an avenger sent from heaven! I have striven in vain. I
am fettered. It is denied to me to pursue and sacrifice the
victim. Oh! surely woman is the image of all feebleness.
These garments are its badges; and sanction obstruction
and invite injustice. As I am, thus and here, what hope
is there that vengeance can be mine. The conquest of
this enthusiastic youth will afford me the freedom that I
crave, the agent that I need, the sacrifice for which only I
dream and pray. With him the victim may be sought
and found wherever he hides himself, and this crushed
heart shall once more rise in triumphthis trampled pride
be upliftedthe pangs of this defrauded and lacerated
bosom be soothed by the sacrifice of blood! And why
should it not be so? Why? Do I live for any other
passion
?
Do I entertain any other image in my soul? What
is love, to me, and fear, and hope, and joy,the world
without and the world withinwhat but a dark abode in
which there is but one lightone star, red and wild,a
planet rising fiery at the birth of hate, only to set in blood,
in the sacrifice of its victim. Here is one comes to me
bearing the knife. He is mine, so declare his lookshe
loves me, so equally speak his words and actions. Shall
I not use his love for my hate? What is his love to me?
His loveha! ha! ha! His love indeed,the love of a
young ambitious lawyer. Is it not rather the perfection of
vengeance that I should employ one of the tribe for the
destruction of another!
But no, no! why should I involve this boy in my fate.
Why should I make him my instrument in this wild
purpose
.
He is not of the same brood though of that
brotherhood
.
This youth is noble. He is too ardent, too
impetuous
for a deliberate design of evil. His soul is
generous. He feels,he feels!he, at least, is no masked,
no cold blooded traitor, serpent-like, crawling into the open
and warm heart to beguile and sting. No, no! I must
not wrong him thus. He must be spared this doom. I
must brood over it alone, and let the fates work it as they
may. Though, were he but half less ardentcould I
suspect him of a baseness,I should whet the dagger, and
swear him to its use. Yes,at any altar, for that
sacrifice
,though
that altar be the very one on which I was
the sacrificethough it bear the name of love, and held
above it his cruel and treacherous image!
Such were the frequent meditations of the passionate
and proud woman. Her mother prompted these not
unfrequently
without intending it. She, with the sagacity of
an ancient dealer, soon discovered the sort of coin which
Beauchampe was disposed to bring with him into Love's
crowded market place. She readily detected in the
unsophisticated
manners of Beauchampe, the proper material
on which it would be easy for her daughter to work. The
intense, inflamable, impetuous nature was such as a single
glance of those dark, bright eyes,a single sentence from
that mellow, yet piercing, silvery, yet deep-toned voice,
might light up with inextinguishable flame,might prompt
with irresistable impulses. Of course, the old lady had
no knowledge of the one absorbing passion which had
became a mania in the breast of her daughter. Her
calculations
went no farther than to secure a son-in-law;but
of this the daughter had no thought, only as it might be
necessary to effect other objects. Her purpose was to
find an avenger, if any thing; and even for this object,
we have seen from her spoken meditations, she was yet
too generous to seek for such an agent in one so unselfish,
so true-hearted as Beauchampe had appeared. But the
rough-hewing of events was not to be left either to mother,
or daughter, however resolved and earnest might be the
will which they severally or mutually exercised. The
strongest of us, in the most earnest periods of our lives,
move very much as the winds blow. It may hurt our
vanity, but will do our real interests no harm to declare,
that individual man is after all only a sort of moral vane
on the world's housetop. If you find him stationary for
any length of time be sure it is less from principle than
rust.
CHAPTER XII.
So far, the pursuit of Beauchampe had seemingly been
unproductive; but perseverance, where passion is the
impelling
power, will sooner or later work its way to the
object
which it seeks. We pass over numerous small details
which were yet important in bringing about our
conclusion
;
and reach the period when the young lawyer was
at length admitted to the house of Miss Cooke, as a friend
of the family. Love, you are to understand, gentle reader,
was an interdicted subject. But when would love stay
interdicted
?
Can you tell? Not easily, I reckon. It did not
stay so in this case. Time wrought favourably for
Beauchampe
;
enabled him to show his resources of mind and
character. Anna Cooke found him both abler in intellect,
and gentler in disposition than she at first fancied him. It
is one effort of love, to excite the sensibilities into the most
commanding activity; to subdue the sharpnesses of
character
,
even as it subdues the asperities of accent; to throw a
softness into the eyes; a tenderness into the utterance, and,
above all, so suddenly and certainly to lift the mind, that
even the vulgar nature under its influence becomes
modified
,
and the ignorant mind receives at least such an
increase
of intelligence as enables it to conceal its own
deficiencies
.
Neither vulgar nor ignorant, Beauchampe was
yet full of those salient points of character and manner,
which betray the want of that refining attrition of a
metropolis
,
which perhaps no other course of education can well
supply. But love carries with it that instinct of good taste,
that refinement becomes inevitable the moment it is put in
exercise; and without his own consciousness, though it
did not escape hers, our hero, under the eyes of his
mistress
,
underwent a rapid transition of character, from the
rough, sturdy rustic, confident in his independence, and
ignorant of more attractive qualities of behaviour, to the
subdued, unostentatious gentleman, solicitous always of the
sensibilities of those whom he addressed, and nicely
considerate
of that utterance, and those manners, which he
now felt had never before been justly taught the beauties of
forbearance. His improvement in this course of tuition
was rapid. A few weeks made the most surprising changes
in his deportment. His featuresand this fact is not
unimportant
to the psychologist, for it is as dear to all moral
analysis, as it is of unquestionable resulthis very features
became spiritualized, in the wonderful progress which the
spiritual nature was making in his soul. Anna Cooke was
not insensible to this change. Nay, she was not
insensible
to his devotedness. But how could she requite it?
We have seen her reflections. They underwent no change.
Nay, they grew stronger, by a natural tendency, as her
interest in the young man increased. She resolved that he
should not be sacrificed, and this resolve was the necessary
parent of another. She could never give encouragement to
the object of her present lover. She could never be his
wife. No! she already felt too much interested in the
youth, to use her own energetic language, uttered in
midnight
soliloquyto dishonour him with her hand! She
was not conscious of the sigh which fell from her lips
when this determination was spoken. She was not
conscious
,
nor consequently apprehensive, of the progress
which a new passion was making in her heart. That
sigh had its signification, but that, though it fell from her
own lips, was inaudible to her own ears.
Labouring under this unconsciousness with regard to
her own feelings, it was perhaps not so great a stretch of
magnanimity on her part to resolve that Beauchampe should
not be permitted to serve her brooding hatred or to share
in her secret sorrows. Such was her determination. One
day he grew more warm in his approaches. Circumstances
favoured his object, and the topics which they had
discussed
on previous occasions insensibly encouraged this.
Suppressing his eagerness of manner, putting as much curb
as he could on the impatient utterance which was only too
habitual to him, where his feelings were excited, he strove,
in the most deliberate form of address, to declare his
passion
,
and to solicit her hand.
Mr. Beauchampe, she said firmlyI thank you. I
am grateful for this proof of your regard and attachment;
and, in regretting it, I implore you not to suspect me of
caprice, or a wanton desire to exercise the power which
your unhappy preference confers on me. Nor am I
insensible
to your claims. Were it possible, sir, that I could
ever marry, I know no one to whom I would sooner entrust
my affections than to you. But there is an insuperable
bar between usnot to be brokennot to be overpassed.
Never! never! never!
Do not speak thus, dearest Miss Cooke. Spare me
this utterance. What is the barthis insuperable bar, not
to be broken, not to be overpassed. Trust me, it can be
broken, it can be passed. What are the obstructions that
true love cannot remove?
Not these! not these! It is impossible, sir. I do not
deceive myselfI would not deceive youbut I assure
you, Mr. Beauchampe, that the truth I declare is no less
solemn than certain. I can never listen to your prayerI
can never become your wife;no! nor the wife of any
man! The bar which thus isolates me from mankind, is, I
solemnly tell you, impassable, and cannot be broken.
Suffer me to striveit is not in me that your
objections
arise?
No! but
Then suffer me to try and overcome this difficulty
remove this bar.
It will be in vain, siryou would strive in vain.
Not so! declare itsay in what it consists, and
believe
me, if such talents as are mine, such toils as man can
devote, with such a reward awaiting him as that which my
success would secure for me, can effect an object, I must
succeed. Speak to me freely, Miss Cooke. Show me this
bar, this obstacle
Never! never! There, at once, the difficulty rises. I
cannot, dare not reveal it. Ask no more, I entreat you; I
should have foreseen this, and commanded it otherwise. I
have suffered your attentions too long, Mr. Beauchampe,
for your own sakelet me forbid them now. They can
never come to good. They can have no fruits. Here,
before heaven, which I invoke to hear me, I can never
be
Stay!do not speak it! he exclaimed passionately
catching her uplifted hand, and silencing, by his louder
accent, the word upon her lips. Stay, Miss Cooke! be
not too hastybe not rash in this decision. I implore
you for your sake and mine. Hear me calmlyresume
your seat but for a few moments. I will strive to be calm;
but only hear me.
He led her to a seat which she resumed with that air of
recovered dignity and stern composure which shows a
mind made up and resolute. He was terribly agitated in
spite of all his efforts at composure. His eyes trembled
and his lips quivered, and the movements of his frame were
almost convulsive. But he also was a man of strong will.
But for his youth he had been as inflexible as herself. He
recovered himself sufficiently to speak to her in tones
surprisingly
coherent, and with a degree of thoughtfulness,
which showed how completely determined will could
control
the utterance even of extraordinary passion.
Hear me, Miss Cooke. I can see that there is a
mystery
about you which I do not seek to penetrate. You
have your secret. Let it be so still. I love you, deeply,
passionately, as I never fancied it was possible for me or
any man to love. This passion rends my frame, distracts
my mindmakes it doubtful if I could endure life in its
denial. I have seen you only to worship youlost to me,
I lose faith as well as hope. I no longer know my
divinities
I
no longer care for life, present or future. Do not
suppose I speak wildly. I believe all I say. It must be
as I say it. Now, hear me; to avoid this fate, I am
willing
to risk many evilsdangers that might affright the
ordinary man under the ordinary feelings of man. You
spoke the other day of having but a single passion which
was not love!
Hate! she interrupted him to say.
Hate, it was, and that gave birth to another not unlike
it.
Revenge!yes!Revenge! such was her second
interruption. He proceeded.
I understand something of this. You have been
wronged
.
You have an enemy. I will seek him. I will be
your championdie for you if need beonly tell me that
you will be mine.
Will you, indeed, do this?
She rose, approached him, laid her hand on his arm,
and looked into his eyes with a keen, fixed, fixing and
fascinating
glance like that of a serpent. Her tones were very
low, very audible, but how impressive. They sunk not
into his ear, but into his heart, and a cold thrill followed
them there. Before he could reply, however, she receeded
from him, sunk again into her seat, and covered her face
in her hands. He approached her. She waved him off.
Leave me, Mr. Beauchampeleave me now and
forever
.
I cannot hear you. I will not. I need not your
help. You cannot revenge me.
I will! I can! Your enemy shall be mineI will
pursue him to the ends of the earth. But give me his name.
No! you shall not, she said with apparent calmness.
Thus I reject your offeryour double offer. I will not
wrong your generosityyour love, Beauchampe, by a
compliance with your prayer. Leave me now, and O!
come not to me again. I would rather not see you. I
pity youdeeply, sincerelybut, no more. Leave me
nowleave me for ever.
He sunk on his knee beside her. He clasped her hand
and carried it passionately to his lips. She rose, and
withdrew it from his grasp.
Rise, Beauchampe, she said in subdued but firm
accents
.
Let it lessen your disappointment to know that if
I could ever be the wife of any man, you should have the
preference over all. I believe your soul to be noble. I
do not believe you would be guilty of a baseness.
Believing
this I will not abuse your generosity. You are young.
You speak with the ardour of youth; and with the same
ardour, you feel for the moment the disappointment of
youth. The same glow of feeling will enable you to
overcome
them. You will forget me very soon. Let me
entreat
you for your own sake to do so. Henceforward I
will assist you in the effort. I will not see you again.
A burst of passionate deprecation and appeal answered
this solemn assurance, but did not affect her decision. He
rose, again endeavoured to grasp and detain her hand, but
she broke away with less dignity of movement than usual,
and had not the eyes of the youth been blinded by his own
weaknesses, he might have seen the big tear in hers, which
she fled precipitately only to conceal.
CHAPTER XIII.
From
this period Miss Cooke studiously withheld her
presence from the eyes of her infatuated lover. In vain
did he return day after day to her dwelling. His only
reception
was accorded by the mother, whose garrulity was
considerably lessened in the feeling of disappointment
which the course of her daughter necessarily inspired in
her mind. She had had her own plans, which, as she
knew the firmness of her daughter's character, she could
not but be convinced were effectually baffled. To her
Beauchampe declared himself, but from her he received no
encouragement except that which was contained in her
own consent, which, as he had already discovered, did not
by any means imply that of the one object whose consent
was every thing. The old woman pleaded in secret the
VOL. II. 10
passion of the young man, but she pleaded fruitlessly.
Her petition became modified into one soliciting only her
daughter's consent to receive him as before; and to induce
this consent the more readily, Beauchampe pledged
himself
not to renew the subject of love. But Anna Cooke
now knew the value of such pledges. She also knew, by
this time, the danger to herself of again meeting with one
whose talents and worth she had already learned to
admire
.
The feeling of prudence grew stronger as her
impressions
in his favour were increased. This contradiction
of character is not of common occurrence. But the
position
of Anna Cooke was not only a painful but a peculiar
one. To suffer her affections to become involved with
Beauchampe was only to increase her difficulties and
mortifications
.
She felt that it would be dishonorable to
accept
him as a husband without revealing her secret, and
that revealed, it would be very doubtful whether he would
be so willing to take her as his wife. This was a dilemma
which she naturally feared to encounter. We do not say,
that she did not also share in those feelings of
disappointment
and denial under which Beauchampe so greatly
suffered
.
The sadness increased upon her countenance, and
softened its customary severity. She felt the darker
passions
of her mind flickering like some sinking
candle-flame
,
and growing daily more feeble under the antagonist
feeling of another of very different character. The dream
of hate and vengeance which for five years had been,
however baneful to her heart, a source of strength to her
frame, grew nightly less vivid, and less powerful over her
imagination; and hopeless as she was of love, she
trembled
lest the other passions which, however strangely, had
yielded her solace for so long a time, should abandon her
also. For such a nature as that of Anna Cooke, some
strong food was necessary. There must be some way to
exercise and employ those deep desires and earnest
spiritings
of her mind, which else would madden and destroy
her. It became necessary to recall her hates, to renew
her vows and prayers of vengeance, to concentrate her
thoughts anew on the bloody sacrifice which she had so
long meditated in secret. But this was no easy task. The
image of Beauchampe came between her eyes and that of
the one victim whose destruction alone she sought. The
noble, generous, devoted countenance of the one, half
obliterated
the wily, treacherous visage of the other. The
perpetual pleadings of the mother contributed to present
this obstacle to her mind. To escape from this latter
annoyance
,
and, if possible, evade the impression, which, in
softening her feelings, had obliterated some of her hates,
she renewed a practice which she had for some time
neglected
.
She might be seen every morning stealing from
the cottage and taking her way to the cover of the adjacent
forests. Here, hidden from all eyes, she buried herself in
the religious solitude. What feelings filled her heart,
what fancies vexed her mind, what striving forms of love
and hate, conflicted in her fancy, we may perhaps
conjecture
;
but there, alone, save with the images of her
thought, she wasted the vacant hours; drawing her soul's
strength from that bitter weed of hate, the worst moral
poison which the immortal soul could ever cherish.
With Beauchampe the sorrow was not less, and there
was less to strengthen; but that little was not of so
dangerous
a quality. He felt the pang of denial, but the
bitterness
of hate had never yet blighted the young, green
leaves of his youthful affections. He was unhappy, but
not desperate. Still he could not but see, in the course
taken by Anna Cooke, a character of strength and
inflexibility
,
which rendered all prospects of future success,
which looked to her, extremely doubtful. There had been
no relaxing in her rigour. The mother, whose own
sympathy
with his cause was sufficiently obvious, had shown
its hopelessness, even when she most encouraged him to
persevere. Perseverance had taught him the rest of a hard
lessonand the young lover, in his first love, now
trembled
to find himself alone!
Alone! and such a loneliness. The affections of
mother
and sisters no longer offered solace or companionship
to his heart. They no longer spoke to his affections.
Their words fell upon his ears only to startle and annoy;
their gentle smiles were only so many gleams of cold,
mocking moonlight scattered along the dreary seas of
passion
in his soul. He felt that he could not live after this
fashion, for he had still a hopea hope just sufficiently
large to keep him doubtful. Anna Cooke had declared
that her scruples were not to him. The bar which severed
her from him was that which severed her from man. But
for thatsuch was her own assurancehe should be
preferred to all others whom she knew.
That bar! What was it? Beauchampe was not
sufficiently
experienced in the history of the passions, to
conjecture
what that obstacle might be. He fancied, at the
utmost, that her affections might have been slighted; he
knewbut chiefly from books which are not always
correct
in such mattersthat women did not usually forgive
such an offence. Betrothed, she might have been deserted
perhaps with insultand this, he readily thought,
might amply justify the fierce spirit of vengeance which
she breathed. Or, it might be that she had been born to
fortune, and had been wronged and robbed, by some wily
villain, of her possessions. Something of this, he fancied
he had gathered from the garrulous details of the mother.
But even were these conjectures true, still there was
nothing
in them to establish such a barrier as Anna Cooke
insisted on, between his passion and herself. Blinded as
he was by his preference, and, in his own simple
innocence
of heart, overlooking the only reasonable mode by
which such a mystery could be solved, the truly wretched
youth became hourly more so. Failing to find his way
to her presence, he resorted to that process of pen, ink
and paper, which Helose insists was designed by Heaven
expressly for the use of such wretches as Beauchampe
and herself, and his soul poured itself forth upon his sheet
with all the burning effluence of the most untameable
affection
.
Page after page grew beneath his handsevery
line a keen arrow from the bended bow of passion, and
shot directly at the heart. To borrow the phraseology of
the old Spanish teachers of the
estilo culto,
if his tears
wet the paper, the heat of his words dried it as soon.
Beauchampe spoke from his soul and it penetrated to hers.
But though she felt and suffered, she was unmoved. Her
reply was firm and characteristic.
Noble young man, leave me and be happy. Depart
from this place; seek me, see me, think of me, no more!
Why should you share a destiny like mine? Obey your
own. It calls you elsewhere. If it is just to you, it will
be lofty and honourable; if not, at least it will spare you
any participation in one so dreary as is mine. Go, I
implore
you, and cease to endure the anguish which you
still inflict. Go, forget me and be happy. Yet, if not,
take with you as the saddest consolation I can give, the
assurance that you leave behind you a greater suffering
than you bear away. If, as you tell me, the arrow
rankles
in your heart, believe me there is an ever-burning
fire which encircles mine. I have not even the resource
of the scorpion, not, at least, until, my `desperate fang'
has done its work on another brain than my own. Then,
indeed, the remedy were easy; at all events where life
depends upon resolution, one can count its allotted
minutes
in the articulations of a drowsy pulse. Once more,
noble young man, I thank you; once more I implore you
to depart. I will not send you my blessingsI will not
endanger your safety by a prayer of mine. Yet I could
pray for you, Beauchampe. I believe you worthy of the
blessings, and perhaps you would not be injured by the
prayer of one so desolate as I.
This letter, so far from baffling his ardour, was
calculated
to increase it. He hurried once more to the
dwelling
of Mrs. Cooke; but only to meet a repulse.
Tell him, I cannot and will not see him! was the
inflexible reply; and the mother was not insensible to the
struggle which shook the majestic soul and form of the
speaker in uttering these few words. In a paroxysm of
passion, most like frenzy, Beauchampe darted from the
dwelling. That day he rambled in the woods, scarcely
conscious of his course, quite unconscious of any object.
The next, taking his gun with him by way of apology, he
passed in the same manner. And thus for two days more.
Somewhat more composed by this time, his violent mood
gave way to one of a more contemplative character; but
the shadows of the forest were even more congenial to the
disconsolate than the desperate. They afforded him the
only protection and companionship which he sought in
either of his moods. Here he wandered, giving himself
up to the dreary conviction which swells every young
man's heart, when first loving, he seems to love in vain,
that the sun of hope was set for him for ever; and
henceforth
,
earth was little more than a place of tombsthe
solemn cypress, and the Druid mistletoe, its most fitting
decorations; while, under each of its deceptive flowers,
care, and pain, and agony, lay harboured in the forms of
10*
gnat, and wasp, and viper, ready to dart forth upon any
thoughtless hand that stoops to pluck the beauty of which
they might fitly be held the bane.
But, it was not Beauchampe's destiny, as Anna Cooke
had fancied, to escape from hers. In vain had she striven
to save him from it. He was one not to be saved. Mark
the event. To escape himperhaps dreading that her
strength might fail, at some moment, to resist his prayer
to see and speak with her; and tired of her mother's
constant
pleading in behalf of her suitorshe fled from the
house, and, as we have seen, stole away, day by day, to
lonely places, dark, gloomy, and tangled, such as the
wounded deer might seek out, in his last agonies, in which
to die in secret. We have seen already what has been
the habit of Beauchampe in this respect. His woodland
musings had not been without profit. Assured now of the
hopelessness of his pursuit from the stern and undeviating
resolution which the lady of his love had shown, at every
attempt which he made to overcome her determination;
he, at length, with a heavy heart, concluded to adopt her
counsel and to fly from a scene in which disappointment
had humbled him, and where all his most acute feelings
were kept in a state of most painful irritation. But, before
this, he again addressed her by letter. His words were
brief.
I shall soon leave this place. I shall obey you. Yet,
let me see you once more. Vouchsafe me one look upon
which my heart may brood in its banishment. Let me
see that dear imagelet me hear that voicethat voice of
such sweet sorrow. Do not deny me this prayer. Do
not; for in leaving you, dearest, but most relentless
woman
,
I would not carry with me at the last moment, to
disturb the holier impression which you have made upon
my soul, a feeling of the injustice of yours. With a heart
hopeless and in the dust, I implore you. Do not reject
my prayer. Do not deny melet me once more behold
you, and I will be then better prepared to rush away to
the crowded haunts of life, or it may be the more crowded
haunts of death. Life and death! ah! how naturally the
words come together. You have rendered their
signification
little in my ears. You, you only. Yet I ask you not
now to reverse the doom. Is not my prayer sufficiently
humble? I ask you not to spare, not to spare, not to save; only to
soothe the pangs of that departure which you command,
and which seems little less than death to me. On my
knees, I implore you. Let me see you but onceonce
morelet me once more hear your voice, though I hear
nothing after.
To this, the answer was immediate, but the
determination
was unchanged. It said:
I may seem cruel, but I am kind to you. Oh! believe
me. It will console me under greater suffering than any
I can inflict, to think that you do believe me. I am a
woman of woborn to itwith no escape from my
destiny. The sense of happiness, neverthelesss, is very
strong within me. Were it not impossible that I could
do you wrong, I could appreciate the generous love you
proffer me. I feel that I could do it justice. But terror
and death attend my steps, and influence the fortunes of
all who share in mine. I would save you from these,
andworse! You need not to be told that there are
worse foes to the proud, fond heart, than either death or
terror. Fancy what these may be, and fly from me as
from one whose touch is contagionwhose breath is
bondagewhose conditions of communion are pangs,
and trials, andshame! Do not think I speak wildly.
No, Beauchampe, you little dream with what painful
inflexibility
I bend myself to the task of saying thus much.
Spare me and yourself any further utterance. Go, and
be happy. You are yet young, very young. Perhaps
you know not that I am older than you. Not much,
yet how much. Oh! I have so crowded moments with
eventsfeelings, the events of the heartthat I am
grown suddenly old. Old in youth. I am like the tree
you sometimes meetflourishing, green at the top
while in the heart sits death and decay, and, perhaps,
gloomier tenants beside. These I cannot escape,I
cannot
survive. But you have only one struggle before you.
You have suffered one disappointment. It will disturb
you for a while, but not distress you long. You will
find love where you do not seek ithappiness, which
you could never find with me. Go, Beauchampe, for
your sake, I deny your prayer. I will not see you. Do
not upbraid me in your soul, nor by your lips. Alas!
you know not how hard is the struggle which I have to
say so much. You know not from what a bondage this
struggle saves you. My words shall not call you back.
No looks of mine shall beguile you. Be you free,
Beauchampe
!free
and happy! If you could but guess the
temptation which I overcomethe vital uses which your
love could be to me, and which I reject, you would thank
meoh! how ferventlyand bless mewould I could
say, how justly! Farewell!Let it be for ever,
Beauchampe
!
Farewell! farewell for ever!
CHAPTER XIV.
Beauchampe
sat, sad and silent, in a corner of one low
chamber in his mother's cottage. The family were all
present. There was an expression in every face that
sympathized with his own. All were sad and gloomy.
A painful reserve, so strange hitherto in that little family
of love, oppressed the spirits of all. They were aware
of the little success which followed his course of wooing.
They, perhaps, did not regret the loss so much as the
disappointment of one whom they so much loved. With
the exception of little Mary Beauchampe, Anna Cooke
had not taken captive the fancy of either of the ladies.
Jane positively feared and disliked her, with the natural
hostility which a person of light mind always entertains
for one of intensity and character. Mrs. Beauchampe's
objections were of another kind; but she had seen too
little of their object, and was too willing to promote her
son's wishes, to attach much importance to them. She
had derived them rather from the casual criticisms of
persons
en passant,
than from any thing which she herself
had seen. It would have been no hard matter for
Beauchampe
,
had he been successful in his suit, to reconcile
all the parties to his marriage. That he was unhappy in
his refusal, made them so; and the feeling was the more
painful as the event had made Beauchampe determine to
depart on the ensuing day. He felt the necessity of doing
so. Active life, the strifes of the politician, the triumphs
of the forum, were at hand, offering him alternatives, if
not atonements. In the whirl of successive performance,
and in scenes that demand promptitude of action, he felt
that he could alone dissipate the spell, or at least endure
its weight with dignity, which the charms of Anna Cooke
had imposed upon him. It may be supposed that the
distress of the little family made the scene dull. Much
was said, and much was in the language of complaint.
Poor Mary wept with a keen sense of disappointment,
more like that of her brother than any one. Jane
muttered
her upbraidings of the scornful, high-headed,
frowsy Indian Queen, who was too conceited to see that
Orville was ten thousand times too good a match for
such as she;while Mrs. Beauchampe, with the usual
afflicting philosophy of age which has survived passion,
discoursed largely on the very encouraging text which
counsels us to draw our consolation from our very
hopelessness
.
Pretty counsel, with a vengeance! Beauchampe
thought it so.
The torturous process to which these occasional
remarks
and venerable counsels subjected him, drove him
forth at an early hour after dinner. Once more he
traversed
the woods in moody meditation. He inly resolved
that he should see them the last time. With this resolve
he determined to pay a personal visit to the spot where,
at his coming, he had obtained the first sight of the
woman
,
who, from that moment, had filled his sight entirely.
He followed the sinuous course of the woods, slowly,
moodily, chewing the cud of sad and bitter thought alone.
His passion was in its subdued phase. There is a
moment
of recoil in the excited heart, when the feelings long
for repose. There is a sense of exhaustiona dread of
further strife and excitement, the very thought of which
makes us shudder; and the one conviction over all which
fills the mind, is that we could willingly lay ourselves
down in the shady places, none near, and sleepsleep
the long sleep, in which there are no such tortures and
tumults. Such were the feelings of Beauchampe, and
thus languid, from this recoil, in the overcharged
sensibilities
,
he went slowly forward, with a movement that
denoted
quite as much feebleness as grief. He was already
buried in the thick woodshe fancied himself alone
when, suddenly, he heard a pistol shot. He started, with
a sudden recollection of a like sound, which had attracted
his ears on his first approach to the same neighbourhood.
The coincidence was at least a strange one. He now
determined to find out the practitioner. He paused for a
few moments, and looked about him. He was not
exactly
sure of the quarter whence the sound proceeded;
but he moved forward cautiously and at a venture.
Suddenly
,
he paused! He discovered, at a distance, the
person of the very woman whom he had been so long
seeking; she, whose obduracy denied him even the boon
of a last look and farewell accent. His first impulse was
to rush forward. A second and different impulse was
forced on him by what he saw. To his astonished eyes
she bore in her hands a pistol. He watched her while
she loaded if. He saw her level it at a tree, and pull the
trigger with unhesitating hand. The bark flew on every
side, betraying, by the truth of her aim, at a considerable
distance, the constancy of her practice.
Beauchampe could contain himself no longer. He now
rushed forward. A faint cry escaped her as she beheld
him. She dropped the pistol by her side, clasped and
covered her face with her hands and staggered back a
few paces. But before Beauchampe reached her, she had
recovered, and picking up the pistol, she came forward.
Her eye sparkled with an expression which showed
something like resentment. Her voice was abrupt and
sharp.
You rush on your fate! she exclaimed. Why,
Beauchampe, do you thus pursue me, and risk your own
destruction?
At your hand, it is welcome! he exclaimed,
mistaking
her meaning.
I mean not
that!
she replied.
But you inflict it!
No! no! impatiently. I do not. I have prayed
against itwould spare you that and every risk; but you
will it otherwise! You rush on your fate, and if you
dare, Beauchampemark me! If you dareit is at your
option. Heretofore, I have striven for you and against
myself; but you have forced yourself upon my privacy
you have sought to fathom my secrets, and it is now
necessary that you should bear the penalty of forbidden
knowledge!
Have I not supplicated you for these penalties? Ah!
what pain inflicted by your hand would not be
pleasure
!
You love me?I believe you, Beauchampe, but the
secret of my soul, is the deathblow to your love. Ah!
spare me,even now I would have you spare me. Go
leave me for ever; put no faith into a mystery, which
must shock you to hear, shame me to speak,and leads,
if it drives you not hence with the speed of terrorleads
you to sorrow and certain strife, and possibly the cruelest
doom.
Speak! I brave all! I am your bondsmanyour
slavedeclare the servicelet me break down these
barriers which divide us.
He caught her hand passionately in his as he spoke,
and pressed it to his lips. She did not withdraw it.
Beauchampe! she said, with solemnity, fixing her
dark, deep-glancing eyes upon his faceBeauchampe!
I will not swear you! You shall hear the truth, and
still be free. Know then that you clasp a dishonoured
hand!
The terrible words were spoken. The effect was
instantaneous
.
He dropped the hand which he had grasped.
A burning flush crimsoned the face of the woman; an
instant after it was succeeded by the paleness of death.
I knew it! she exclaimed, bitterly, and with cruel
keenness of utterance. I knew that it would come to
this. God! this is thy creature, man! In his selfishness
he destroys,in his selfishness he shames us. He pries
into our hearts to declare their weaknessto point out
their spots,to say, see how I can triumph over, and
trample upon!
Anna! exclaimed Beauchampe in husky accents,
speak not thusthink not thusgive me but a
moment's
time for thought. I was not prepared for this.
The young man looked like one in a dream. A ghastly
expression marked his eyes. His lips were parted,the
muscles of his mouth were convulsed.
Nay, sir, it needs not. Your curiosity is satisfied.
There is nothing more.
Yes! he exclaimed, there is!
There is! she answered promptly. To clasp the
dishonoured hand and take from its grasp the instrument
of its vengeance. In few words, Beauchampe, this hand
can only be yours, under one condition. Dishonoured
though it is, I tell you, sir, never yet did woman subject
man to more terrible conditions as the price of her love.
I take the hand! he saidere the condition is
spoken.
No, Beauchampe, that cannot be. You shall never
say that I deceived you. As I shall insist on the fulfilment
of the condition, so it is but fair that you be not hooded
when you pledge yourself to its performance.
She withdrew the hand, which he offered to take, from
his contact.
This dishonoured hand is pledged to vengeance on
him who blackened it with shame. Hence its practice
with the weapon of death. Hence the almost daily
practice
of the last five years. Here, in these woods, I pursue
a sort of devotion, where Hate is the deityVengeance
the officiating priest. I have consecrated my life to this
one object. He who takes my hand must adopt my
pledgemust devote himself also to the work of
vengeance
!
He seized it, and took the weapon from its grasp,
with the pistol lifted to heaven, he exclaimed
The oath! I am ready!
Tears gushed from her eyes. She spoke in subdued
accents.
Five long years have I toiled with this delusive dream
of vengeance! But what can woman do? Where can
she seek,how find her victim? Think you, Orville
Beauchampe, that if I could have met my enemy, I would
have challenged the aid of man to do this work of
retribution
?
In my own soul was the strengththere is no
feminine feebleness of nerve in this eye and arm! I should
have shot and struckah! Christ!
She sunk to the ground with a spasm, which was the
natural effect of such passions working on such a
temperament
.
The desperate youth knelt down beside her
in an agony of equal passion and apprehension. He
drew her to his breast, he glued his lips to her cheeks,
scarcely conscious that she was lifeless all the while.
Her swoon however was momentary only. She recovered
even while he was playing the madman in his fondness.
Refusing his assistance and pushing him from her, she
staggered up, exclaiming, in piercing, trembling accents:
What have I donewhat have I said?
Given me happiness, dearest, he replied, attempting
to take her hand.
No, Beauchampe, she answered, let me understand
myself before I seek to understand you. I am scarcely
able though!and as she spoke, she pressed her hands
upon her eyes with an expression of pain.
You are still sick! he observed apprehensively.
I am in pain, Beauchampe, not sick. I am used to
these spasms. Do not let them alarm you. They are
not deadly, and if they were, I should not consider them
dangerous. I know not well what I have said to you,
Beauchampe, before this pain; but as I never have these
attacks unless the agony of mind becomes too intense for
one to bear and live, I conclude that I have told you all.
You know my secretmy shame!
I know that you are the noblest hearted woman that
ever lived! he exclaimed rapturously.
Do not mock me, Beauchampe, she answered mildly.
Speak not in language of such extravagance. You
cannot speak too soberly for my ears, you cannot think
too soberly for your own good. You have heard my
secret. You have forced me to declare my shame! You
had no right to this secret. Was it not enough that I
told you that the barrier was impassable between us?
Did I not swear it solemnly?
It is not impassable.
It is!
No! he exclaimed with looks and accents equally
decisivethis is no barrier. You have been wronged
your confidence has been abused. That I understand.
I care not to know more. I believe you to be all that is
pure and honourable now; and, in this faith, I am all
yours. In this faith I pray you to be mine.
Beauchampe! this is not all! Mere love, though it
be such as yourssimple faith, though so generous and
confidingthese do not suffice. The food is sweetbut
it has little nutriment. My soul is already familiar with
higher stimulants. It needs themit cannot do without
them. I do not ask the man who makes me his wife, to
believe only that I can be true to himand will!I
demand
something more than a confidence like this,
Beauchampe
;
VOL. II. 11
my husband must avenge my dishonour. This
is the condition of my hand. Dishonoured as it is, it has
a heavy price. He must devote his life to the work of
retribution. To this he must swear himself.
I am already sworn to it. The moment which
revealed
your wrong, bound me only as your avenger.
You shall only point to your enemy
Ah! Beauchampe, could I have done so, I should have
needed not to stain your hands with his blood. But he
eludes my sight. I hear no where of him. He is as if
he had never been.
His name! said Beauchampe.
You shall know all, she replied, motioning him to a
seat beside her on the trunk of a fallen tree. You shall
know all, Beauchampe; from first to last. It is due to you
that nothing should be withheld.
Spare yourself, dearest; said Beauchampe tenderly.
Tell me nothing, I implore you, but the name of your
enemy, and what may be necessary for the work of
vengeance.
I will tell you
all
. It is my pride that I should
not
spare myself. It is due to my present self to show that I
am not blind to the weaknesses of my former nature. It
is due to what I
am
to convince you that I can never
again be what I have been. Oh! Beauchampe, I have
meditated often and sadly since I have known you, the
necessity of making this revelation. At our first meeting
my heart said to myself,`the love by which I was
betrayed
,
has at length sent me an avenger!' I saw it in
your instant glancesin the generous earnestness of
your looks and tonesin the fervent expression of your
eyein the frank impetuous nature of your soul! But I
said to myself, `I will deny myself this avenger. I will
reject the instinct that tells me he is sent as one. Why
should I involve this noble young man in a fate so
desperate and sad as mine? It shall not be!' With this
resolve I strove against you. Nay, Beauchampe, I
confess
to you farther, that, even when my will strove most
against you, my heart was most earnest in your favour.
With my increasing regard for you, grew my reluctance
to involve you in my doom. The conflict was close and
trying; and then, when the strife in my mind was greatest,
I meditated what I should reveal to you. I went over
that long and cruel memory in the deep silence of these
woodsin the deeper silence of midnight in my chamber;
I could not escape from the stern necessity which
compelled
the remembrance of those moments of bitterness
and shame. By frequent recall they have been revived
in all their burning freshness; every art of the traitor
the blind steps by which I fellthe miserable mockeries
which deluded me; and the shame which, like a lurid
cloud, dusk and fiery, has ever since hung before my
eyes. All this I can relate, his crime and my folly, nor
omit one fraction which is necessary to the truth.
But why tell all this, dearest. Let it be forgotten,
let all be forgotten except the name of the villain whom it
is allotted me to destroy.
Forgotten! It cannot be forgotten. Nay, more, it is
a duty to remember it, that the vengeance may not sleep.
Beauchampe, I have lived for years on this one thought.
By recalling these bitter memories that thought was fed.
Do not persuade me to forget them. You know not how
much of life depends on the sustenance which thought
derives from this copious but polluted fountain. Deprive
me of this sustenance and I perish. Deny me to declare
all, and I can speak nothing. I cannot curb my nature
when I will; and where would you gather the fuel of
anger should I barely say to you that one Alfred Stevens,
an artful stranger from a distant city, found me a simple
vain child among the hills, and practising on my vanity,
overcame my strength. This would serve but little in
rousing that fierce fire of hate within you which
sometimes
,
even in my own bosom, burns quite too faintly to
be effectual. No, no! you shall witness the progress of
the criminal. You shall see how he spun his web around
my pathmy soul!by what mousing cunning he
contrived
to pull down a wing whose feeblest fancy, in those
unconscious days, was above the mountains and striving
ever for the clouds. You shall see the daily record of its
spasms, which my misery has made. To feel my struggle,
you must share in it from the first.
He took her hand in his, and prepared to listen.
You will feel my hand tremble, said she; the flush
may suffuse my cheek; for oh! do not suppose I tell this
tale willingly. No! I cannot help but tell it. An instinct,
which I dare not disobey, commands me; and truly, when
I think of the instinct that told me you would come, made
you known to me as the avenger when you did come,
and has forced you thus upon my secret, as it were, I
almost feel a holy sentiment in the compulsion which
makes me tell you all. It feels like a solemn duty. It
must be so! A power beyond my own has willed it
the same power is beside us, BeauchampeI feel iteven
now. He will know that I speak nothing but the truth!
He will endow me with strength to tell it all.
CHAPTER XV.
The
story was told. The proud-spirited woman,
moved, as she fancied, by some supernatural influence,
did not spare herself. There was no glozing artifice of
suggestion to soften the darker colours, to conceal the
real characteristics of her heart; its follies, or faults, or
foibles. When she had finished, Beauchampe clasped her
in his arms. He felt that his passion had undergone
increase
.
He was no longer master of himself. Her
superior
will had already made its presence felt in every
impulse
of his soul!
What a change had been effected in a few hours.
Beauchampe returned to his mother and sisters, a newly
excited man. We do not call him happy. We would
not misuse that word, as we fear it is too frequently
misused
.
But, if a man in a pleasant delirium may be
considered
happy, then he was! But happiness is scarcely
consistent with an intense passion, excited sleeplessly in
the quest of a single object. Beauchampe had won the
woman whom he sought. In her, he had not deceived
himself. She was the woman among a thousand, which
he thought her from the first. But, though he exulted,
his mind wandered, and his eyes were fixed and heavy.
There was yet a dark and threatening cloud in his
otherwise
bright atmosphere. Was that cloud a
presentiment
?
Was it the dark sign of that fierce condition of
hate which had been prescribed by love? Could love
prescribe such condition? Was it possible for that meek
sentimentso holy, so certainly from heaven,so
celestial
an element in the economy of heavenwas it possible
for such a sentiment, so openly to toil in behalf of its most
deadly antipathy? Love labouring for hate! It well
might bring a cloud into the moral atmosphere of
Beauchampe's
soul, when he thought of these conditions.
And yet Anna Cooke had really learned to love
Beauchampe
.
There is nothing contradictory or strange in
this. We have painted badly, unless the reader is
prepared
for such a seeming caprice in her character as this.
She is, whatever may be her boast, scarcely wiser than
when she was sixteen. All enthusiasm and earnestness,
she was all confidence then. She is so still. Her
impressions
are sudden and decided. She sees that Beauchampe
is generous and noble-minded. She has discerned the
loyalty of his character and the liberality of his
disposition
.
She finds him intellectual. His frankness wins
upon herhis unqualified devotion does the rest. She
sees in him the agent of that wild passion which had kept
goading her without profit before; and Love, in reality,
avails himself of a very simple artifice to affect his
purposes
.
It is Love that insinuates to herhere comes your
avenger; and, deceived by him, she obeys one passion
when, at the time, she really fancies she is toiling in
behalf
of its antagonist.
See the further argument,felt, not expressedof this
wily logician! He suggests to her that it is scarcely
possible
that Beauchampe will ever be called upon to fulfil
his fearful pledges. For where is the betrayer? For five
years had the name been unspoken in the ears of his
victim
.
For five years he had eluded all traces of herself
and friends. He was gone, as if he had not been; and
the presumption was strong that he was of some very
distant regionthat he would be very careful to avoid
that neighbourhood, hereafter, in which his crime had been
committed; and as, in equal probability, the lot was cast
which made this limited scene the whole world of
Beauchampe's
future life, so it followed that they would never
meetthat the trial to which she had sworn him, would
never be exacted; and, subdued by time, and the absence
of the usual excitements, the pang would be softened in
her heart, the recollection would gradually fade from her
memory, and life would once more be a progress of
comparative
11*
peace, and probably of innocent enjoyment. It
is an adroit, and not an infrequent policy of Love, to make
his approaches under the cover of a flag, which none is so
pleased to trample under foot as he. He knows the usual
practices of war, and has no conscientious scruples in the
employment of an ordinary
ruse
. The drift of his policy
was not seen by the mind of Anna Cooke; but it was,
though less obvious than some of her instincts,not the
less an instinct. Nay, more certainly an instinct; for it
was of the emotions, while those of which she had spoken
to Beauchampe were nothing more than the suggestions
of monomania. Her imagination, brooding ever on the
same topic, was always on the watch to convert all
objects
into its agents; and never more ready than when
Love, coming forward with his suggestions, lent that
seeming aid to his enemy which was really intended for
his overthrow. It was only when she became the wife
of Beauchampe that she became aware of the true nature
of those feelings which had brought about her marriage.
It was after the tie was indissolubly knitafter he had
pressed his lips to hers with a husband's kiss, that she
was made conscious of the danger to herself from the
performance of the conditions to which he was pledged.
The fear of his danger first taught her that it was love,
and not the mere passion for revenge which had wrought
within her from the moment when she first met him. The
moment she reflected upon the risk of life to which he
was sworn, that moment awakened in her bosom the full
appreciation of his worth. Then, instead of urging upon
him the subject of his oath, she shuddered but to think
upon it; and, in her prayersfor she suddenly had
learned
to prayshe implored that the trial might be spared
him, to which, previously, her whole soul had entirely
been surrendered. But she prayed in vain,possibly
because she had learned to pray so lately. Ah! how
easy would be all lessons of good, how easy of
attainment
and of retention, did we only learn to pray
sufficiently
soon. The habit of prayer is so sure to induce
humility, and humility is, after all, and before all, one of
the most certain sources of that divine strength, arising
from love and justice, which sustains the otherwise falling
and fearful world of our grovelling humanity. The wife
of Beauchampe prayed beside him while he slept. She
prayed for mercy. She prayed against that fatal oath.
Far bettersuch was her thoughtthat the criminal
should escape for ever than that his hands should carry
the dagger of the avenger. She now, for the first time,
recognised the solemn force, the terrible emphasis in the
divine assuranceVengeance is mine! saith the Lord.
She was now willing that the Lord should exercise his
sovereign right.
They were man and wife. The bond was fastened for
good and evil; and, in the novel joy of his situation,
Beauchampe lost sight of days, and weeks, and months.
Happiness soon makes the mind idle, and it was
necessary
that our hero should be awakened from his dream
of delight. Law and politics were alike forgotten. He
could have mused away life, nor been conscious of its
passage,thereamid groves of unbroken shade, with
the one companion. Her voice was the sweetness of its
birds, her speech was the divine philosophy which would
not have been unworthy of utterance among the oaks of
Dodona. Her soul, aroused by the sympathy of an ear
which she wished to please, never poured forth richer
strains of eloquence and song. Surely they were not
unhappy then!
One day a letter was put into Beauchampe's hands.
He read it with a cloudy brow.
No bad news, Beauchampe? was the remark of his
wife.
Yes, I am to leave you for awhile. Read that.
He handed her the letter as he spoke. She read as
follows:
Dear Beauchampe
.
The campaign has opened with considerable vigour,
and the sooner you come to the rescue the better. This
fellow, Calvert, is said to be doing execution. At
he carried all before him. He will meet the people at
Bowling Green on the 7th. You must contrive to meet
us there; or, shall I take you in my way down?
Barnabas
comes with meinsists that we shall need every
help, and has really contrived to make me a little
apprehensive
that we have been remiss, from too much
confidence
.
This man, Calvert, is said to be a giant.
Barnabas
thinks him one of the most popular orators we have
ever had. He has a fine voice, excellent manners, is very
fluent, and has his argument at his finger ends. I cannot
think that I have any reason to fear him whenever I can
meet with him in person. But this, just now, is the
difficulty
.
The difference between a young lawyer in little
practice, and one with his hands full, is something
important
.
Should I not join you on the 6th, you had better
go on to the Green. He will be there by that time. I
will meet you there certainly by the 8th; though I shall
make an effort to take the stump on the 7th, if I can.
Should I fail, however, as is possible, you must be there
to take it for me, and maintain it till I come. Barnabas
and myself will then relieve you, and finish the game.
Why do we not hear from you? Whisker-Ben said
at Club last night that he had heard some rumour that
you were married or about to be married. We take it
for granted, however, that the invention is his own.
Barnabas flatly denied it, and even the Pope, (his nose by
the way is thoroughly recovered) expressed his opinion
that you were `no such ass.' Of course, he suffered
neither his own, nor my wife, to hear this complimentary
opinion. One thing, however, was agreed upon among
us, viz: that you were just the man, not only to do a
foolish thing, but an impolitic one, and a vote was carried,
nem. con.,
in which it was resolved to inform you that,
in `the opinion of this Club, marriage is a valuable
consideration
.'
A word to the wise, &c. You know the
proverb. Barnabas spoke to this subject. Whisker-Ben,
too, was quite eloquent. `What,' said he, `are the moral
possessions of a woman? I answer, bank notes, bonds,
sound stocks, and other
choses in action
. Her physical
possessions, I count to be lands and negroes, beauty, a
good voice, &c.' His distinction was recognised as the
true one by every body but
Zauerkraout,
who now wears
the red hat in place of Finnikin. He thinks that negroes
should be counted among the moral possessions, or, at
least, as of a mixed character, moral and physical. I
will not trouble you with more of the debate than the
summary. An inquiry was made into your qualities, and
the chances before you, and you were then rated, and
found to be worth seventy-five thousand dollars, the
interest of which, at seven per cent., being near four
thousand
dollars, it was resolved that you be counselled not
to marry any woman whose income is less. A certificate
of so much stock in the Club will be despatched you to
assist in any future operations; as a friend to yourself,
not less than to the Club, let me exhort you to give heed
to its counsels. `Marriage is a valuable consideration.'
Marry no woman whose income is not quite as good as
your own. As a lawyer in tolerable practice, you may
fairly estimate your capital at thirty or forty thousand
dollars. If you have a pretty woman near you, before
you look at her again, see what she's worth; and lose
sight of her as soon as you can, unless she brings in a
capital to the concern, equal to your own. Be as little of
a boy in these matters as possible. In no other, I think,
are you likely to be a boy! Adieu! If you do not see me on
the 6th, start for the Green by the 7th. I shall surely be
there by the 8th. Barnabas sends his blessing, nor does
the Pope withhold his. He evidently thinks less
unfavourably
,
since his nose has been pronounced out of
danger.
Lovingly yours,
W. P.
Sharpe.
J. O.
Beauchampe, Esq.
The wife read the letter slowly. Its contents struck her
strangely. It had a tone of utterance like that of one
whom she had been accustomed to hear. The contents
of it were nothing. The meaning was obvious enough.
Of the parties she knew nothing. But there was the
sentiment
of the writer which, like the key-note in music,
pervaded the performance;not necessarily a part of its
material, yet giving a character of its own to the whole.
That key-note was not an elevated one. She looked up.
Her husband had been observing her countenance. A
slight suffusion touched her cheek as her eyes met his.
Who is Mr. W. P. Sharpe, said she, who counsels
so boldly, and I may add so selfishly?
He is the gentleman with whom I studied lawone
of our best lawyers, a great politician and very
distinguished
man. He is now up for the assembly, and, as you see,
thinks that I can promote his election by my eloquence.
What think you, Anna?
I think you have eloquence, BeauchampeI should
think you would become a very popular one. You have
boldness, which is one great essential. You have a lively
imagination and free command of language, and your
general enthusiasm would at least make you a very earnest
advocate. There would be something in the causethe
occasionno doubt, and
She stopped.
Go on; said hewhat would you say?
That I should doubt very much whether the occasion
here,
lifting up the letterwould be sufficient to
stimulate
you to do justice to yourself.
The youth looked grave. She noticed the expression,
and with more solicitude than usual, continued
I think I know you, Beauchampe. It is no
disparagement
to you to say I something wonder how such people
as are here described should have been associates of
yours.
Strictly speaking they are not; he replied, with
something of a blush upon his face. I know but very
little of them. But you are to understand that there is
exaggerationwhich is perhaps the only idea of fun that
our people seem to havein the design and objects of
this club. It is a lawyers' society, and Col. Sharpe insisted,
the day that I graduated, that I must become a member. I
attached no importance to the matter either one way or the
other, and readily consented. I confess to you, Anna, that
what I beheld, the only night when I did attend their
orgies, made me resolve, even before seeing you, to
forswear
the fraternity. We do not sympathize, as you may
imagine. But no more does the writer of this letter.
Col. Sharpe is willing to relax a little from serious labours,
and he takes this mode as being just as good as any other.
These people are scarcely more than creatures for his
amusement.
The wife looked grave but said no more, and
Beauchampe
sat down to write an answer. This answer as
may be supposed, confirmed the story of Whisker-Ben,
legitimated all the apprehensions of the club, and assured
the writer of the letter that his counsels of moral
prudence
had come too late. He had not only wedded, but
wedded without any reference to the possessions, such as
had been described as moral at least by the philosophers
of the fraternity.
My wife, said the letter of the writer,has beauty
and youth, and intellectbeauty beyond comparisonand
a grace and spirit about her genius that seem to me equally
so. Beyond these, and her noble heart, I am not sure
that she has any possessions. I believe she is poor; but
really, until you suggested the topic, I never once thought
of it. To me, I assure you, however heretical the
confession
may seem, I care not a straw for fortune. Indeed,
I shall be the better pleased to discover that my wife brings
me nothing but herself.
The letter closed with the assurance of the writer that
he should punctually attend at the gathering, and do his
best to maintain the cause and combat of his friend.
Is this Col. Sharpe so very much your friend,
Beauchampe
?
demanded his wife when he had read to her a
portion of his letter.
He has been friendlyhas treated me with attention
as his pupilhas not spared his compliments, and is what
is called a fine gentleman. I cannot say that he is a
character
whom I unreservedly admire. He is a man of loose
principleslacks faithis pleased in showing his
scepticism
on subjects which would better justify veneration;
and, of the higher sort of friendships which implies a
loyalty almost akin to devotion, he is utterly incapable.
Seeking this loyalty in my friend, I should not seek
him
.
But for ordinary usesfor social purposes,as a good
companion, an intelligent authority, Col. Sharpe would
always be desirable. You will like him I think. He is
well read, very fluent, and though he does not believe in
the ideals of the heart and fancy, he reads poetry as if he
wrote it. You who do write it, Anna, will think better of
him when you hear him read it.
Do you know his wife, Beauchampe?
No,strange to say, I do not. I have seen her; she
is pretty, but it is said they do not live happily together.
How many stories there are of people who do not
live happily together; and if true, what a strange thing it
is, that such should be the case. Yet, no doubt, they
fancied, at the first, that they loved one another; unless,
Beauchampe, they were counselled by some such club as
yours. If so, there could be no difficulty in understanding
it all.
But with those, Anna, who reject the advice of the
club?
Can it ever be so with them, Beauchampe? I think
not. It seems to me as if I should never be satisfied to
change what is for what might be. Are you not content,
beauchampe?
Am I not? Believe me it makes my heart tremble to
think of the brief separation which this election business
calls for. Sharpe little knows what a sacrifice I make to
serve him.
And if I read this letter of his aright, he would laugh
you to scorn for the confession.
No! that he
should
not.
You would not see it, Beauchampe. You are perhaps
too necessary to this man. But who is Mr. Calvertis
he an elderly man?I once knew a very worthy old
gentleman of that name. He too had been a lawyer and
was a man of talents.
This is a very young man, I believe; not much older
than myself. He does not practice in our counties and I
have never seen him. Judge Tompkins brings him
forward
.
You see what Sharpe says is said of him. It will
do me no discredit to grapple with him, even should he
fling me.
Somehow I think well of him already, said the wife.
I would you were with him, Beauchampe, rather than
against him. Somehow, I do not incline to this Col.
Sharpe. I wish you were not his ally.
What a prejudice. But you will think better of the
colonel when you see him. I shall probably bring him
home with me!
The wife said nothing more, but there was a secret
feeling at her heart that rendered this assurance an
irksome
one. Somehow, she wished that Beauchampe might
not bring this person to his house. Her impression
which was certainly derived from his letterwas an
unfavourable
one. She fancied, after awhile, that her
objection
was only the natural reluctance to see strangers, of
one who had so long secluded herself from the sight of
all; and thus she rested, until Beauchampe was about to
take his departure to attend the gathering at Bowling
Green, and then the same feeling found utterance again.
Do not bring home any friends, Beauchampe. I am
not fit, not willing to see them. Remember how long I
have been shut in from the world. Force me not into it.
Now we have security, husbandI dread change of any
kind as if it were death. Strange faces will only give me
pain. Do not bring any?
What! not Col. Sharpe! I care to bring no other.
I could scarcely get off from bringing him. At least I
must ask him, Anna; and, I confess to you, I shall not be
displeased if he does decline. The probability is he will,
for his hands are full.
She turned in from the gate, saying nothing farther on
this subject, but feeling an internal hope, which she could
not repress, that this would be the case. Nay, somehow,
she felt as if she would prefer that Beauchampe would
bring any other friend than this. How prescient is the
soul that loves and fears. Talk of your mesmerism as
you will, there are some divine instincts in our nature
which are as apprehensive of the coming event, as if they
were already a part of it. It is as if they see the
lightning-flash
which informs the event; long before the
thunder-peal
which, like the voice of fame, comes slowly to declare
that all is over.
CHAPTER XVI.
Were
we at the beginning of our journey, instead of
being so far advanced on our way, it would be a pleasant
mode of wasting an hour, to descant on the shows and
practices of a popular gathering in our forest country.
The picture is a strange, if not a startling one. Its more
prominent aspects must, however, be imagined by the
reader. We have now no time for mere description. The
more decidedly narrative parts of our story are finished.
As we tend to the denoument, the action necessarily
becomes
more rapid and more dramatic. The
supernumeraries
cease to thrust in their lanthern-long images upon us.
There is no place for meditative philosophers; and none
are suffered to appear except those who
do
and
suffer,
with the few subordinates which the exigency of the case
demands, for disposing the draperies decently, and letting
down the curtain.
VOL. II. 12
Were it otherwisewere not this disposition of the
parts and parties inevitable,it would give us pleasure to
give a
camera obscura
representation of the figures,
coming
and going, who mingle and dance around the great
political cauldron, during the canvass of a closely contested
election.
Black spirits and white,
Red spirits and gray;
Mingle, mingle, mingle,
You that mingle may.
And various indeed was the assortment of spirits that
assembled to hear liquid argumentand drink it too,on
the present occasion. Fancy the crowd, the commotion,
the sharp jest and the wild laughter, most accommodating
of all possible readers, and spare us the necessity of
dilating
upon it. We will serve you some such scene, with
all its lights and shadows, on some other more fitting
occasion.
Something, however, is to be shown. You are to
suppose
a crowd of several hundred persons, shrewd, sensible
people enough, after their fashionrough-handed men of
the woods, good at the plough and wagon,masters of
the axe, tree-quellers and hog-killers,a stout race, rugged
it may be, but not always rudehospitable, free-handed
ignorant of delicacies, but born with a strong conviction
that much is to be known, much acquiredthat they are
the born inheritors of much,rights, privileges, liberties
sacred possessions which require looking after, and are
not to be entrusted to every hand. Often deceived, they
are necessarily jealous on this subject; and growing a
little wiser with every political loss, they come to their
patrimony with an hourly increasing knowledge of its
value, and its peculiar characteristics. Not much learning
have they, but, in lieu of it, they can tell hawk from
handsaw in all stages of the wind; which is a wisdom
that you learned man is not often master of. You may
cheat them once, nay twice, or thrice, for they are frank
and confiding; but you cannot always cheat them; and
one thing is certain that they can extract the uses from a
politician and then fling him away, as sagaciously as the
urchin, who deals in like manner with the orange sack
which he has sucked. Talk of politicians ruling the
American
people! Lord love you! where do you find these great
rulers after five years? Sucked, squeezed, thrown by, an
atom in the dung-heap. Precious few of these men of
popular dimensions, survive their own clamour. Even
while they shout upon their petty eminences, the world
has hurried on and left them; and there they stand
open-mouthed
and wondering! Waking at length, they ask,
like the shipwrecked traveller on the shore,Where am
I? Where is my people?
My
people. Ha! ha! ha!
There is something worse than mockery in that shout. It
is
my
people that speaks, but the voice is changed. It is
now
thy
people. The sceptre has departed. Ephraim is
no longer an idol among them. They have other gods;
and the late exalted politician freezing, on his narrow
eminence
,
grows dumb for ever,stiffstone eyed,like the
sphinx, brooding in her sinking sands, saying, as it were,
Ask me nothing of what I was, for now see you not that
I am nothing!
Precious little of such a fate dreams he, the
high-cheeked
,
sunburnt orator, that now rallies the stout peasantry at
Bowling Green. He thinks not so much of perpetual
fame as of perpetual office. He has a faith in office which
shall last him much longer than that which he professes to
have in the people. He hath not so much faith in them
as in their gifts. But he fancies notnot hethat the
shouts which now respond to his utterance shall even
refuse
response to his summons. He assumes a saving
exception
in his own case, which shall make him sure in the
very places where his predecessors failed. He hath an
unctuous way with him which makes his faith confident;
and his voice thunders and his eye lightens; and he rains
precious drops among them, which might be eloquence, if
it were not balderdash!
Who is this man! quoth our young hero,
Beauchampe
,
as he listened to the muddy torrent, which, like
some turbid river, having overflowed its banks, comes
down, rending and raging, a thick flood of slime and foam,
bringing along with it the refuse of nauseous places, and
low flats, and swampy bottoms, and offal stalls! The youth
was bewildered. The eloquent man was so sure of his
ground and auditorsseemed so confident in his strength
so little like a doubting giantthat it was long before
Beauchampe could discover that he was a mere wind-bag, a
bloated vessel of impure air that, becoming fixed air
through a natural process, at length explodes and breaks
forth with a violence duly proportioned to its noisomeness.
This cannot be the man, Calvert! soliloquized our
hero. It was not. But, when the wind-bag was
exhausted
which,
by a merciful Providence, was at length the
casethen rose another; and then did
Beauchamp
note
the vast difference, even before the latter spoke, which was
at once evident between the two.
This must be he! he murmured to himself. He was
not mistaken. The crowd was hushed. The stillness,
after those clamours which preceded it, was awful; but
was it not encouraging? No such stillness had
accompanied
the torrent-rushing of those beldame ideas and
bull-dog
words which had come from the previous speaker.
Here was attentioncuriositythe natural curiosity of an
audience about to listen to a new speaker, and already
favourably impressed by his manner and appearance.
Both were pleasing and impressive. In person he was
tall and well madehis features denoted one still in the
green and gristle of his youthnot more than twenty-five
summers had darkened into brown the light flaxen hair
upon his forehead. His eyes were bright and clear, but
there was a grave sweetness, or rather a sweet, mild
gravity
in his face, which seemed the effect of some severe
disappointment or sorrow. This, without impairing youth,
had imparted dignity. His manner was unostentatious and
natural, but very graceful. He bowed when he first rose
before the assembly, then, for a few moments, remained
silent, while his eye seemed to explore the whole of that
moral circuit which his thoughts were to penetrate. He
begun, and Beauchampe was now all attention. His voice
was at first very low, but very clear and distinct. His
exordium consisted of some general principles which the
subjects he proposed to discuss were intended to illustrate,
to confine, and, at the same time, to receive their own
illustration
,
by the application of the same texts. In all this
there was an ease of utterance, a familiarity with all the
forms of analysis, a readiness in moral conjecture, a
freedom
of comparison, a promptness of suggestion, which
betrayed a mind not only excellent by nature but admirably
drilled by the severest exercise of will and art. We do
not care to note his arguments or the particular subjects
which they were intended to elucidate. These were purely
local in their character, and were nowise remarkable,
excepting
as, in their employment, the speaker showed
himself every where capable of rising to the height of those
principles by which it was governed. This habit of mind
enabled him to simplify his topic to the understanding of
his audienceto disentangle the mysteries which the dull
brains, and rabid tongue of the previous speaker had
involved
in a seemingly inextricable mass; and to unveil,
feature by feature, the perfect image of that leading idea
which he had set out to establish. In showing that Mr.
Calvert argued his case, it is not to be understood,
however
,
that he was merely argumentative. The main points
of difficulty discussed, he rose, as he proceeded, into
occasional
flights of eloquence, which told with the more effect,
as they were made purely subordinate to the
business
of
his speech. Beauchampe discovered, with wonder and
admiration
,
the happy art which had so arranged it; and
from wonder and admiration he sunk to apprehension,
when, considering the equal skill of the debater and the
beauty of his declamation, he all at once recollected, towards
the close, that it was allotted to him to take up the cudgels
and maintain the conflict for his friend.
But this was not a moment to feel fear. Beauchampe
was a man of courage. His talent was active, his mood
fieryhis imagination very prompt and energetic. He,
too, was meant to be an orator; but he had gone through
no such school of preparation as that of the man whom he
was to answer. But this did not discourage him. If he
lacked the exquisite finish of manner, and the logical
relation
of part with part, which distinguished the address of
his opponent, he had an irresistible impulse of expression.
Easily excited himself, he found little difficulty in exciting
those whom he addressed. If Calvert was the noble stud
of the middle ages, caparisoned in scale armour, and
practised
to wheel and bound, and rear, and recoil, as the
necessities
of the fight required; then was Beauchampe the
light Arabian courser, who, if he may not combat on equal
terms with his opponent, at least, by his agility and
unremitting
attack, keeps him busy at all points in the work of
defence. If he gives himself no repose, he leaves his
enemy
12*
none. Now here, now there, with the rapidity of
lightning, he fatigues his heavily armed foe by the
frequency
of his evolutions; he himself being less
encumbered
by weight and armour, and being at the same time,
more easily refreshed for a renewal of the fight. Such
was the nature of their combat which lasted, at intervals,
throughout the day. Beauchampe had made his debut
with considerable eclat. His heart was bounding with the
excitement of the conflict. The friends of Col. Sharpe
were in ecstasies. They had been dashed by the superior
eloquence of the new assailant. They feared and felt the
impression which Calvert had made; and, expecting
nothing
from so young a beginner as Beauchampe, they
naturally
exaggerated the character of his speech, when they
found it so far to exceed their expectations. The
compliments
which he received were not confined to the friends
of Col. Sharpe. The opposition confessed his excellence,
and Calvert himself was the first, when it was over, to
come forward, make his acquaintance and offer his
congratulations
.
Col. Sharpe arrived that night. As soon as this fact
was ascertained, Beauchampe prepared to return home.
Sharpe had brought with him two friends, both lawyers,
men of some parts, who rendered any further assistance
from himself unnecessary. The resolution of the new
bridegroom so soon to leave the field, provoked the
merriment
of the veterans.
And so you are really married? And what sort of a
wife have you got, Beauchampe? demanded Sharpe.
You can readily guess, said Barnabas, when you
find him so eager to get home without waiting to see the
end of the business here.
Is she young and handsome, Beauchampe?
And what are her moral possessions, as defined by
Whisker-Ben? was the demand of Barnabas.
The tone of these remarks and inquiries was excessively
annoying to Beauchampe. There was something like gross
irreverence in it. It seemed as if his sensibilities suffered
a stab with every syllable which he was called upon to
answer. Besides, it was only when examined in reference
to the age, appearance and name of his wife, that he
became
vividly impressed with the painful consciousness of
what must be concealed in her history. The burning
blush on his cheeks, when he replied to his companions,
only served to subject his unnecessary modesty to the
usual sarcasms which are common in such cases.
And you will go? said Sharpe.
I promised my wife to return as soon as you came,
and she will expect me.
I must see that wife of yours who has so much power
over you. Is she so very handsome, Beauchampe?
I
think so.
And what did you say was her name before marriage?
was the farther inquiry.
He was answered, though with some hesitation.
Cooke, Cooke! You say in your letter that she's
wonderfully
smart! But, Barnabas we must judge for ourselves,
both the beauty and the wit. Hey, boy! are we not a
committee on that subject?
To be sure we are;for that matter, Beauchampe
could only marry with our consent. He will have to be
very civil in showing us the lady, to persuade us to
sanction
this premature affair.
Do you hear, Beauchampe?
I do not fear. When you have seen her, the consent
will not be withheld, I'm sure.
You believe in your princess, then?
Fervently!
You are very young, Beauchampevery young! But
we were all young, Barnabas, and have paid the penalties
of youth. An age of unbelief for a youth of faith. Thirty
years of scepticism for some three months' intoxication.
But how soon that gristle of credulity hardens into
callousness
!
How long do you give Beauchampe before he gains
his freedom?
That, said Barnabas, will depend very much on
how much he sees of wife, children and friends. If he
were now to set off alone and take a voyage to Canton, the
probability is he would be quite as much a victim until he
got back. Three weeks at home would probably give him
a more decided taste for the Canton voyage, and he would
take a second, and stay abroad longer. Beyond that there
is no need to look; the story always ends in the same
way. I never knew a tale which had so little variety.
There was more of this dialogue which we do not care
to record. The moral atmosphere was not grateful to the
tastes of the young man. Sharpe saw that, and changed
the subject.
You have made good fight to-dayso they tell me. I
knew you would. But you should keep it up. Take my
word, another day here would be the making of you. One
speech proves nothing if it produces no more.
I shall only be in the way, said Beauchampe. You
have Barnabas and Mercer.
Good men and true, but the more the merrier. How
know I whom they will bring into the field?
They will scarcely get one superior to Calvert.
So you like him then?
I dovery much. He will give you a hard fight.
Will he, then? said Col. Sharpe, with some
appearance
of piquewell! we shall seeHeaven send the
hour as soon as may be.
Be wary, said Beauchampe, for I assure you he is
a perfect master of his weapon. I have seldom even
fancied
a more adroit or able speaker.
Do I not tell you you are young, Beauchampe?
Young or old, take my counsel as a matter of prudence,
and be wary. He will certainly prove to you the necessity
of looking through your armoury.
By my faith but I should like to see this champion
who has so intoxicated you. You have made me curious,
and I must see him to-night. Where does he lodge?
At the Red Heifer.
Shall we go to him, or send for him? What say you,
Barnabas?
Oh, go to him, be sure. It will have a good effect.
It will show as if you were not proud.
And did not fear him! Come, Beauchampe, if you
will not stay and do battle for us any longer, pen a billet
of introduction to this famous orator. Say to him, that
your friends Messieurs Sharpe and Barnabas, of whom
you may say the prettiest things with safety, will come
over this evening to test the hospitality of the Red
Heifer. Be sure to state that it is your new wife that
hurries you off, or the conceited fellow may fancy that
he has made you sick with his drubbing. Ho! Sutton
landlord! what ho! there!
The person summoned made his appearance.
Ha! Sutton! How are you, my old boyhav'n't
seen you since the last flood,and what's to be done
down here? What are you going to do? Is it court or
country party hereTompkins or Desha?
Well, kurnel, there's no telling to a certainty, till the
votes is in the box and counted; but I reckon all goes
right, jist now, as you'd like to find it.
Very good,and you think Beauchampe did well
to-day
?
Mighty onexpected well. He'll be a screamer yet, I
tell you.
There's a promise of fame for you, Beauchampe,
which ought to make you stay a day longer. Think
now of becoming a screamer! You said a screamer,
Sutton, old fellow, didn't you?
Screamer's the word, kurnel; and 'twon't be much
wanting to make him one. He did talk the boldest now,
I tell you, considerin' what he had to work ag'in.
What! is this Mr. Calvert a screamer too?
Raal grit, kurnel,no mistake. Talks like a book.
And so, I suppose, said Sharpe, in the manner of a
man who knows his strength and expects it to be
acknowledged
,and
so I suppose you look for me to come out
in all my strength? You will require me to talk like two
books?
Jist so, kurnel, the people's a-looking for it; and it's
an even bet with some that you can't do better than this
strange chap, Calvert.
But there are enough to take up such a bet? Are
there not, old fellow?
Well, I reckon there are; but you know how a nag
has to work when the odds are even.
Ay, ay!we must see this fellow, that's clear. We
must measure his height, breadth, and strength
before-hand
.
No harm to look at one's enemy the night before
fighting him, Sutton, is there?
None in natur', kurnel. It's a sort o' right one has
to feel the heft of the chap that wants to fling him.
Even so, old boyso get us pen, ink, and paper here,
while Beauchampe writes him a sort of friendly challenge.
I say, Suttonthe Red Heifer is against us, is she?
I reckon it's the Red Heifer's husband, kurnel,
said the landlord, as he placed the writing materials. If
'twas the Red Heifer herself, I'm thinking the vote would
be clear t'other way.
Ha! ha! you wicked dog! exclaimed Sharpe, with
a chuckle of perfect self-complacence,I see you do not
easily forget old times.
No, no! kurnel,a good recollection of old times is
a sort of Christian dutyit sort o' keeps a man in
memory of friends and inimies.
But the Red Heifer was neither friend nor enemy
of yours, Sutton?
No, kurnel, but the Heifer's husband had a notion
that t'worn't any fault of mine that she worn't.
Ah! you sad dog! said Sharpe, flatteringly.
A leetle like my customers, kurnel, responded the
landlord, with a knowing leer.
I would I could see her, though for a minute only.
That's pretty onpossible. He's strict enough upon
her now-a-days; never lets her out of sight, and watches
every eye that looks to her part of the house. He'd be
mighty suspicious of
you
if you went there.
But he has no cause, Sutton!
Well,
you say so,
kurnel, and I'm not the man to
say otherwise; but he thinks very different, I can tell
you. He ain't the man to show his teeth; but mark me,
his eye won't leave you from the time you come, to the
time you quit.
We'll note him, Sutton. Ready, Beauchampe?
The youth answered by handing the note to the
landlord
,
by whom it was instantly despatched according to
its direction. A few moments only had elapsed, when
an answer was received, acknowledging the compliment,
and requesting to see the friends of Mr. Beauchampe at
their earliest leisure.
This is well, said Sharpe. I confess my
impatience
to behold this formidable antagonist. Bestir
yourself
,
Barnabas, with that toddy, over which you seem to
have been saying the devil's prayers for the last half
hour. Be sure and bring a hatful of your segars along
with you. The `Red Lion,' I suspect, will yield us
nothing
half so good. Ho! Beauchampe! are you
sleeping
?
A slap on the shoulder aroused Beauchampe from
something
like a waking dream; and he started to his feet
with a bewildered look. He had been thinking of his
wifeand of the cruel portions of her strange history,
to which, as by an inevitable impulse, the equivocal
dialogue
between Sharpe and the landlord, seemed to carry
him back.
Dreaming of your wife, no doubt. Ha! ha!
Beauchampe
,
how long will you be a boy?
Why did those words annoy Beauchampe? Was there
any thing sinister in their signification? Why did those
tones of his friend's voice send a shudder through the
youth's veins? Had he also his presentiments? We
shall see. At all events, his dream, whatever may have
been its character, was thoroughly broken. He turned
to the landlord, and ordered his horse to be got instantly.
You will go, then? said Sharpe.
Yes, you do not need me any longer.
You are resolved, then, not to be a screamer! What
a perverse nature! Here is fame, singing like the ducks
of Mrs. Bond, `Come and catch me;' and dl a bit
he stirs for all their invitation. But he's young,
Barnabas
,
and has a young wife not three weeks old. We
must be indulgent, Barnabas. We must not be too strict
in our examination.
We were young ourselves once, said Barnabas,
kindly looking to Beauchampe.
But do not be precipitate, old fellow. Though
mercifully
inclined, it must be real beauty, and genuine wit,
that shall save our brother. Our certificate will depend
on that. Beauchampe, look to see us to dinner day after
to-morrow.
I shall expect you, said Beauchampe, faintly, as,
bidding them farewell, he left the room.
Ha! ha! ha! Poor fellow! said Sharpe. His
treasures
make him sad. He is just now as anxious and
apprehensive
as an old miser of seventy.
Egad, he little dreams, just now, how valuable the
club will be to him a few months hence, said
Barnabas
.
Every thing to him. Let us drink `The Club,'
Barnabas
.
And they filled, and bowed to each other,
Hob-a-nob
.
The
club!
The Pope!
And the Pope's wife!
No go, that! said Sharpe. Antiques are
masculine
only. She's dead to us. She's too old.
What say you to this wife of Beauchampe, then?
We won't drink her until we see her; though I rather
suspect she must be pretty, for he has an eye in his head.
But what a dd fool to leap so hurriedly, without once
looking after the consideration. That was a woful error!
only to be excused by her superexcellence. We shall
see in season; though, curse me, if I do not fancy he'd
rather see the devil than either of us. He's jealous already.
Did you observe how faintly he said good-night,and
how coldly he gave his invitation? But we'll like his
wife the better for it, Barnabas. When the husband's
jealous, the wife's fair game. Thus saith the proverb.
And a wholesome one! But,did we drink? I'm
not sure that we have not forgotten it. And the speaker
explored the bottom of the pitcher, and knew not exactly
which had deceived him, his memory or his palate.
CHAPTER XVII.
In
one of the apartments of the Red Heifer, two
persons were sitting about this time. One of these was
the orator, whose successes that day had been the theme
of every tongue. The other was a man well stricken in
years, of commanding form, and venerable and
intellectual
aspect. His hair was long and white; while his
cheeks were yet smooth and even rosy, as if they spoke
for a well-satisfied conscience and gentle heart in their
proprietor. The eyes of the old man were settled upon
the young one. There was a paternal exultation in their
glance, which sufficiently declared the interest which he
felt in the fortunes and triumphs of his companion. The
eyes of the youth were fixed with something of inquiry
upon the note of Beauchampe which he still turned with
his fingers. There was something of doubt and misgiving
in the expression of his face; which his companion noted
to ask,
Is there nothing in that note, William, besides what
you have read? It seems to disturb you.
Nothing, sir; nor can I say that it disturbs me
exactly
.
Perhaps every young beginner feels the same
disquieting
sort of excitement when he is about to meet his
antagonist for the first time. You are aware, sir, that
this gentleman, Colonel Sharpe, is the Coryphus of the
opposition. He is the right-hand man of Desha, and has
the reputation of being one of the ablest lawyers and
most popular orators in the state.
You need not fear him, my son, said the elder; I
am now sure of your strength. You will not failyou
cannot. You have your mind at the control of your
will; and it needs only that you should go and be sure
of opposition. Had that power but been minebut it is
useless now! I enjoy my own hoped for triumphs in
the certainties of yours.
So far, sir, as the will enables us to prove what we
are and have in us, so far I think I may rely upon myself.
But the mere will to perform is not alwaysperhaps not
oftenthe power. This man, Sharpe, brings into the
field more than ordinary talents. Hitherto, with the
exception
of this young man, Beauchampe, all my opponents
have been very feeble men,mere dealers in
rhodomontade
of a very commonplace sort. Beauchampe, who is
said to have been a pupil of Colonel Sharpe, was merely
put forward to-day to speak against time. This fact
alone shows the moderate estimate which they put upon
his abilities; and yet what a surprising effect his speech
producedwhat excitement, what enthusiasm! Besides,
it was evidently unpremeditated; for it was throughout
an answer to mine.
But it was no answer: it was mere declamation.
So it was, sir; but it was declamation that sounded
very much like argument, and had the effect of
argument
.
It is no small proof of a speaker's ability, when
he can enter without premeditation upon a subjecta
subject too which is decidedly against him,and so
discuss
itso suppress the unfavourable, and so emphasize
the favourable parts of his cause,as to produce such an
impression. Now, if this be the pupil of Colonel Sharpe,
and so little esteemed as to be used simply to gain time,
VOL. II. 13
what have we to expectwhat to fear, from the presence
of the master?
Fear nothing, William! nay, whatever you may say
here, in cool deliberative moments, you cannot fear when
you are there! That I know. When you stand before
the people, and every voice is hushed in expectation, a
different spirit takes possession of your bosom. Nothing
then can daunt you. I have seen the proofs too often of
what I say; and I now tell you that it is in your power to
handle this Col. Sharpe with quite as much ease and
success
as you have handled all the rest. Do not brood upon
it with such a mind, my sondo not encourage these
doubts. To be an orator you must no more be liable to
fear than a soldier going into battle.
Somehow, sir, there are certain names which disturb
meI have met with men whose looks had the same
effect
.
They seem to exercise the power of a spell upon
my mind and frame.
But you burst from it?
Yes, but with great effort.
It matters nothing. The difficulty is easily accounted
for, as well as the spell by which you were bound. That
spell was in your own ardency of imagination. Persons
of your temperament, for ever on the leap, are for ever
liable to recoil. Have you never advanced impetuously
to grasp the hand of one who has been named to you, and
then almost shrunk away from his grasp, as soon as you
have beheld his face? He was a phlegmatic, perhaps;
and your warm nature recoiled with a feeling of natural
antipathy from the repelling coldness of his. The man
who pours forth his feelings under enthusiastic impulses
is particularly liable to this frigid influence. A deliberate
matter of fact question, at such a momentthe
simplification
into baldness of the subject of his own inquiry, by
the lips of a cynicwill quench his ardour, and make him
shrink within his shell, as a spirit of good may be
supposed
to recoil from the approach of a spirit of evil. Now,
you have just enough of this enthusiasm to be sensible
ordinarily to this influence. You acknowledge it only on
ordinary occasions, however. At first, I feared its general
effect upon you. I dreaded lest it should enfeeble you;
but I soon discovered that you had a will, which, in the
moment of necessity, could overcome it quite. As I said
before, when you are once before the crowd, and they
wait in silence for your utterance, you are wholly a man!
I have no fears for you, WilliamI believe in no spells
none, at least, which need to trouble you. I know that
you have no reason to fear, and I know that you will not
fear when the time comes. Let me predict for you a more
complete triumph to-morrow than any which has happened
yet.
You overrate me, sir. All I shall endeavour to do
will be to keep what ground I may have already won. I
must not hope to make any new conquests in the teeth of
so able a foe.
That is enough. To maintain your conquests is the
next thing to making them; and is usually a conquest by
itself. But you will do moreyou cannot help it. You
have the argument with you, and that is half the battle.
Nay, it is all the battle to a mind so enthusiastic as yours
in the cause of truth. The truth confers a strange power
upon its advocate. Nay, I believe it is from the truth
alone that we gather the last powers of eloquence. I
believe
in the realness of no eloquence unless it comes from
the sincerity of the orator. To make me believe, the
speaker must himself believe.
Or seem to do so.
I think I should detect the seeming. Nay, after a
little while, the people themselves detect it, and the orator
sinks accordingly. This is the fate of many of our men
who begin popularly. With politics,
for a profession,
no
man can be honest or consistent long. He must soon
trade on borrowed capital. He soon deals in assignats
and false papers. He endorses the paper of other men,
sooner than not issue; and in doing business at all hazards,
he soon incurs the lastbankruptcy! Political bankruptcy
is of all sorts the worst. There is some chance of
regaining
caste, where it is lost by dishonestybut never
where it follows from a blunder. The knave is certainly
one thing, but the blunderer may be both. The fool and
knave united are incorrigible. Such a combination is too
monstrous for popular patience. And how many do we
see of this description. I do not think there is in any
profession under the sun such numerous examples of this
combination. Every day shows us persons who toil for
power and place with principles sufficiently flexible to suit
any condition of things; and yet they fail, and expose
themselves. This is the wonderthat, unfettered as they
make themselves at the beginning, they should still
become
bondsmen, and so, convict. They seem to lack
only one faculty of the knaveand that the most
necessary
art.
Their very rejection of law enslaves them. That is
the reason. They set out in a chain, which increases with
every movementwhich seems momently to multiply its
own links and hourly increase its weight. Falsehood is
such a chain. You cannot convict a true man, for the
simple reason that his feet are unimpeded from the first.
A step in error is a step backward, which requires two
forward before you can regain what is lost. How few
have the courage for this. It is so much easier to keep
onso difficult to turn! This chainthe heavy weight
which error is for ever doomed to carryproduces a
stiffness
of the limbsa monstrous awkwardnessan
inflexibility
,
which exposes its burdens whenever it is checked,
compelled to leap aside, or attempt any sudden change of
movement. This was the great difficulty of this young
man, Beauchampe, in the discussion to-day: he scarcely
knew it himself, because, to a young man of ingenuity,
the difficulties of the argument on the wrong side, are
themselves provocatives to error. By exercising ingenuity,
they appeal flatteringly to one's sense of talent; and, in
proportion as he may succeed in plausibly relieving
himself
from these difficulties of the subject, in the same
proportion
will he gradually identify himself with the side he
now espouses. His mind will gradually adopt the point
of view to which its own subtleties conduct it; and, in
this way, will it become fettered, possibly to the latest
moment
of existence. There is nothing more important to
the popular orator than to have truth for his ally when he
first takes the field. Success, under such auspices, will
commend her to his love, and the bias, once established,
his faith is perpetual.
True, William, but you would make this alliance
accidental
.
It must be the result of choice to be worth any
thing. We must love truth, and seek her, or she does not
become our ally.
I wish it were possible to convince our young
beginners
every where, not only that truth is the best ally, but
the only one that, in the long run, can possibly conduct us
to permanent success.
This is not so much the point, I think, as to enable
them to detect the true from the false. Very few young
men are able to do this before thirty. Hence the error of
forcing them into public life before that period. You will
seldom meet with a very young person who will
deliberately
choose the false in preference to the true, from a
selfish motive. They are beguiled into error by those
who are older. It is precisely in politics as in morals.
The unsuspecting youth, through the management of some
cold, cunning debauchee, into whose hands he falls, finds
himself in the embrace of a harlot, at the very moment
when he most dreams of beatific love. The inner nature,
not yet practised to defend itself, becomes the prey of the
outer; and strong indeed must be the native energies
which can finally recover the lost ground, and expel the
invader from his place of vantage.
The case is shown in that of this young man,
Beauchampe
.
It is evidently a matter of no moment to him on
which side he enlists himself just now. There is no
truth involved in it, to his eyes. It is a game of skill
carried
on between two parties; and his choice is determined
simply by that with which he has been familiar. He is
used by Sharpe, who is an older man, and possessed of
more experience, to promote an end. He little dreams
that, in doing so, he is incurring a moral obligation to
maintain the same conflict through his whole career.
Here the conversation was interrupted by the entrance
of a little deformed man, the landlord of the Red Heifer,
who announced Col. Sharpe and his friend, Mr. Barnabas;
and, at the same time, a crowd, consisting of some ten or
twenty of the substantial yeomen of the neighbourhood,
who had been apprised of the meditated visit, and who
longed to be present at a meeting which they fancied
would result in a keen encounter of wit between the rival
orators, followed the visiters. The two gentlemen rose to
receive the guests of the younger. William Calvert felt a
rising emotion at his heart, the sure sign of intense
ambition
,
coupled with those natural doubts of its own strength
and securities, which, it will have been seen in the
previous
dialogue, it was the labour of the elder gentleman to
discourage. The huge beefy-looking landlord of the
opposition
13*
house bustled forward, having the arm of Col.
Sharpe within his. The little deformed master of the
Red Heifer stationing himself beside Calvert, confronted
him, with an air which signified much more of defiance
than satisfaction. Mr. Barnabas advanced towards the
elder Calvert; and the crowd followed and bustled round
to witness the encounter of the intellectual giants. The
parties approached. Col. Sharpe, detaching himself from
the arm of the landlord, extended his hand to his opponent,
and at the same moment, declared his name. Already the
hand of William Calvert was extended, when the light fell
upon the face of his visiter. He recoiled, drew himself
up to his fullest height, and exclaimed, with a voice of
equal surprise and scorn
You, siryou, Col. Sharpeyou!
Sharpe started backthe audience was confounded.
I
am Col. Sharpe! exclaimed that gentleman.
What mean you, sirdo I not see Mr. Calvert?
I cannot know you, sir, was the stern reply of
Calvert
expressed in hoarse and choking accents, his whole
heart swelling with indignation, and his cheek flushed
with almost insuppressible rage.
What do you mean, my son? said old Calvert in a
whisper, drawing close to the young man. What is
this? Who is he?
Sharpe himself, with his friend, now came forward, and,
with rising accents, demanded an explanation.
Why, sir, do you say that you cannot know my
friend? said Barnabas.
Because I know him too well already!
Ha! exclaimed Sharpeknow
me!
Yes! as a villain!a base, dishonest villain!
Sharpe sprang upon him, but with a single grasp
Calvert
flung him aside with a degree of strength which
amply
showed that he might well scorn such an assailant.
Sharpe staggered among the crowd, but did not fall, and,
recovering himself, he was about to renew the assault
when Barnabas interposed.
Stay, Sharpe, this is not the way.
It is notyou are right. See to it!
Mr. Calvert, we must have an apology. The offence
was publicthe atonement must be so also.
Apology! you mistake me, sirperhaps, too, you
somewhat mistake your friend. He will scarcely need
one I imagine, when he knows
me
.
Who are you then, sir?
Let Col. Sharpe, if that be his name
That
is
his name, sirwhat should it be?
I know him by another. Look at me, Alfred Stevens
for such I must still call youlook at me, and behold
one who is ready to avenge the dishonour of Margaret
Cooper. Ha! villain! do you start?do you shrink?
do you remember now the young preacher of Charlemont?
the swindling, smooth-spoken rogue, who sought out the
home of innocence to rob it of peace and innocence at a
blow? Once, before this, we stood opposed in deadly
strife. Do you think that I am less ready now. Then,
your foul crime had not been consummated; would to
God I had slain you then! But it is not too late for
vengeance
!apology,
indeed!will you fight, Alfred
Stevens
?
sayare you as ready now as when the cloth of
the preacher might have been a protection for cowardice.
If you are, say to your friend here, that apology between
us is a word of scorn and no meaning. Atonementblood
onlynothing less will suffice!
Sharpe, staggered at the first address of the speaker, had
now recovered himself. His countenance was deadly pale.
His eyes wandered. He had been stunned by the
suddenness
of Calvert's revelations. But the eyes of the crowd
were upon him. Murmurs of suspicion reached his ears.
It was necessary that he should take decided ground.
Your politician must not want audacity. Nay, in
proportion
to his diminished honesty, must be his increase of
brass. To brazen it out was his policy; and by a strong
effort, regaining his composure, he quietly exclaimed,
looking round him as he spoke
The man is certainly mad. I know not what he
means.
Liar! this will not serve you. You shall not escape
me. You do not deceive
me
. You
shall not
deceive
these people. Your words may deny the truth of what I
say, but your pallid cheeks confess it. Your hoarse,
choking accents, your down-looking eyes confess it. The
lie that is spoken by your tongue is contradicted by all
your other faculties. There is no man present who does
not see that you tremble in your secret soulthat I have
spoken nothing but the truth,that you are the base
villain,the destroyer of beauty and innocence,that I
have pronounced you.
This is strange, very strange! said Mr. Barnabas.
The man is certainly mad, continued Sharpe, or
this is a political charge intended to destroy me. A poor,
base trick, this of yours, Mr. Calvert. It will have no
effect upon the people. They understand that sort of
thing too well.
They shall understand it better, said Calvert. They
shall have the whole history of your baseness. Political
trick, indeed! We leave that business to you whose
very life has been a lie. My friends
Stay, sir, said Barnabas. There is a shorter way
to settle this. My friend has wronged you, you say; he
shall give you redress. There need be no more words
between us.
Ay, but there must. The redress of course;but
the words shall be a matter of course, also. You shall
hear my charge against this man renewed. I pronounce
him a villain, who, under the name of Alfred Stevens, five
years ago made his appearance in the village of
Charlemont
,
and pretending to be a student of divinity obtained
the confidence of the people; won the affections of a young
lady of the place, dishonoured and deserted her. This is
the charge I make against him, which will be sustained
by this venerable man, and for the truth of which I invoke
the all-witnessing Heaven. Alfred Stevens I defy you to
deny this charge.
It is all false as hell!was the husky answer of the
criminal.
It is true as Heaven!said Calvert, and his ass
everation
was now confirmed by that of the aged man by
whom he was accompanied. Nor were the spectators
unimpressed by the firm, unbending superiority of
manner
,
possessed by Calvert, over that of Sharpe, who was
wanting in his usual confidence, and who, possibly from
the suddenness of the charge, and possibly from a guilty
conscience, failed in that promptness and freedom of
utterance, which in the case of his accuser was greatly
increased by the feeling of scorn and indignation which
was so suddenly reawakened in his bosom. The little
landlord of the Red Heifer, about this time made
himself
particularly busy in whispering around that it was
precisely five years ago that Col. Sharpe had taken a trip
to the south, with his uncle, and was absent two-thirds of
the year. How much more the Red Heifer might have
saidfor he had his own wrongs to stimulate his hostility
and memorycan only be conjectured; for he was
suddenly
silenced by the landlord of the opposition house,
who threatened to wring his neck if he again thrust it
forward in the business. But the hint of the little man
had not fallen upon unheeding ears. There were some
two or three persons who recalled the period of Sharpe's
absence in the south, and found it to agree with Calvert's
statements. The buzz became general among the crowd,
but was silenced by the coolness of Barnabas.
Mr. Calvert, said he, you are evidently mistaken in
your man. My friend denies your story as it concerns
himself. We do not deny that some person looking like
my friend may have practised upon your people; but that
he is not the man he insists. There is yet time to
withdraw
from the awkward situation into which you have
placed yourself. There is no shame in acknowledging an
error. You are clearly in erroryou cannot persevere
in it without injustice. Let me beg you, sir, for your
own sake, to admit as much, and shake hands upon it.
Shake hands, and with him! No, no, sir! This
cannot be. I am in no error. I do not mistake my man.
He is the very villain I have declared him. He must
please himself as he may with the epithet.
I am sorry you persist in this unhappy business, Mr.
Calvert. My friend will withdraw for the present. May
I see you privately within the hour.
At any moment.
I am very much obliged to you. I like promptness
in such matters. But,once more, sir,it is not too
late. These gentlemen will readily understand how you
have confounded two persons who look something alike.
But there is a shade of difference as you see in the chin,
the forehead, perhaps, the colour of the eyes. Look closely,
I pray you, for truly I should be sorry, for your own
sake, to have you persist in your error.
Mr. Barnabas, in order to afford Calvert the desired
opportunity of discerning the difference between the
charged and the guilty party, took the light from the
mantel and held it close to the face of Sharpe.
Pshaw! said the latter, somewhat impatientlythe
fellow is a madman or a foolwhy do you trouble
yourself
further. Let him have what he wishes.
The voice of Calvert, at the same moment, disclaimed
every doubt on the score of the criminal's identity.
He is the man! I should know him by day and by
night, among ten thousand!
You won't confess yourself mistaken, then? said
Barnabasa mere confession of erroran inaccuracy
of vision! The smallest form of admission.
Calvert turned from him scornfully.
Very well, sirif it must be so!good people,my
friends, you bear us witness we have tried every effort to
obtain peace. We are very pacific. But there is a point
beyond which there is no forbearance. Integrity can
keep no terms with slander. Not one among you but
would fight if you were called Alfred Stevens. It is the
name, as you hear, of a swindler; a seducer; a fellow
destined for the high sessions of Judge Lynch. We shall
hear of him under some other alias. We have assured the
young gentleman here, that we are not Alfred Stevens,
and prefer not to be called by a nickname; but he
persists
,
and you know what is to follow. You can all
retire to bed, therefore, with the gratifying conviction,
that both gentlemen, being bound for it, and good
Kentuckians
,
will be sure to do their duty when the time
comes. Good night, gentlemen,and may you sleep to
waken in the morning to hear some famous arguments.
I sincerely trust that nothing will happen to prevent any
of the speakers from attending; but life is the breath in
our nostrils, and may go out with a sneeze. Of one thing
I can assure you, that it will be no fault of mine if you
do not hear the eloquence, at least, of Mr. Barnabas.
Hurra for Barnabas! Hurra! was the cry.
Hurra for Barnabas! the echo.
Calvert for ever! roared the trombone in the corner;
and the several instruments followed for Sharpe, Calvert,
and Barnabas, according to the sort of pipes and stops
with which Providence had kindly blessed them.
CHAPTER XVIII.
I know
that this is unavoidable. I know not well,
my son, how you could have acted otherwise than you
did,and yet the whole affair is very shocking.
Thus began the elder Calvert to the younger, when
they again found themselves alone together.
It is; but crime is shocking; and death is shocking;
and a thousand events that, nevertheless, occur hourly in
life. Our best philosophy, when they seem unavoidable,
is to prepare for them as resolutely as we prepare for
death.
It may be death, my son, said the other with a
shudder.
And if it were, sir, I should gladly meet death that I
might have the power of avenging. Oh God! when I
think of
her
so beautiful, so proud, so brightso dear
to me thenso dear to me, even now,I feel how
worthless
to me are the triumphs,how little worth is life
itself!
And a passionate flood of tears concluded the words of
the speaker.
Give not way thus, my son. Be a man.
Am I not? God! what have I not endured? What
have I not overcome? Will you not suffer a moment's
weaknessnot even when I think of her. Oh, Margaret,
but for this serpent in our Eden what might we not have
been. How might we have lovedhow happy might
have passed these days which are now toil and
hopelessness
to me; which are shame and desolation to you! But
for this serpent we had both been happy.
No, my son! that would have been impossible. But
the speculation is useless now!
Worse than useless!
Why brood upon it then?
For that very reason; as one broods over his loss,
who does not value his gain. It is thus I think of
her,
and cease to think of these successes. What are they to
me? Nothing! ah! what might they not have been had
she been mine? Oh! my father,I think of herher
beautyher genius,as of some fallen angel. I look
upon this wretch as I should regard the fiend. The hoof
is wanting, it is true, but the mark of the beast is in his
face. It can surely be no crime to slay such a wretch,
murder it cannot be!
You think not of yourself, William.
Yes!he may kill me; but thinking of her, the
fallen,and of him the beguiler,I have no fear of death
I know not that I have a love of lifeI think only of
the chance accorded me of avenging the cruel overthrow.
The re-entrance of Mr. Barnabas, interrupted the
dialogue
.
He came to make the necessary arrangements.
Very awkward business, Mr. Calverttoo late now
for adjustment. May I have the pleasure of knowing the
name of your friend.
Calvert named Major Hawick, a young gentleman of
his party; but the old man interfered
I will act for you, William.
You! said the young man.
You, old gentleman! exclaimed Mr. Barnabas.
Yes, replied old Calvert, with spirit, shall I be
more reluctant than you to serve my friend. This, sir,
is my son by adoption. I love him as if he were my own.
I love him better than life. Shall I leave him at the very
time when life is perilled. No! no! I am sorry for this
affair, but will stand by him to the last. Let us discuss
the arrangements.
You've seen service before, old gentleman, said
Barnabas
,
looking the eulogium which he did not express.
I, too, have been young, said the other.
True blue, still, said Barnabas; and though I'm
sorry for the affair, yet, it gives me pleasure to deal with
a gentleman of the right spirit. I trust that your son is
a shot.
He has nerve and eye!
Good things enoughvery necessary things, but a
spice of practice does no harm. Now, Sharpe has a
knack with a pistol that makes it curious to see him,
if
you be only a looker on
.
Let me stop you, young gentleman, said old Calvert;
when I was a young man, such a remark would have
been held an impertinence.
Egad! said Barnabas, you have me! Are we
agreed then? Shall it be pistols?
Yesat sunrise to-morrow.
Good!
Distance when we meet.
The place of meeting was soon agreed on, and the
parties separated; Barnabas taking his leave by
complimenting
the old gentleman, as a first-rate man of
business.
Of course, said he, after he had reported to Sharpe
the progress of the arrangements; of course you were
the said Stevens. I saw that the fellow's story was true
at the first jump. It was so like you.
How if I deny it?
I shouldn't believe you. 'Twas too natural. Besides,
Whisker-Ben blew you long ago, though he could not tell
the girl's name. Where's she nowwhat's become of
her?
That's the mystery I should give something
handsome
to find out; but you may guess, from the spirit this
fellow has shown, that it wouldn't do for me to go back
to Charlemont. She was a splendid woman!
Was she though? I reckon this fellow loved her. He
must have done so. He looked all he said.
He did! The wonder is equally great in his case.
He was a sort of half-witted rustic in Charlemont
Margaret
despised him;he wanted to fight me before, on
her account, and we were within an ace of it. His name
was Hinkleyto think that I should meet in him the now
famous Calvert. Look you, Barnabas! the pistol is a
way we had not thought of for laying our orator on his
back.
Will you do it?
I must! He leaves me no alternative. He will keep
no termsno counsel. If he goes on to blab this
business
nay,
he can prove it, you seehe will play the
devil with my chances.
Wing him!That will be enough. The fellow has
pluck; and for the sake of that brave old cock, his father,
I'd like him to get off with breath enough to carry him
father.
No, dn him, let him pay the penalty of his
impertinence
!
Who made him the champion of Margaret
VOL. II. 14
Cooper? Were he her husband nownay, had she
even tolerated him, I think I should have let him off with
some moderate hurt; but I owe him a grudge. You have
not heard all, Barnabas!the tone of the speaker was
lowered here, and a deep crimson flush suffused his face
as he concluded the sentenceHe struck me, Barnabas
he laid a cowskin over my back!
The dl he did!
He didI must remember
that!
So you must! So you must!
I will kill him, Barnabas! I am resolved on it! I feel
the sting of that cowskin even now?
So you must, but somehow, dn the fellow, I'd like
to get him off.
Pshaw! you are getting old. Certainly you are
getting
blind. We have a thousand reasons for not letting
him off. He's in our wayhe's a giant among the
opposition
the
crack man they have set up against me.
Even if I had not these personal causes of provocation
do you not see how politic it would be to put him out of
the field. It's he or me. If Desha succeeds, I am
attorney-general
;
if Tompkins, Calvert! No! no! The more I
think of it, the more necessary it becomes to kill him.
But, what if he shoots?
That he does nothe
did
not at least. You must,
at all events, secure me my distance. I suppose you will
have little difficulty in this respect. The old man will
scarcely know any thing about these matters.
You're mistakenhe talks as if he had been at it all
his life. I reckon he has fed on fire in his younger days.
The choice, of course, is his.
A little adroitness, Barnabas, will give us what we
want. You can insinuate twelve paces.
Yes, that can be done, but ten is more usual.
Suppose
he adopts ten?
That is what I expect. He will scarcely accept your
suggestion. He will naturally suppose, from what you
say, that I practise at twelve. This will, very probably,
induce him to say ten, and then I have him on my own
terms. I shall easily bottle him at that distance.
And you will really commission the bullet? You
will kill him?
Must!
Sleep on that resolution first, Sharpe!
It will do no good. It will not change me. This
fellow was nothing to Margaret Cooper, and what right
had he to interfere? Besides,you forget the cowskin.
Oh! true,dn that cowskin! That's the worst
part of the business.
Good night, Barnabas, said Sharpe. See that I do
not oversleep myself.
No fear. Good night! Good night! Dn the
fellow
.
Why did he use a cowskin? A hickory had not
been so bad. Now will Sharpe kill him to a dead
certainty
.
He's good for any button on Calvert's coat; and
there he goes, yawning as naturally as if he had to meet,
to-morrow morning, nothing worse than his
hominy!
CHAPTER XIX.
It
was a something sad sight to see good old Mr.
Calvert
,
till a late hour that night, brushing up the
murderous
weapons, adjusting bullets, and cutting out patches,
with all the interested industry of a fire-eater. It was in
vain that his sonhis adopted son, rather, for the reader
should know by this time with whom he dealsit was in
vain that he implored him to forego an employment which
really made him melancholy, not on his own, but the
venerable old man's account. Old Calvert was
principled
against duelling, as he was principled against war;
but he recognised the necessity in both cases of employing
those modes by which, to prevent wrong, society insists
upon avenging it. He would have preferred that William
Calvert should not go into the field on account of
Margaret
Cooper; but, once invited, he recognised in all its
excellence the good counsel of Polonius to his son.
Beware
Of entrance to a quarrel: but being in,
Bear it that the opposer may beware of thee.
He at least was resolved that William should not go
unprepared and unprovided, in the properest manner, to
do mischief. In the hot days of his own youth, he had
acquired some considerable knowledge of the weapon,
and the laws, rather understood than expressed, which
govern personal combat as it is, or was, practised in our
country. His care was now given, not simply to the
condition of the weapons, but the mind of the combatant.
The modes by which the imagination is rendered obtuse
the hardening of the nervesthe exercise of the eye
and armcould not be resorted to in the brief interval
which remained before the appointed hour of conflict;
and something was due to slumber, without which, all
exercise and instruction would be only thrown away.
But there was much that a judicious mind could do in
acting upon the moral nature of the party; and the
conversation
of old Calvert was judiciously addressed to this
point. The young man, who had by this time learned
to know most of the habitual trains of thought by which
his tutor was characterized, readily perceived his object.
You mistake, my dear sir, he said, smiling, after the
lapse of an hour, which had been consumed as above
described
You
mistake if you think I shall fail in nerve
or coolness. Be sure, sir, I never felt half so determined
in all my life. The remembrance of Margaret Cooper,
the sense of former wrongthe loathing hate which I
entertain for this reptileexclude every feeling from my
soul but one, and that is the deliberate determination to
destroy him if I can.
This very intensity, William, will shake your nerves.
No man is more cool than he who obeys no single feeling.
Single feelings become intense and agitating from the
absence or absorption of all the rest.
Feel my arm, sir, he said, extending the limb.
It is firm,
now,
William; but if you do not sleep, will
it be so in the morning?
YesI have no fear of it.
But you will go to sleep now? You see I have every
thing ready.
No! I cannot, sir. I must write. I have much to
say, which, to leave unsaid, would be criminal. Do you
retire. Hawick will soon be here, who will complete
what you have been doing. He is expert at these
matters
,
and will neglect nothing. I have penned him a note
to that effect. He will accompany us in the morning.
Do you go to bed now.
You
cannot, at your time of life,
do without sleep and not suffer. It cannot affect me;
nay, if I did go to bed, it would be impossible, with these
thoughts in my mindthese feelings in my heartthat I
should close my eyes. I should only toss and tumble,
and become nervous from very uneasiness.
Having finished, the old man prepared to adopt the
suggestion
of the young one. He rose to retire, but the
good night faltered on his lips. Young Calvert, who
was walking to and fro, was struck by the accents.
Suddenly turning he rushed to the venerable man, and
fell upon his neck.
Father!more than father to me! exclaimed the
youthforgive me if I have offended you. I feel that I
have often erred, but through weakness only, not
wilfulness
.
You have succoured and strengthenedyou have
taught, counselled, and preserved me. Bless me, and
forgive me, my father, if in this I have gone against your
wishes and will;if I have refused your paternal
guidance
.
Believe me, I have but one regret at this moment,
and it grows out of the pain which I feel that I inflict on
you. But you will forgiveyou will bless me, my dear
father, and should I survive this meeting, I will strive to
atoneto recompense you by the most fond service, for
this one wilfulness!
God bless you, my son!God preserve you! was
the only reply which the old man could make. His heart
seemed bursting with emotion, and sobs, which he vainly
strove to repress, rose in his throat with a choking,
suffocating
rapidity. His tears fell upon the young man's
shoulder while he passionately kissed his cheek.
God
will
save you, he continued, as he broke away,
and sobbing as he went from sight, his broken accents
might still, for a few seconds, be heard in the reiteration
of this one sentence of equal confidence and prayer.
That
is done!
that
is over! said the youth, sinking
into a seat beside the table where the writing materials
were placed;his hands covered his face for a few
moments
,
as if to shut from sight the image of the old man's
agony. That word of parting was my fear, good old
man! he continued, after the pause of a few moments
what a Spartan spirit does he possess! Surely he loves
14*
me quite as well as father ever loved son before. Yet,
with what strength of resolution he prepares the weapon
prepares to lose me perhaps for ever. I cannot doubt
that the loss will be great to him. It will be the loss of
all. His hope, and the predictions of his hope are all
perilled by this; yet he complains nothe has no
reproaches
!
Surely, I have been too wantontoo rash
too precipitate in this business! What to me is Margaret
Cooper! Her beauty, her talents, and that fair fame of
which this reptile has for ever robbed her? She loved me
notshe hearkened not to my prayer of loveto that
love which cannot perish though the object of its
devotion
,
like a star gone suddenly from a high place at night,
has sunk for ever into darkness. I am not pledged to fight
her battles,to repair her shame,to bruise the head of
the reptile by which she was beguiled. Alas! I cannot
reason after this cold fashion. Is it not because of this
reptile that she is nothing to meand does not this make
her defence every thing, heighten the passion of hate, and
make bloody vengeance a most sacred virtue! It does
it must. Alfred Stevens, I cannot choose but seek to
take thy life. The imploring beauties of Margaret Cooper
rise before me, and command me. I will try! So help
me God, as I believe, that the sacrifice of the reptile that
crawls to the family altar to leave its slime and venom, is
a duty with mandue to the holiest hopes and affections
of man,and is praiseworthy in the sight of God! I
cannot choose but believe this. God give me strength to
make my desire performance!
He raised the pistol, unconsciously, as he spoke. He
pressed it to his forehead. He lifted it in the sight of
Heaven, as if in this way, he solemnized his oath. The
grasp of the weapon in his hand suggested a new train
of emotion.
I may fallI may perish! The hopes of this good
old manmy own hopesmay all be set at nought. Can
it be that in a few hours I shall be nothing? This voice
be silentthis arm cold, unconscious, upon this cold
bosom. Strange, terrible fancy!I must not think of it.
It makes me shudder! It is too late for thoughts
like these. I must be a man now,a man only.
The mere pang
that
is nothing. But
he
thrice a
father,he will feel threefold pangs which shall be more
lasting. Yet, even with him, they cannot endure long.
Who else? My poor, poor mother!
He paused,he drew the paper before hima tear fell
upon the unwritten sheet, and he thrust it away.
There is one other pain! One thought! he
murmured
.
These high hopesthese schemes of greatness
these dreams of ambitionstopped suddenlylike rich
flowers blooming late, cut down at midnight by the
premature
frost! Oh! if I perish now, how much will be
left undone!
Once more the youth started to his feet and paced the
chamber. But he soon subdued the rebellious struggles of
his more human nature. Quieted once more he sought to
baffle thought by concentrating himself upon his tasks.
Resuming his place at the table, he seized his pen. Letter
after letter grew beneath his hands; and the faint gray
light of the dawn peeped in at the windows before he had
yet completed the numerous tasks which required his
industry
.
A tap at the door drew his attention and he opened
it to receive his friend, Major Hawick.
You are ready, said Hawickbut you seem not
to have slept. How's this?you promised me
But could not keep my promise. I had much to do,
and felt that I could not sleep. I was too much
excited
.
That is unfortunate!
It will do no harm. With
my
temperament I do
things much better when excited than not. The less
prepared
,
the better prepared.
Where's the old gentleman?
He sleeps still. We will not disturb him. We will
steal out quietly, and I trust every thing will be over before
he wakens. I have left a note for him with these letters.
But few moments more did they delay. William
Calvert
remedied to a certain extent the fatigue of his night
of unrest, by plunging his head into a basin of cold water.
Their preparations were already made; and they issued
forth without noise, and soon found themselves on the field.
Their opponents appeared a few moments after.
A pleasant morning, gentlemen, said Mr. Barnabas,
but how is it, I do not see my old friend here, eh? I
had a fancy he would not miss it for the world.
A rustling among the bushes at a little distance at this
moment saved William Calvert from the necessity of
answering the question. There was the old man himself.
Ah, William, he said reproachfullywas this
kind?
Truly, sir, it was meant to be so. I would have spared
you this scene if possible.
It was not kind, William, but you meant kindly. You
did not know me, my son. Had I not been here with
you in the moment of danger I should always have felt as
if I had suffered shame.
The youth was touched, and turned aside to conceal his
emotion. The friends of the parties approached in
conference
.
The irregularity of Major Hawick's attendance
being explained, and excused, under the circumstances, he
remained as a mere spectator. The arrangements then
being under consideration, Mr. Barnabas said casually, and
seemingly with much indifference
Well, I suppose, sir, we will set them at twelve
paces!
Very singular that you should offer a suggestion on
this subject; was the reply of Mr. Calvertthis point
is with us.
Oh, surely, surely,but this being about the usual
distance
It is not ours, sir, said the other coolly.
What do you propose then?
Five paces, sir,back to backwheel and fire within
the words one and two.
Col. Sharpe, who heard the words, started and grew
suddenly pale.
A most murderous distance, sir, indeed, said Mr.
Barnabas gravely. Are you serious, sir,do you really
mean to insist on what you say?
Certainly, sir, if I ever jested at all, it should not be
on such an occasion. These are our terms.
We must submit, of course; said the other, as he
proceeded to place his principal. While doing this, Col.
Sharpe was observed to speak with him somewhat
earnestly
.
Mr. Barnabas immediately after, again advanced
to Mr. Calvert and said
In consenting to your right, sir, on the subject of
distance
,
I must at the same time protest against it. The
consequences, sir, must lie on your head only. I have no
doubt that both parties will be blown to the devil!
Hawick also approached and whispered the elder
Calvert
,
in earnest expostulation against this arrangement.
It is impossible for either to escape, he said; they
are both firm men, and both will fire with great quickness.
The distance is very unusual, sir, and if the affair ends
fatally the reproach will be great.
For a moment the old man hesitated and looked
bewildered
.
His eye earnestly sought the form of William
Calvert, who was calmly walking at a little distance. He
was silent for a few seconds; but, suddenly recovering
himself, he murmured, rather in soliloquy than in answer
to his companion
No, no! it must be sowe must take this risk to
avoid a greater. I see through these menthere is no
other way to baffle them.
He advanced to Mr. Barnabas.
I see no reason to alter my arrangement. To a brave
man, the nearer to the enemy the better.
A good general principle, sir, but liable to abuse;
said Barnabasbut as you please. We toss for the
word.
The word fell to Calvert. The parties were placed,
back to back, with a space of some ten feet between
space just enough for the grave of one. With the word,
which was rather gasped than syllabled by the old man,
William Calvert wheeledthe first instant glance that
showed him his enemy drew his fire, and was followed by
that of his foe. In the first few moments after, standing
himself, and seeing his enemy still stood, he fancied that
no harm had been done. Already the words were on his
lips to call for the other pistol, when he felt a sudden
sickness
and dizziness,his right thigh grew stiffened, and
he lapsed away upon the earth, just as the old man drew
nigh to his assistance.
The bullet had entered the fleshy part of his hip, and had
lodged there, narrowly avoiding the bone. These
particulars
were afterwards ascertained. At first, however, the
impression of the old man, and that of Major Hawick,
was, that the wound was mortal. We will not seek to
describe the mental agony of the former. It was now that
his conscience spoke in torturous self upbraidings; and
throwing himself beside the unconscious youth, he moaned
as one who would not be comforted; until assured by the
more closely observing Hawick, who, upon inspecting the
wound, gave him assurance of better things.
Col. Sharpe was more fortunate. He was uninjured,
but he had not escaped untouched. His escape, though
more complete than that of Calvert, had been even yet
more narrow; the bullet of the former actually barking
his skull just above the ear, and slightly lacerating the skin
over his organ of destructiveness. So narrow an escape
made him very anxious to avoid a second experiment,
which William Calvert, feebly striving to rise from the
ground, readily offered himself for. But, while the youth
spoke, his strength failed him, and he soon sunk away in
utter unconsciousness. Thus ended an affair that promised
to be more bloody in its results. Perhaps, it would have
been, but for the arrangement which old Calvert insisted
on. Had the ten paces been acceded, there is little doubt
but that Sharpe, secure in his practice, would have inflicted
a death-wound on his opponent. The alteration of
distance
,
the necessity of wheeling to fire, and a proximity to
his enemy so close as to leave skill but few if any
advantages
,
served to disorder his aim, and impair his coolness.
It was with no small degree of satisfaction that he departed,
leaving his enemy
hors de combat
. We too, shall leave
him, and follow the progress of the more fortunate party,
assured as we are that the wound of our young hero,
though serious, is not dangerous, and that he is in the
hands of those who will refuse sleep to their eyelids so
long as he needs that they should watch.
It will not materially affect the value of this narrative to
omit all farther account of that political canvassing by
which these parties were brought into a juxtaposition so
fruitful of unexpected consequences. It will suffice to say
that, with Calvert removed from the stump, Col. Sharpe
remained master of it. His eloquence that day seemed
far more potential indeed than on ordinary occasions. No
doubt he tried his best, in order to do away with what
Calvert had previously succeeded in doing; but there was
an eclat about his morning's work which materially assisted
the working of his eloquence. The proceedings of the
previous night, and the duel which succeeded it, were
pretty well bruited abroad in the space of a few hours;
and when a man passes with success from the field of
battle to the field of debate, and proves himself equally
the master in both, vulgar wonder knows little stint and
suffers little qualification from circumstances. Nay, the
circumstances themselves are usually perverted to suit the
results; and, in this case, the story, by the zeal of
Sharpe's friends, so far from showing that the quarrel
grew from the facts which did occasion it, was made to
have a political origin entirelySharpe being the
champion
of one, and Calvert of the other party. It may be
readily conjectured, that Sharpe himself gave as much
encouragement to this report as possible. Bold as he
might be he was not altogether prepared to encounter the
odium to which any notoriety given to the true state of the
case would necessarily subject him. His partisans easily
took their cue from him, and were willing to accept the
affair, as a sign of promise in the political contest which
was to ensue. We may add that it was no unhappy
augury. The friends of Sharpe were triumphant, and
Desha,one of those
mauvaise sujets
which a time of
great moral ferment in a country throws upon the surface,
like scum upon the waters when they are broken up by
floods, and rush beyond their appointed boundarieswas
elevated, most unhappily, to the executive chair of the
state.
Thus much is perhaps essential to what should be known
of these matters in the progress of our story. How much
of this result was due to the unfortunate termination of
Calvert's
affair with Sharpe, is difficult to determine. The
friends of the former ascribed their defeat to his wounds,
which disabled him from the prosecution of that canvass
through the state which had been so profitably begun.
They were baffled and dispirited. Their strong man was
low; and gratified with successes already won, and
confident
of the future, Col. Sharp closed the night at Bowling
Green by communicating to Beauchampe by letter, his
purpose of visiting him, on his return routean honour
which, strange enough to Beauchampe himself, did not
afford him that degree of satisfaction which it seemed to
him was only natural that it should.
CHAPTER XX.
Beauchampe
and his wife sat together beside the open
window. It was nighta soft mellowing light fell upon
the trees and herbage, and the breeze mildly blew in
pleasant
gushes about the apartment. In the room was no
light. Her hand was in his. Her manner was thoughtful,
and, when she spoke, her words were low and subdued as
if, in her abstract mood, it needed some effort of her lips
to speak. Beauchampe himself was more moody than his
wont. There is always, in the heart of one conscious of
the recent possession of a new and strongly desired object,
a feeling of uncertainty. Even the most sanguine
temperament
,
feels, at times, unassured of its own blessings.
Perhaps
,
such feelings of doubt and incertitude are intended to
give us a foretaste of those final privations to which life is
every where certainly subject; and to reconcile us, by
natural
degrees, to the last dread separation in death. At all
events nothing can be more natural than such feelings.
Our hearts faint with fear in the very moment when we
are revelling in the sober certainty of waking bliss! When
love, hooded and fettered, refuses to quit his cagewhen
every dream appears satisfied; when peace, fostered by
security, seems to smile in the conviction of a reality
which promises fullest permanence; and the imagination
knows nothing to crave, and even egotism loses its strong
passion for complaint; even then we shudder, as with an
instinct that teaches much more than any thought, and
knocks more loudly at the door of the heart, than any of
its more reasonable apprehensions.
This instinct was at work, at the same moment, in both
their bosoms.
I know not why it is, said Beauchampe, but I feel
as if something were to happen. I feel unacconntably sad
and apprehensive. It is not a fearscarcely a doubt, that
fills my mindnay, for that matter my mind is silentI
strive to think in vain. It is a sort of voice from the soul
a presentiment of evilmore like a dream in its
approaches
,
and yet, in its influence, more real, more
emphatic
,
than any actual voice speaking to my outward ears.
Do you ever have such feelings, Anna?
I have them
now!
she answered in low tones.
Indeed! it is very strange!
He put his arm about her waist as he spoke, and drew
her closer to himself. Her head sunk upon his shoulder.
He did not behold them, but her eyes were filled with
tears. How strange were such tears to her! How
suddenly
had she undergone a changeand such a change!
She who had never known fear, was now timid as a child.
Love is, before all, the great subduer. It was in an
unknown
condition of peace and pleasure that the wife of
Beauchampe had become softened. Apprehension
necessarily
succeeds to conquest. There is no courage so cool
and collected as that which has nothing to lose; and
timidity
naturally grows from a consciousness of large, valuable
and easily endangered possessions. Such was the origin
of the fear in the bosoms of both.
Certainly they had much to lose! Happiness is always
an unstable possession, and we know this by instinct. The
union of the two had perfected the union of the two
families
.
Mrs. Beauchampe, the elder, in the very obvious
and remarkable change of manner, which followed the
marriage of Miss Cooke with her son, had become
reconciled
nay,
pleased with the match. Mary Beauchampe
was of course all joy and all tears; and even Jane, escaped
from the first danger of being swallowed up, was gradually
brought to see the intellectual beauties, and the personal
also, of her brother's wife, without beholding her sterner
aspects. For the present, Beauchampe lived with his
wife's mother, but the two families were together daily.
They walked, rode, sang, read and played together. They
made a little world to themselves, and they were so happy
in it. The tastes of Beauchampe gradually became more
and more refined and elevated under the nicer sway of
feminine
taste, and those delicacies of direction which none
can so well impart as a highly intellectual woman. He no
longer dreamed of such ordinary distinctions as make up
the small hopes of witling politicians. To be the great
bellwether of a clamorous flock, for a season, did not
now constitute the leading object of his ambition. Far
from it. A short month of communion with an
enthusiastic
,
VOL. II. 15
high-souled womanunhappy, perhaps, that she was
sohad wrought as decided a change in his moral nature,
as the love which he brought had operated upon hers.
They were both changed. But it needs that we should
dwell upon the power of Love to tame, and subject, and
elevate the base and stubborn nature. Surely it is no
mere fable, rightly read, which makes him lead the lion
with a thread. Briefly, there is no human beast that he
cannot, with the same ease, subdue.
Before his meeting with his wife, however, Beauchampe
was superior in moral respects to his associates. This
must be understood. He had strength of mind and
ambition
;
he was generous, free in his impulses, and usually
more gentle in their direction than was the case with his
companions. His rudenesses were those of the rustic,
whose sensibilities yet sleep in his soul, like the
undiscovered
gold in the dark places of the sullen mountain. It
was for Love to detect the slight vein leading to these
recesses
,
and to refine the treasure to which it led. Great,
in matters of this sort, is that grand alchemist. The model
of refiners is he! No Rosicrucian ever did so much to
turn the baser metal into gold. Unhappily, as in the case of
other seekers after
projection,
it is sometimes the case that
the grand experiment finishes
in fumo,
and possibly with
a loud explosion.
But it does not become us to jest in this stage of our
narrative. Too sad, too serious, are the feelings with
which we now must deal. If Beauchampe and his wife
are happy, they are so in the activity and excitement of
those sensibilities which are the most liable to overthrow.
In proportion to the exquisite sweetness of the sensation,
is its close approximation to the borders of pain. The
joy of the soul which is the source of all the raptures of
love, is itself a joy of sadness, and yearning and excessive
apprehension. Soon does this apprehension rise to cloud
the pleasure and oppress the hope. This is the origin of
those presentiments, which say what our thoughts cannot
say, and in spite of our thoughts. They grew in the
bosom of Beauchampe and his wife, along with the
necessity
which he felt and had declared, of assuming vigorously
the duties of his profession. These duties required that
he should move into a more busy sphere, and this duty
involved
the removal of his wife from that seclusion in which,
for the last five years, her sensibilities had found safety.
This, to her, was a source of terror; and she trembled
with a singular fear lest, in doing soin going once more
out into the world she had left, she should encounter her
betrayer. Very different now were her feelings toward
Alfred Stevens. For five years had she treasured the one
vindictive hope of meeting him with the purpose of revenge.
For five years had she moulded the bullets, and addressed
them to the mark which symbolized his breast. Her chief
prayer in all this time, was, that she might behold him
with power to employ upon him the skill which she had
daily shown upon the insensible trees of the forest. To
kill him, and then to die, was all that she had prayed for
and now the difference! In one little month all this had
undergone a change. Her feelings had once more been
humanizedperhaps we should say
womanized;
for, in
these respects, women are more capricious than men, and
the transitions of love to hate, and hate to love, are much
more rapid in the case of a grown woman than in that of
a grown man. As for boys, until twenty-five, they are
perhaps little more than girls in breechescertainly they
are quite as capricious. The experience of five years
after twenty-five does more to harden the sensibilities of a
man, than any other ten years of his life.
Great, indeed, was the change in this respect which
Beauchampe's wife had undergone. Not to meet Stevens
was now her prayer. True, she had sworn her husband,
if they did meet, to take his life. But that had been the
condition of her hand;that was before he had become
her husband,before she well knew his value,before
she could think upon the risks which
she
herself would
incur, by the danger which, in the prosecution of this
pledge, would necessarily accrue to him. Nor was her
change of character less decided in another grand
essential
.
In learning to forget and forgive, she had also
learned to forego the early dreams with which her
ambitious
mind commenced its progress.
You speak of fame, Beauchampe, she said, even
while sitting as we have
described
, in the darkness,
looking
forth upon the faint light which the stars shed upon
the garden-shrubbery: you speak of fame,
Beauchampe
,oh!
how I once dreamed of it! Now I care
for it nothing. Rather, indeed, should I prefer, if we
could remain here, out of the world's eye, living to
ourselves
,
and secure from that opinion which we are too
apt to seek; upon which we too much depend;which
does not confer fame, and but too often robs us of
happiness
.
It is my presentiment on this very subject, which
makes me dread the removal to Frankfort which you
contemplate
.
And yet, said he, I know not how we can avoid
it. It seems necessary.
I believe it, and do not mean to urge you against it.
I only wish that it were not necessary. But, being so, I
will go with you cheerfully. I am not daunted by the
prospect, though it oppresses me. How much more
happy, if we could live here always!
No, no, Anna, you would soon sicken of this. You
would ask, why have I married this rustic? You will
hear of the great men around, and will say, `he might
have been one of them.' Your pride is greater than you
believe;you are not so thoroughly cured of your
ambition
as you think.
Oh, indeed, I am! I look back to the days when I
had a passion for fame as to a period when I was under
monomania. Truly, it was a monomania. Oh!
Beauchampe
,
had you known me then!
Why had I not! We had been so happy then,
Annawe had saved so many days of bliss, and then
but it is not too late! Anna, there is no good reason
why a genius such as yours, should be obscuredlost
for ever. The world must know it, and worship it!
The world! Oh, never! she exclaimed, with a
shudder. The world is my terror now! Would we
could never know it.
But why these scruples, dearest?
Why!Can you ask, Beauchampe? Do you forget
what I have beenwhat I am!
You are my wife, and I am a man
. Do you think
the world will venture to speak a word which shall shame
or annoy you?
It is not in its speech, but in its
knowledge!
But what will it know? Nothing.
Unless we meet with
him!
And if we do?
Ah!let us speak of it no more, Beauchampe!
One word only! If we meet with
him, he dies,
and
is thus silenced! Will it be likely that
he
will speak of
that,
which only incurs the penalty of death?
Enough! enough! The very inquirythe
conjecture
which you utter, Beauchampe,is conclusive with
me, that I should not go into the world. With you, as
your wife, humble, shrinking out of sight, solicitous only
of obscurity, and toiling only for your applause and love,
I shall be permitted to pass without indignity,
without
waking up that many-tongued slanderer, that lies
ever in wait, dogging the footsteps of ambition. Were
I now to seek the praises which you and others have
thought due to my genius, I should incur the hostility of
the foul-mouthed and the envious. No moment of my
life would be secure from suspicion; no movement of my
mind, safe from the assaults of the caviller. It is one
quality of errornay, even of misfortuneto betray
itself wherever it goes. The proverb tells us, that murder
will have a tongueit appears to me, that all crimes will
reveal themselves in some way, some day or other.
Better, Beauchampe, that I remain unseen, unknown,
than be known as I am!
Better!But this cannot beyou must be seen
you will be known! The world will seek you, to admire.
Remember, Anna, that I have friends, numerous friends;
among them are some of the ablest men of our
profession
of
any profession. There is no man better able
than this very gentleman, Colonel Sharpe, to appreciate
a genius such as yours.
Do not mock me with such language, Beauchampe.
Instead of thinking of the world's admiration, I should be
thinking only of its possible discoveries. As for Colonel
Sharpe, somehow, I have an impressiongathered, I
know not how, but possibly from his letters, that he
lacks sincerity. There is a tone of scepticism and levity
about his language, which displeases and pains me. He
lacks heart. I only wonder how you should have sought
your professional knowledge at his hands.
You forget, Anna, that I sought nothing at his hands
but professional knowledge; and most persons will tell
you, that I could scarcely have sought it any where with
greater prospect of finding it. He is one of our best
lawyers. As a man, frankly I confess to you, he is not
one whom I admire. You seem to me to have hit his
right character. He has always seemed to lack sincerity;
15*
and this impression, which he made upon me at a very
early period, has always kept me from putting more of
my heart within his power, than was absolutely
unavoidable
.
Ah, Beauchampe, a man of your earnest temperament
knows not how much he gives. You carry your heart
too much in your eyes, in your hand. This is scarcely
good policy.
With
you,
dearest, it was the only policy, he said,
with a smile; while he pressed her closer to his bosom.
Ah! with me!But that is yet to be determined.
You know not yet.
What! are you not mine? Do I not feel you in my
arms? Do I not embrace you?
It may be that you embrace death, Beauchampe.
Speak not so gloomily, my love. Why should you
yield yourself to such vague and nameless
apprehensions
?
There is nothing to cloud our prospect, which,
when I think, seems all bright and cloudless as the night
we gaze on.
Ah!
when you think,
Beauchampebut thought is
no seer, though an active speculator. You forget these
instincts, Beauchampethese presentiments!
I have forgotten mine, he answered, livelily.
Ah! but mine depart not so soon. They rise still,
and will continue to rise.
You brood overyou encourage them.
No! but they seem a part of me. I have always had
them, even in the days of my greatest exultation; when,
in truth, I had no cares to suggest them. They have
marked and preceded, like omens, all my misfortunes.
Should I not fear them then?
Not now: it is only the old habit of your mind which
is now active. Gloomy thoughts and complaining accents
become habitual; and, even when the sun shines, the eye,
long accustomed to the cloud, still fancies that it beholds
it gathering blackly in the distance. Now you are secure.
Your cloud is gone, dearest, never, never to return.
See where it rises, Beauchampe, an image on the
night. How ominous, were these days of superstition,
would that dark image be of our fortunes. Even as
you spoke with such confident assurance, the evening
star grew faint. Love's own star waned in the growing
darkness of the west. Love's own star seemed to shroud
itself in gloom at the prediction which so soon may be
rendered false. Look how fast is the ascent of that
gloomy tabernacle of the storm. Not one of the lovely
lights in that quarter of the sky remains to cheer us.
Even thus, have the lights of my hope for ever gone out.
That first light of my soul, which was the morning star
of my beingits insane passion for fame, was thus
obscured
;then,
the paler gleams of evening which
denoted
love; and how fast after, followed all that troop of
smaller lights which betokened the dreams and hopes of
a warm and throbbing heart. Ah! Beauchampe! faded,
stricken out, not one by one, as the joys and hopes of
others, but with a sudden eclipse that swept all their
delusive
legions at a moment out of sight,never, never to
return!
Say not, never!
Ah! it is my fear that speaksthe long sense of
desolation
and dread which has made up so many years of
my life!It is this which makes me speak, from a
conviction
of the past, with a dark prophetic apprehension of
the future. True, that the love blesses me now, a
delusive
image of which defrauded me before,but how
with the sudden rising of that cloud before my eyes,
even in the hour of your boastful speech, and perhaps,
my no less boastful hope,how can I else than believe
that another delusion, no less fatal than the past, though
now untouched with shame, has found its way to my
heart, beguiling me with hope, only to sink me in despair?
Arouse,
my love
is no delusion; said the husband,
reproachfully.
I meant not that, BeauchampeI believe not that.
Heaven knows I hold it as a truthand the sweetest
truth that my soul has ever known in its human
experience
.
But for its permanence I feared. I doubted not
that the light was pure and perfect; but, alas! I knew
not how soon it might go out. I felt that it was a bright
star shining down upon my soul; but I also feel that
there is a gloomy storm rising to obscure the star, and
leave me in a darkness more complete than ever. Oh!
Beauchampe, if we should ever meet that man!
He dies, Anna!
Oh, no! I mean not that.
Have I not sworn?
Yes! but the exaction of that oath was in my
madness
it
was impious: I shudder but to think of it. May
you never,
never
meet with him.
Amen! I trust that we may never!
Could I but be sure of that!
Let it not trouble you, dearest: we may never meet
with him.
Ay, but we
may;
and the doubt of that dreadful
possibility, flings a gloomy shadow over the dear, sweet
reality of the present.
Be of better cheer, my heart. You are mine. You
know that nothing is left for me to learn. You look to
me for loveyou depend not upon the world, but upon
me. That world, as it can teach me nothing of your
value that can make the smallest approach to the
certainties
which I feel, so it can report nothing in your
disparagement
which your own lips have not already spoken.
Why then should you fear? At the worst, we can only
sink out of the world's sight when its looks irk, or its
tones annoy us.
Ah! that is not so easy, Beauchampe. Once out of
the world's eye, nothing is so easy as to remain so. But
the world pursues the person who has challenged its
regard
;
and haunts the dwelling where it fancies it may
find a spot of shame. Besides, is not
your fame
precious
to me as well as to yourself. This profession of yours,
more than any other in our country, is that which
concentrates
upon itself the public gaze. When you have
won this gaze, Beauchampe, when you have controlled
the eager ears of an audience, and commanded the
admiration
of an admiring multitudeif, at this moment, some
slanderous finger should guide the eye of the spectator
from the commanding eminence of the orator to the form
of her who awaits him at home, and say`what pity!'
ah! Beauchampe!
Speak of it no more, said Beauchampe, and there
was a faintness in his accents while he spoke, that made
it certain that he felt annoyance from the suggestion.
Unwittingly
,
she sighed, as her keen instinct detected the
feeling which her words had inspired. Beauchampe drew
her closer to him, forced her upon his knee, and sought,
by the adoption of a tone and words of better assurance, to
do away with the gloomy presentiments under which her
mood was evidently and painfully struggling.
I tell you, Anna, these are childish fancies!at the
worst, mere womanish fears! Believe me, when I tell
you, that the days shall now be bright before you. You
have had your share of the cloud. There is no lot utterly
void and dark. God balances our fortunes with singular
equality. None are all prosperousnone are all
unfortunate
.
If the youth be one of gloom and trial, the manhood
is likely to be bright and cheerful; while he, who in
youth has known sunshine only, will, in turn, most
probably
be compelled to taste the cup of bitterness for which
he is wholly unprepared. It is perhaps fortunate for all
to whom the bitterness of this cup becomes, in youth,
familiar. At the worst, if still compelled to drink of it,
the taste is more certainly reconciled to its ungracious
flavour. That you have had this poisoned chalice
commended
to your lips in youth, is perhaps something of a
guarantee that you shall escape the draught hereafter. So
far from the past, therefore, flinging its huge dark shadow
upon the future, it should be regarded as a solemn
background
,
which, by contrast, shall reflect more brightly
than were it not, the gay, gladdening lights which shall
gather and burn about your pathway. I tell you, dearest,
I
know
this shall be the case. You have outlived the
stormyou shall now have sunny skies, and smooth seas.
Neither this beauty which I call my own, nor these talents
which are so certainly yours, shall be doomed to the
obscurity
to which your unnecessary fears would assign
them. I tell you I shall yet behold you, glowing among,
and above, the ambitious circle. I shall yet hear the rich
words of your song floating through the charmed assembly,
at once startling the soul and soothing the stilled ear of
admiration. Come, comefling aside this shadow from
your heart, and let it show itself in all its glory. Look
your best smiles, my loveandwill you not sing me
now one of those proud songs, which you sang for me the
other nightone of those which tell me how proud, how
ambitious was your genius in the days of your girlhood?
Do not deny me, Anna. Sing for mesing for me one
of those songs.
She began a strain, though with reluctance, which
declared
all the audacious egotism which is usually felt, if
not always expressed, by the ardent and conscious poet.
The fame for which she had once yearnedthe wild
dreams which once possessed her imagination and
influenced
her hopewere poured forth in one of those
irregular
floods of harmonyat once abrupt and musical
which never issue from the lips of the mere instructed
minstrel. Truly, it might have awakened the soul under
the ribs of death; and the heart of Beauchampe bounded
and struggled within him, not capable of action, yet full,
as it seemed, of a most impatient discontent. Wrought
up to that enthusiasm of which his earnest nature was
easily susceptible, he caught her in his arms ere the strain
was ended, and the thought which filled his mind, arising
from the admiration which he felt, was that which told
him what a sin it would be, if such genius should be kept
from its fitting utterance before admiting thousands. The
language of eulogism which he had used to her a few
moments
before was no longer that of hyperbole: and,
releasing
her from his grasp, while she concluded the strain,
he paced the floor of the apartment, meditating with the
vain pride of an adoring lover, upon the sensation which
such a song, and so sung, would occasion in the souls of
any audience.
The strain ceased. The silence which followed, though
deep and breathless, was momentary only. A noise of
approaching horses was heard at the entrance; and the
prescient heart of the wife sunk within her. She felt as
if this visit were a foretaste of that world which she feared;
and hurrying up to her chamber, while Beauchampe went
to the entrance, she endeavoured, by a brief respite from
the trials of receptionand in solitudeto prepare her
mind for an encounter, the anticipated annoyance from
which was, however, of a very different character from
that to which she was really destined.
CHAPTER XXI.
She
was not suffered to remain long in suspense. The
first accents of the strange voice, addressing her husband
at the door, and which reached her ears in her chamber,
proved the speaker to be no stranger. Fearfully her heart
sank within her as she heard it. The voice was that of
Alfred Stevens! Five years had elapsed since she had
heard it last, yet its every tone was intelligible; clear as
then; distinct, unaltered;in every syllable the same
utterance of the same wily assassin of innocence and love!
What were her emotions? It were in vain to attempt to
describe themthere is no need of analysis. There was
nothing compounded in themthere was no mystery!
The pang and the feeling were alike simple. Her
sensations
were those of unmitigated horror. One stupid
moment, motionless, she stood, then sunk upon her
knees! Her hands were claspedher eyes lifted to
heaven
but
she could not pray. God be with me! was
her only broken ejaculation, and the words choked her.
The trial had come! Her head throbbed almost to
bursting
.
She clasped it with her cold hands. It felt as if the
bony mansion could not much longer contain the
fermenting
and striving mass within. Yet she had to struggle.
It was necessary that the firm soul should not yield, and
hers was really no feeble one. Striving and struggling to
suppress the feeling of horror which every moment
threatened
to burst, she could readily comprehend the relief
that nature could afford hercould she only break forth
in hysterical convulsions. But these convulsions would
be fatalnot to herselfnot to life, perhaps, for that was
not now a subject of apprehension. It would endanger
her secret! That was now her fear. To preserve her
equilibriumto suppress the torments and the troubles of
her soulto keep Beauchampe from the knowledge that
the man he had sworn to slay was his friend, and was
even now a guest upon his thresholdthis was the
important
necessity. It was this necessity that made the
struggle so terrible. She shook like an aspen in the wind.
Her breast heaved with spasmodic efforts that were only
not convulsionsher limbs trembledshe could not well
walkyet she could not remain where she knelt. To
kneel without submissionwhile her soul still struggled
with divided impulseswas to kneel in vain. The
consolation
of prayer can only follow the calmness of the
soul. That was not herscould not be. Yet it was
necessary
that she should appear so. Terrible trial! she
tottered across the room to the mirror, and gazed upon its
placid surface. It was no longer placid while she gazed.
What a convulsion prompted each muscle of her face! The
dilation of those orbs, how could that be subdued? Yet it
must be done.
Thy hand is upon me now!God be merciful!
she exclaimed once more sinking to her knees. Bitterly
now do I feel, how much I have offended. Had these
five years been passed in prayers of penitence rather than
of pridein prayers for grace rather than of vengeance, it
had not been hard to pray now. Thy hand had not been
so heavy! Spare me, Father. Let this trial be light.
Let me recover strengthgive me composure for this
fearful meeting!
She started to her feet. She heard a movement in her
mother's apartment. That restless old lady, apprised of
the arrival of the expected visiters, was preparing to make
her appearance below. It was necessary that she should
be forewarned, else she might endanger every thing.
With this new fear, she acquired strength. She hurried
to her mother's apartment and found her at the threshold.
The impatient old lady, agog with all the curiosity of age,
was preparing to descend the stairs.
Come back with me an instant, said the daughter, as
she passed into the chamber.
What's the matter with you, Margaret?you look as if
your old fits were come back to you!
It is likely; there is occasion for them. Know you
who is below?
To be sure I do. Col. Sharpe and Mr. Barnabas.
Who but them?
Alfred Stevens is below! Col. Sharpe and Alfred
Stevens are the same persons.
You don't say so! Lord, if Beauchampe only knew!
exclaimed the old lady in accents of terror.
And if you rush down as you are, he will know;
said the daughter sternly. For this purpose I came to
prepare you. You must take time and compose yourself.
It is no easy task for either of us, mother, but it must be
done. You do not know, for I have not thought it worth
while to tell you, that, before I consented to marry
Beauchampe
,
I told him allI kept no secrets from him.
You didn't sure, Margaret?
As I live I did!
But that was very foolish, Margaret.
No!it was rightit was necessary. Nothing less
could have justified menothing less could have given me
safety.
I don't seeI think 'twas very foolish.
Be it so, motherit is done; and I must tell you
more, the better to make you feel the necessity of keeping
your countenance. Before I became the wife of
Beauchampe
,
he swore to revenge my wrong. He pledged
himself before Heaven to slay my betrayer whenever they
should meet. They have metthey are below together.
Lord have mercy, what a madness was this! cried
the old lady with uplifted hands and sinking into a chair.
Her anxiety to get below was effectually quieted.
It was no madness to declare the truth; said the
daughter gloomilyperhaps it was not even a madness
to demand such a pledge.
And you're going to tell Beauchampe that his intimate
friend and Alfred Stevens are the sameyou're going to
have blood shed in the house?
No! not if I can help it! When I swore
Beauchampe
to slay this villain, I was not the woman that I am
now. I knew not then his worth. I did not then do
justice
to his love which was honourable. My purpose now
is to keep this secret from him, if you do not betray it;
and if the criminal himself can have the prudence to say
nothing. From his honour, were that my only security,
I should have no hope. I feel that he would manifest no
forbearance, were he not restrained by the wholesome fear
of vengeance. Even in this respect I have my doubts.
There is sometimes such a recklessness in villany that it
grows rash in spite of caution. I must only hope and
pray for the best;ah! could I pray!
Once more did the unhappy woman sink upon her
VOL. II. 16
knees. She was now more composed. Her feelings had
become fixed. The necessity of concentrating her strength
and composing her countenance for the approaching trial
was sufficiently strong to bring about, to a certain extent,
the desired results; and the previous necessity of
restraining
her mother, or at least, of preparing her for a meeting,
which, otherwise, might have provoked a very suspicious
show of feeling or excitement, had greatly helped to
increase
her own fortitude and confirm her will. But, from
prayer she got no strength. Still she could not pray. The
empty words came from the lips only. The soul was
still wandering elsewherestill striving, struggling in a
moral chaos where, if all was neither void nor formless, all
was dark, indistinct and threatening.
But little time was suffered even for this effort. The
voices from below became louder. Laughter, and
occasionally
the words and topics of conversation reached their
ears. That Alfred Stevens should laugh at such a moment,
while she struggled in the throes of mortal apprehension
on account of him, served to strengthen her pride, and
renew and warm her sense of hostility. What a pang it
was to hear, distinctly uttered by his lips, an inquiry,
addressed to
her
husband, on the subject of
his
wife.
What feelings of pain, and apprehension were awakened
in her bosom by the simple sounds
But where's your wife, Beauchampe? we must see
her, you know. You forget the commission which we
bearthe authority conferred by the club. Unless we
approve, you know
What more was said escaped her, but a few moments
more elapsed when Beauchampe was heard ascending
the stairs. She rose from where she knelt, and bracing
herself to the utmost, she advanced and met him at the
head of the stairs.
Come, said he, and show yourself. My friends
wonder at your absence. They inquire for you. Where's
your mother?
I will inform her, and she will probably follow me
down.
Very goodcome as soon as possible, for we must
get them supper. They have had none.
He returned to his guests, and she to her chamber. Her
mother was weeping.
If you do not feel strong enough, mother, to face
these visiters to-night, do not come down. I will see to
giving them supper. At all events, remember how much
depends on your firmness. I feel now that I shall be
strong enough; but I tremble when I think of you.
Perhaps
,
you had better not be seen at all. I can plead
indisposition for you while they remain, which I suppose
will only be to-night.
The mother was undecided what to do. She could only
articulatethe usual lamentation of imbecility,that things
were as they were.
It was so foolish, to tell him any thing.
The daughter looked at her in silence and sorrow. But
the remark rather lifted her forehead. It was, indeed,
with the pride of a high and honourable soul that she
exulted
in the consciousness that she
had
revealed the truth
that she
had
concealed nothing of her cruel secret from
the husband who had the right to know. With this
strengthening conviction that, if the worst came, she at
least had no concealments which could do her harm, she
descended to the fearful encounter. Never was the rigid
purpose of a severe will, in circumstances most trying,
impressed upon any nature with more inflexibility than
upon hers. Every nerve and sensibility was corded up to
the fullest tension. She felt that she might fall in sudden
convulsionthat the ligatures which her will had put upon
brain and impulse might occasion apoplexy; but she felt,
at the same time, that every muscle would do its duty
that her step should not falter,that her eye should not
shrink,that no emotion of face,no agitation of frame
should effect the development of her fearful secret, or rouse
the suspicions of her husband that there
was
a secret.
She achieved her purpose! She entered the apartment
with the easy dignity of one wholly unconscious of wrong,
or of any of those feelings which denote the memory of
wrong. But she did not succeed, nor did she try, to
impart
to her countenance and manner the appearance of
indifference. On the contrary, the solemnity of her looks
amounted to intensity. She could not divest her face of
the tension which she felt. The tremendous earnestness
of the encounterthe awful seriousness of that meeting
on which so much dependedif not clearly expressed on
her countenance, at least, left there the language of an
impressiveness
which had its effect upon the company.
Beauchampe
was aware of enough, to be at no loss to account
for the grave severity of her aspect. Mr. Barnabas,
without
knowing any thing, at least felt the presence of much
and solemn character in the eyes that met his own. As
for Col. Sharpe, he was too much surprised at meeting
so unexpectedly with the woman he had wronged, to be at
all observant of the particular feelings which her features
seemed to express. He started at her entrance. Looking,
just then, at his wife, Beauchampe failed to note the
movement
of his guest. He started, his face became suddenly
pale, then red, and his eyes involuntarily turned to
Beauchampe
as if in doubt and inquiry. His
cong,
if he made
any, was the result of habit only. Never was guilty
spirit more suddenly confounded, though, perhaps, never
could guilty spirit more rapidly recover from his
consternation
.
In ten minutes after, Col. Sharpe,
alias
Alfred
Stevens
,
was as talkative as ever,as if he had no
mortifications
to apprehend, no conscience to quiet;but, when the
eyes of Beauchampe and Barnabas were averted, his
might be seen to wander to the spot where sat the woman
he had wronged! What was the expression in that
glance? What was the secret thought in the dishonourable
mind of the criminal? Though momentary only, that
glance was full of intelligence; but the recognition which
it conveyed found no response from hers;though, not
unfrequently, at such moments,as if there were some
fascination in his eyes, they encountered those of the
person whom they sought, keenly fixed upon them!
CHAPTER XXII.
And
thus, after five long years of separation,years of
triumph on the one hand, years of degradation and
desperation
on the other,they met,the destroyer and his
victim. The serpent had once more penetrated into the
garden. Its flowers had been renewed. Its Eden, for a
brief moment, appeared to be restored. If the sunshine
was of a subdued and mellowed character, it was still
sunshine! Alas! for the woman! She gazed upon her
destroyer, and felt that the whole fabric of her peace was
once more in peril. She saw before her the same base
spirit which had so profligately triumphed in her
overthrow
.
She felt, from a single glance, that he had
undergone
no change. There was an expression in his look
when their eyes encountered, which annoyed her with
the familiarity of its recognition. She turned from it with
disgust. At all events, she thought, he will keep his
secret;he will not willingly incur the anger of a
husband
.
A day will free us from his presence, and the
danger will then pass for ever!
Filled with doubts, racked with apprehension,but
still with this hope,the woman yet performed the duties
of the household with a stern resoluteness that was
admirable
.
No external tokens of her agitation were to be
seen. Her movements were methodical, and free from
all precipitation. Her voice, though the tones were low,
was clear, distinct, and she spoke simply to the purpose.
Even her enemy felt, or rather exercised, a far less degree
of coolness and composure. His voice sometimes faltered
as he gazed upon, and addressed her; and there was, at
moments, a manifest effort at ease and playfulness, which
the ready sense of Beauchampe himself, did not fail to
discriminate. It was something of a startling coincidence
that, after fighting with William Calvert about Margaret
Cooper, he should, the very next night, be the favoured
guest of her husband. Col. Sharpe brooded over the fact
with some superstitious misgivings; but the progress of
supper, soon made him forgetful of his fears, if he had
any; and before the evening was far advanced, he had
recovered very much of his old composure.
When the supper things were removed, Mr. Barnabas
brought up the subject of horses, in order, as it would
seem, to advert to the condition of his favorite roan, which
had struck lame that evening on their way from Bowling
Green. The question was a serious one whether he
suffered
from snag, or nail, or pebble; and the worthy owner
concluded his speculations by declaring his wish, at an
early moment, to subject the animal to fitting inspection.
Beauchampe rose to attend him to the stables.
Will you go, Col.? asked Mr. Barnabas.
16*
Surely not, was the reply. My taste does not lie
that way. I will remain with Mrs. Beauchampe in the
hope to perfect our acquaintance.
The blood rose in the brain of the person spoken of;
her heart strove to suppress the rising feeling of
indignation
.
At first, her impulse was to rise and leave the
room. But the next moment determined her otherwise.
A single reflection convinced her that there would be no
good policy in such a movementthat it would be
equivalent
to a confession of weakness which she did not feel;
and she was resolved that her feelings of aversion should
not give her enemy such an advantage over her. He
must be met, at one time or other, and perhaps the sooner
the issue is over, the better.
This reflection passed through her mind in very few
seconds. They were now alone together. The lantern,
which the servant carried before Beauchampe and Mr.
Barnabas, was already flickering faintly at a distance as
seen through the window pane beside her; when Col.
Sharpe started from his seat and approached her.
Can it be that I again see you, Margaret! he
exclaimed
have my prayers been grantedam I again
blessed with a meeting with one so dearly loved, so long
and bitterly lamented.
You see the wife of Orville Beauchampe, Col. Sharpe!
was the expressive reply.
Nay, Margaret, it is my misfortune that you are his
wife, or the wife of any man but one. Hear me,for I
perceive that you think that I have wronged you
Think, sir,think!but no more of this! was her
indignant answer as she rose from the chair and prepared
to leave the roomit can matter little to you, sir, what
my thoughts of your conduct and character may be, as it
is now small matter to me what they ever have been. It
is enough for you to know that you are the guest of my
husband; and that, in his ignorance of your crime, lies
your only safety. A word from me, sir, brings down his
vengeance upon your head. You yourself best know
whether that is to be feared or not.
But you will not speak that word, Margaret!
Will I not? she exclaimed while a fiery scorn seemed
to gather in her eyes.
No! Margaret, no! I am sure you cannot. For the
sake of the past, you will not.
Be not so sure of that! It is for the sake of the future
that I am silentwere it for the past only, Alfred Stevens,
not only should my lips speak but my hands act. I
should not ask of him to avenge memy own arm should
right my wrongmy own arm should, even now, be
uplifted
in the work of vengeance, and you should never
leave this house alive.
He smiled as he replied
I know you better, Margaret. If you ever loved
Stay, sirstay, Alfred Stevens, if you would not
have me so madden as to prove to you how little you
have known or can know of me. Do not speak to me in
such language. Bewarefor your own sake,for my
sake, I implore you to forbear.
For your sake, Margaret,any thing for your sake.
But be not hasty in your judgment. You wrong meon
my soul you do! If you knew the cruel necessity that
kept me from you
Oh, false! she exclaimedfalse, and no less foolish
than false;do not hope to deceive me by your base
inventions
.
I heard allknow all! I know that I was the
credulous victim of your subtle artsthat my conquest
and overthrow was the subject of your dishonest boast.
It is false, Margaretthe villain lied who told you
this.
No, Alfred Stevens, no!He spoke the truth,the
veracity of the two Hinkleys was never questioned. But
your own acts confirmed his story. Why did you not
keep your promisewhy did you flywhere have you
been for five bitter years, in which I was the miserable
mock of those whom once I looked on with contempt
the desperate, the fearful wretch,on the verge of a
madness
which, half the time, kept the weapons of death
within my graspwhich I only did not use upon myself,
because there was still a hope that I should meet with
you?
I am here now, Margaretif my death be necessary
to your peace, command it. I confess that I owe you
atonement, though I am less guilty than you think,take
my life, if that will suffice; I offer no entreaty; I utter no
complaint.
One little month ago, Alfred Stevens, and you had
not needed to make this offeryou had not made it a
second time in vain. But that time has changed me.
Golive! Leave this house with the morning's sun, and
forget that you have ever known me! Forget, if possible,
that you know my husband! It is for his sake that I
spare youfor his sake I entreat your silence of the past
your utter forgetfulness of him and me.
For
his
sake, Margaret! he answered with an
incredulous
smile while offering to take her hand. She
repulsed
him.
No, no, Margaret! it is impossible that this young
man can be any thing to you. You cannot be so
forgetful
of those dear moments, of that first passion, consecrated
as it was by those stolen joys
Remind me not,remind me not, man or devil!
Remind me not of your crimeremind me not of my
sworn vengeancesworn, day by day, every day of
bitterness and death which I have endured since those
dark and damning hours. Hark ye, Alfred Stevens!
her voice here suddenly lowered almost to a whisper
hark ye, you are not a wise man! You are tempting
your fate. You are in the very den of danger. I tell
you that I spare your life, though the weapon is shotted
though the knife is whetted. I spare your life, simply
on condition that you depart. Linger longer than is
absolutely needfulvex me longer with these insolent
suggestions, and you wake into fury the slumbering
hatred of my soul, which, for five years, has known no
moment's sleep till now. See!the light returnsa
worda single word more by way of warningdepart
by the dawn to-morrow. Linger longer, and you may
never depart again!
Why, Margaret, this is downright madness!
So it is; and I am mad, and cannot be otherwise than
mad while you remain here. Do you not fear that my
madness will turn upon and rend you.
No! he said quietly, but earnestly and in subdued
tones, for the light was now rapidly approaching. No,
Margaret, for I cannot believe in such sudden changes
from love to hate. Besides, if it were true, of what profit
would it be to take this vengeance? It would forfeit all
the peace and happiness which you now enjoy!
Do I not know it? Is not this what I would tell you?
Do I not entreat you to spare me, for this very reason?
To rend and destroy you might gratify my vengeance
but it would overthrow the peace of others who have
become
dear to me. I ask you to spare themto spare me
not to provoke me to that desperation which will make
me forgetful of every thing except the wrong I have
suffered
at your hand and the hate I bear you.
But how do I this, Margaret?
Your presence does it.
I cannot think you hate me.
Ha! indeed! you cannot?Do not, I pray you, trust
to that. You deceive yourself. You do! Leave this
house with the morrow. Break off your intimacy with
Beauchampe. Forget me! Look not at me! Provoke
me not with your glance,still less with your accents;
for, believe me, Alfred Stevens, I have had but a single
thought since the day of my dishonourbut a single
prayer,and that was for the moment and the
opportunity
when I might wash my hands in your blood. Your
looks, your words, revive the feeling within me. Even
now I feel the thirst to slay you arising in my soul. I do
not speak to threaten. To speak at all I must speak this
language. I obey the feeling whatever it may be. Let
me then implore you, be warned while there is time.
Another day, and I may not be able to command myself
I can scarcely do so now; and in doing so, the effort
is not made in your behalfnot even in my own. It is
for himfor Beauchampe only. He comesbe warned
beware!
The approach of the light and the sounds of voices
from without, produced their natural effect. They warned
the offender much more effectually than even the
exhortation
of the woman, stern, vehement as it was. Nay,
he did not believe in the sincerity of her speech. His
vanity forbade that. He could not easily persuade
himself
of the revolution which she alleged her mind to have
undergone, in his case, from love to hate; and was not
the man to attach any very great degree of faith to
asseverations of such hostility at any time, on the part of
a creature usually so unstable and capricious as he deemed
woman to be. It is certain that what she said had failed
to affect him as it was meant to have done. The unhappy
woman saw that with an increased feeling of care and
apprehension. She beheld it in the leer of confident
assurance which he still continued to bestow upon her
even when the feet of Beauchampe were upon the
threshold
;
and felt it in the half whispered words of hope and
entreaty with which the criminal closed the conference
between them at the same moment. Truly, bitter was
that cup to her at this momentfearful and bitter!
Involuntarily
she clasped her hands, with the action of
entreaty
,
while her eyes once more riveted themselves upon
him. A meaning smile, which reawakened all her
indignation
,
answered her, and then the muscles of both were
required to be composed and inexpressive, as the
husband
once more stood between them.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The
necessity of the case brought a tolerable composure
to the countenances of both the parties as Beauchampe and
his companion re-entered the room. An instant after, the
wife left it and hurried up to her chamber. Beauchampe's
eye followed her movements curiously. In truth, knowing
the dread and aversion which she had avowed, at mingling
again in society, he was anxious to ascertain how she had
borne herself in the interview with his friend.
Truly, Beauchampe, said the latter, as if in answer
to his thoughtsyour wife is a very splendid woman.
Ah! do you like her? Did she converse freely with
you? She speaks well, but does not like society much.
Veryshe has a fine majestic mind. Talks admirably
well. Did you meet with her here?
Yes, said the other, though with some hesitation.
This farm upon which we live is her mother's.
Her mother! ah! what was her maiden name,
Beauchampe
;
I think you mentioned it in your letter, but it
escapes me now.
Cooke, Miss Ann Cooke.
Cooke, CookeI wonder if she is of the Cookes of
Sunbury? I used to know that family.
I thinkI believe notI am not sure, however. I
really cannot say.
The reply of Beauchampe was made with some
trepidation
.
The inquiry of Sharpe, which had been urged
very gravely, aroused the only half latent consciousness of
the husband, who began to feel the awkwardness of
answering
any more particular questions. Sharpe did not
perceive the anxiety of Beauchampehe was himself too
much absorbed in the subject of which he spoke.
Your wife is certainly a very splendid woman in
person
,
Beauchampe; and her mind appears to be original and
well informed. But she seems melancholy, Beauchampe;
quite too much so, for a newly made bride. Eh! what
can be the matter?
She has had lossesmisfortunesher mother, too, is
an invalid, and she has been compelled to be a watcher for
some time past.
And how long have they been neighbours to your
mother? If I recollect, you never spoke of them before?
You forget, I have been absent from home some years,
replied Beauchampe evasively.
TrueI suppose they have come into the
neighbourhood
within that time? You did not know your wife in
boyhood, did you?
NoI did not. I never saw her till my present visit.
I thought not! Such a woman is not to be passed over
with impunity. Her person must attractand her intellect
must secure and fascinate. I should say no man was ever
more fortunate in his choice. What say you, Barnabas?
We must give Beauchampe a certificate?
I suppose so, if you say so; but I can only judge of
Mrs. Beauchampe by appearances. I have had none of
the chat. I agree with you that she is a splendid woman
to the eye, and will take your judgment for the rest.
You will be safe in doing so. But how do you find
your horse?
Regularly lame. I'm afraid the cursed brute's snagged
or has a nail in his foot. The quick's touched somehow,
for he won't lay the foot to the ground.
That's bad! What have you done?
Nothing! We can see to do nothing to-night; but by
the peep of day I must be at him. I must have your help,
Beauchampewith your soap, and turpentine, and
whatever
else may be good for such a case?
Beauchampe gave his assurance with readiness, perhaps
rather pleased than otherwise that the subject should be
changed.
With your permission then, I will leave you, said
Barnabas, and get my sleep while I may. Let your boy
waken me at dawn, if you please, for I am really anxious
about the animal. He is a favouritea nag among a
thousand.
As every man's nag is, said Sharpe. You can
always
tell a born egotist. He has always the best horse,
and the best gun, the best ox and the best ass, of any man
in the country. He really believes it. But ask Barnabas
about the best wife, and ten to one he says nothing of his
own. He has no boastsstrange to sayabout his own
ribbone of his bone, and flesh of his flesh.
You are cutting quite too close, said Barnabas.
As near to the quick in your case, as in that of your
nag.
Almost! But the quick in that region is getting
callous
.
High time, Barnabasit has been subject to sufficient
induration.
At all events I have no dread of your knifeits edge
is quite too blunt to do much hurt. Good nighttry it on
Beauchampe. A young man and a young wifeI have
very little doubt you can find the quick in him with a little
probing.
The quick in Beauchampe's case had already been
found. Good Mr. Barnabas little knew on what delicate
ground he was trespassing.
A good fellow, that Barnabas, said Sharpe, but a
dull one. He really fancies now that his nag is a creature
of great blood and bottom; and a more sorry jade never
paddled to a country muster ground. He will scarcely
sleep to-night with meditating upon the embrocations, the
forentations, the fumigations, and whatever else may be
necessary. But a truce to this, Beauchampe. I have a
better subject. Seriously, my dear boy, I have never been
more pleasantly surprised than in meeting with your wife.
Really, she is remarkably beautiful; and though she is
evidently shy of strangers, yet, as you know I have the art
of bringing women out, I may boast of my ability to say
what stuff she is made of. She speaks with singular force
and elegance. I have never met with equal eloquence in
any woman but one.
And who is she.
Nay, I cannot tell you
that
. It is years since I knew
her, and she is no longer the same being: but your wife
very much reminds me of her.
Was she as beautiful as Anna?
Very nearshe was something younger than your
wifea slight differencea few years only; but the
advantage
,
if this were any, is compensated by the superior
dignity and the lofty character of yours. She I allude tobut
it matters not now. Enough that your wife brings her to
my mind as vividly as if the real living presence were
before
me, whom I once knew and admired, years ago.
Thus, with a singular audacity, did Col. Sharpe dally
with this dangerous subject. He did not this perversely
with wilful premeditation. It seemed as if he could not
well avoid it. Evil thoughts have in them that faculty of
perversely impelling the mind and tongue, which is
possessed
by intoxicating liquors. At moments, the wily
assassin
strove to avoid the subject, but he returned to it
again, almost the instant after, even as one who recoils
suddenly from the edge of some unexpected precipice, again
and again advances, once more to gaze, with fascinated
vision, down into its dim and perilous depths.
A like fascination did this subject possess over the mind
of Beauchampe. The feeling of confidence, amounting to
defiance, which he expressed to his wife, before their
guests had arrived, whenever they spoke of going into the
world, no longer seemed to sustain him. The moment
that a stranger's lip spoke her name, and those inquiries
were made, which are natural enough in such cases from
the lips of friends, about the connexions and history of the
woman he had married, then did Beauchampe, for the first
time, perceive the painful meshes of deception into which
the unfortunate events in his wife's life would necessarily
involve his utterance. Yet still, with the restlessness of
discontent, did he himself incline his ear to the smallest
reference which his companion made to this subject. His
pride was excited to hear her praises, and the rather
barefaced
and bald compliments which had been paid to her
intellect
VOL. II. 17
and beauty, were dear to him as the lover and the
worshipper of both. If love be timid, of itself, in the
utterance
of eulogium upon the beauties which it admires, it
is equally certain that no subject, from the lips of another,
can be more really grateful to its ear. It was, perhaps, this
sort of pleasure which Beauchampe derived from the subject
and which made him incline to it whenever his companion
employed it. Still, in the language of Mr. Barnabas, there
was an occasional touching of the
quick
in what Sharpe said,
at moments, under which his sensibilities winced. It was,
therefore, with a mixed or rather divided feeling, neither of
pain nor pleasure, or a compounded one of both, that
Beauchampe
conducted his friend to the chamber which was
assigned himreturning afterwards to his own, in a state
of mind, highly excited, almost feverishdissatisfied with
himself, his friendwith every person but his wife. With
her he had no cause of quarrel. No doubt of her, no sense
of jealousyno regret, no apprehension disturbed that
devoted passion which made him resolve, under all
circumstances
,
to link her with his life. If any thing, the effect
of the evening's interview was to make him look with eyes
of greater favour upon her taste for privacy, and the life of
seclusion in which, up to this period, his moments of
superior
happiness had been known. But this subject does
not concern us now.
Col. Sharpe was shown into the same chamber which
had been allotted to Mr. Barnabas. In our frontier country,
it need scarcely be stated, that the selfishness which insists
upon chamber and bed to itself is practically rebuked in a
manner the most decided. In some parts, two in a bed
would be thought quite a liberal arrangement; and may
well be thought so, when it is known that four or five is
not an uncommon numberthe fifth man being
occasionally
placed crosswise, in the manner of a raft-tie, rather,
it would seem, to keep the rest from falling out, than with
the view to making him unnecessarily comfortable. Messrs.
Sharpe and Barnabas were too well accustomed to the
condition
of country life to make any scruple about that
arrangement
which placed them in the same apartment and
couch; and under existing circumstances, the former was
rather pleased with it than otherwise. He had scarcely
entered the room before he carefully fastened the door;
listened for the retreating steps of Beauchampe, till they
were finally lost, and while Barnabas was wondering at,
and vainly endeavouring to divine the reason of this
mystery
,
he approached the bed where the other lay, and seated
himself upon it.
You are not asleep, Barnabas? he said in a whisper.
No, replied the other, with tones made rather husky
by a sudden tremulousness of the nerves. No! what's
the matter?
Matter enoughthe strangest matter in the world.
Would you believe that Margaret Cooper, the girl whose
seduction was charged upon me by Calvert, and
Beauchampe's
wife are one and the same person!
The devil they are! exclaimed the other, in his
surprise
rising to a sitting posture in the bed.
True as gospel!
Can't be possible, Sharpe!
Possible, and true. They are the same. I have
spoken with her as Margaret Cooper; the recognition is
complete on both sides; we talked of nothing else while
you and Beauchampe were at the stables.
Great God! how awkward! What's to be done?
Awkward! Where's the awkwardness? I see nothing
awkward about it. On the contrary, I regard this meeting
as devilish fortunate. I was never half satisfied to lose her
as I did, and to find her again is like finding one's treasure
when he had given up the hope of it for ever.
But what do you mean, Sharpe? are you really
insensible
to the danger.
What danger!
Why, that she'll blow you to her husband!
What wife would do that, d'ye think? No! no!
Barnabas
,
she's no such fool. Of course she kept her secret
when she married him. She'll scarcely blab it now.
But won't this affair of Calvert get to his ears.
What if it does? It can do no mischief. Had you
listened to my examination of Beauchampebut you're a
dull fellow, Barnabas! Didn't you hear me ask what his
wife's maiden name was?Maiden name, indeed!Did
you hear the answer?
Yeshe said the name was Cooke.
To be sure he did. Ann, or Anna Cookehis Anna!
Ha! ha! ha!
His
Anna!
But don't laugh so loud, Sharpe; they'll hear you and
suspect.
Pshaw, you're timid as a hare in December. Don't
you see that she's imposed upon him a false name. Let
him hear till doomsday of Margaret Cooper and myself,
and it brings him not a jot nigher to the truth. But, of
course, you must tell him of my affair with Calvert, and
give the political version. He can scarce hear any other
version from any other source;political hacks will
scarcely ever deal in truth when a lie may be had as
easily, and can serve their turn as well. We are
representatives
of our several parties and principles, you
know; treating each other roughlytoo roughly
without
gloves, and, as usual in such cases, exchanging shots
by way of concluding an ill-adjusted argument. There's
no danger of any thing but what we please meeting
Beauchampe's ears.
But, by Jove, Sharpe, this is a dd ticklish situation
to be in. I'd rather you were not here in his house. I'd
rather be elsewhere myself.
You are certainly the most timid mortal. Will you
set off to-morrow with your lame horse.
If he can hobble at all, I will, by Jove. I don't like
the situation we're in at all.
And by Venus, friend Barnabas, if such be your
determination
,
you set off alone. I'm not going to give up
my treasure the moment I find it, for any Beauchampe or
Barnabas of you all. No! no! my most excellent, but
most apprehensive friend!having seen her, how can
you think it. But you have neither eyes nor passion.
By heavens, Barnabas, I am all in a convulsion of joy. I
see her before me nowthose dilating eyes, wild, bright,
almost fierce in their brightness, like those of an eagle;
those lips, that brow, and that full and heaving bosom,
whose sweets
Hush! you are madif you must feel these raptures,
Sharpe, for God's sake, say nothing about them. They
will hear you in the adjoining room.
No! no! it is your silly fears, Barnabas. I am
speaking
in a whisper.
Dn such whispers, say I. They can be heard by
keen ears half a mile. But you say you spoke with her
what did she say? Did she abuse you?
No! indeed!
Is it possiblethe b
Hush! hush! You do not understand her. She did
not abuse me, for of Billingsgate she knows nothing.
You must not think of her as of your ordinary town
wenches. She is too proud for any such proceeding.
She threatened me.
Ah! How!
With her own vengeance and that of her husband.
Told me she had the weapon for me ready sharpened,
and the pistol shotted, and had kept them ready for
years.
The Tartar! and what did you say?
Laughed, of course, and but for the coming of the
lantern and the husband, I should have silenced her
threats by stopping her mouth with kisses.
You're a dare-devil, Sharpe, and you'll have your
throat cut some day by some husband or other.
You're whiskers will be gray enough before that time
comes. You know husbands quite as little as you know
wives. Now, as soon as Margaret Cooper began to
threaten me, I knew I was safe.
Devilish strange sort of security that.
True and certain, nevertheless. People who threaten
much seldom perform. But I have even better security
than this.
What's that?
She loves me.
What! you think so still, do you? You're a
conceited
fellow.
I know it! That first passion, Barnabas, is the
longest
lived. You cannot expel it. It holds on, it lasts
longer than youth. It is the chief memory of youth.
It recalls youth, revives it, and revives all the joys
which come with youththe bloom, the freshness and
the fragrance. Do you think that Margaret Cooper can
forget that it was my lips that first gave birth to the
passion
of love within her bosomthat first awakened its
glow, and taught her,what before she never knew,
that there were joys still left to earth, which could yet
restore all the fabled bliss of Eden? Not easily,
mon
ami!
No, Barnabas,the man who has once taught
a woman how to love, may be, if he pleases, the
perpetual
17*
master of her fate. She cannot help but love him
she must obeyand none but a fool or a madman can
forfeit the allegiance which her heart will always be ready
to pay to his.
I don't know, Sharpeyou always talk these things
well; but I can't help thinking that there's danger.
There's something in this woman's looks very different
from the ordinary run of women.
She
is
different, so far as superiority makes her
different
,
but the same nature is hers which belongs to all.
Love is the fate that makes or unmakes the whole world
of woman.
Maybe so; but this woman seems as proud, and
cold, and stately
Masks, my boy,glorious masks, that help to
conceal
as much fire and passion, and tumultuous love as
ever flamed in any woman's breast.
She awes me with her looks, and if she threatened
you, Sharpe, she seems to me the very woman to keep
her threats.
If she had not threatened me, Barnabas, I should
have probably set out to-night.
It will be a wise step to do so in the morning.
No! no! my dear fellow. Neither you nor I go in
the morning. Fortune favours me!She has thrown in
my way the only treasure which I did not willingly throw
aside myself, and which I have so long sighed, but in
vain, to recover. Shall I now refuse to pick it up and
enshrine it in my breast once more?No! no!
Barnabas
!
I am no stoicI am no such profligate
insensible
!
Why, you don't mean
The inquiry was conveyed, and the sentence finished
by a look.
Do I not! Call me slave, ass, dotard,any thing that
can express contemptif I do not. And hark ye,
Barnabas
,
you must help me.
I help you. I'll be dd if I do! What! to have this
fellow, Beauchampe, slit my carotid? Never! never!
Pshaw, you are getting cowardly in your old age.
I tell you this fellow, Beauchampe, is a sort of
Mohawk
when he's roused.
And I tell you, Barnabas, there's no sort of danger
none at least to you. All that you will have to do will
be to get him out of the way. You wish to ride round
the countryI do not. You wish to try the birds;
nay, he can even get up an elk hunt for you. He knows
that I have no passion for these things, and it will seem
natural enough that I should remain at home. Do you
take? at the worst, I am the offender,and the danger
will be mine only. But there will be no danger. I tell
you that Margaret Cooper has only changed in name.
In all other respects she is the same. There can be no
danger if Beauchampe chooses to remain blind, and if you
will assist me in keeping him so.
I don't half like it, Sharpe.
Pshaw! my good fellow, there's no good reason
why you should like or dislike. The simple question is
whether, in a matter which will not affect you one way
or the other, you are willing to serve your friend. That
is the true and only question. You see for yourself that
there can be no danger to you. I am sure there's no
danger to any body. At all events, be the danger what
it may, and take you what steps you please, I am
resolved
on mine. Reconcile to yourself, as you may, the
desertion of your friend in consequence of a timidity
which has no cause whatever of alarm.
Sharpe rose at this moment, kicked off his boots, and
prepared to undress. The effect of a strong will upon a
feeble one was soon obvious. Barnabas hesitated still,
hemmed and ha'd, dilated once more upon the danger,
and finally subsided into a mood of the most perfect
compliance
with all the requisitions of his friend. They
carried
the discussion still farther into the night, but that is
is no reason why we should trespass longer upon the
sleeping hours of our readers.
CHAPTER XXIV.
It
was no difficult matter, in carrying out the design
of Sharpe, to send Barnabas abroad the next morning in
charge of Beauchampe. Sharpe had a headache, and
declined
the excursion; proposing, very deliberately, to the
husband, to console himself for his absence in the
company
of the wife. The latter was not present when the
arrangement was made. It took place at the stables,
after breakfast, while they were engaged in the
examination
of the injured horse of Mr. Barnabas, and this
gentleman
with his
cicerone
set forth from the spot, leaving
Sharpe, at his own leisure, to return to the house.
Having
seen them fairly off, he did so with the deliberation of
one having a settled purpose. For his reappearance,
alone, Mrs. Beauchampe was entirely unprepared. As
he entered the room where she was sitting, she rose to
leave it, though without any symptoms of haste or
agitation
.
He placed himself between her and the door, and
thus effectually prevented her egress. She fixed her eye
keenly and coldly upon him.
Alfred Stevens, she said, you are trifling with your
fate.
Call it not trifling, dear Margaret;
you
are my fate,
and I never was more earnest in my life. Do not show
yourself so inflexible. After so long a separation such
coldness is cruelit is unnatural.
You say truly, she repliedI am your fate. I have
long felt the persuasion that I would be; and I had
prepared
myself for it. Still, I would it were not so. I
would not have your blood either on mine or the hands
of Beauchampe. I implored you last night to spare me
this necessity. It is not yet too late. Trifle not with
your destinywaste not the moments which are left you.
Persevere in this course of madness for a day longer, and
you are doomed. Hear mebelieve me! I speak mildly
and with method. I am speaking to you the convictions
of five dreary years.
The calm, even, almost gentle manner and subdued
accents of the woman, had the effect of encouragement
rather than of warning. He was deceived by her
bearing
.
He was not so profound a proficient as he fancied
himself in the secrets of a woman's heart; and firmly
persuaded of the notion that he had expressed to
Barnabas
,
in the conversation of the previous night, that
women
are never so little dangerous as when they threaten,
he construed all that she said into a sort of
ruse de
guerre,
the more certainly to conceal her real weakness.
Come, come, Margaret, he said, it is you that
trifle, not me. This is no time for crimination and
complaint
.
Let me atone to you for the past. Believe me
you wrong me if you suppose I meant to desert you. I
was the victim of circumstances as well as yourself;
circumstances which I can easily explain to you, and
which will certainly excuse me for any seeming breach
of faith. If you ever loved me, dear Margaret, it will not
be difficult to believe what I am prepared to affirm.
I do not doubt, sir, that you are prepared to affirm any
thing; but I ask you neither for proofs nor oaths. Why
should you volunteer them unasked, undesired. I have no
wish to make you add a second perjury to the first.
It is no perjury, Margaret; and you must hear me. I
claim it for my own justification.
I
will not
hear you, sir. If you are so well assured
of your justification let that consciousness content you. I
do not accuseI will not reproach you. Go your ways
leave me to mine. Surely, surely, Alfred Stevens, it is the
least boon that I could solicit at your hands, that, having
trampled me to the dust in shamehaving robbed me of
peace and pride for everyou should now leave me
without
farther persecution to the homely privacy which the
rest of my life requires.
Do not call it persecution, Margaret. It is lovelove
only! You were my first loveyou shall be my last. I
cannot be deceived, dear Margaret, when I assume that I
was yours. We were destined for each other; and when
I recall to your memory those happy hours
Recall them at your peril, Alfred Stevens! she
exclaimed
vehemently, interrupting him in the speech.
Recall them at your peril! Too vividly black already
are those moments in my memory. Spare mespare
yourself! Beware! Be warned in season! Oh! man!
man! blind and desperate, you know not how nearly you
stand on the brink of the precipice.
He regarded her with eyes full of affected admiration.
At least, Margaret, whatever may be the falling off in
your love, your genius seems to be as fresh and vigorous
as ever. There is the same high poetical enthusiasm in
your words and thoughts, the same burning eloquence
Col. Sharpe, these things deceive me no longer. I
regard them now as the disparaging mockeries of a subtle
and base spirit, meant to beguile and abuse the confidence
of a frank and unsuspecting one. I am no longer
unsuspecting
.
I am no longer the blind, vain country girl,
whom with ungenerous cunning, you could deceive and
dishonour. Shame and grief, which you brought to my
dwelling, have taught me lessons of truth and humiliation,
if not wisdom. What you say to me now, in the way of
praise, does not exhilaratecannot deceive me, and may
exasperate! Once more I say to you, beware!
Ah, Margaret, are you sure that you do not deceive
yourself also in what you say. Allow that you care
nothing
for praiseallow that your ear has become
insensible
to the language of admirationsurely it cannot be
insensible
to that of love.
Love!
your
love!
Yes, Margaret
my
love. You were not insensible
to it once.
I implore you not to remind me!
Ah, but I must, Margaret. Those moments were too
precious to me to be forgotten. The memory of those
joys too dear. Bitter was the grief which I felt when
compelled to fly from a region in which I had taught, and
been learned myself, the first true mysteries which I had
ever known of love. Think you that I could forget those
mysteriesthose joys? Oh, never! nor could you! On
that conviction my hope is built. Wherever I fled, that
memory was with me still! It was my present solace
under every difficultythe sweetening drop in every cup
which my lips were compelled to drink of bitter and
annoyance
.
Margaret, I cannot think that you did not love
me; I cannot think that you do not love me still. It is
impossible that you should have forgotten what we both
once knew of rapture in those dear moments at
Charlemont
.
And having loved me thenhaving given to me
the first youthful emotions of your bosom, you surely
cannot love this Beauchampe. No! no! love cannot be
so suddenly extinguishedthe altar may have been
deserted
the
fire untendedit may have grown dim, but it
is the sacred fire that can never utterly go out. I can
understand
,
dearest Margaret, that it is proper, that having
formed these new ties, you should maintain appearances,
but these appearances need not be fatal to love, though
they may require prudence at his hands. Have no fear
that my passion will offend against prudence. No, dearest
Margaret, the kiss will be the sweeter now, as it was
among the groves of Charlemont, from being stolen in
secret.
She receded a few steps while he was yet speaking,
and at the close sunk into a chair. He approached her.
She waved him off in a manner that could not be set at
naught. A burning flush was upon her face, and the
compression
of her lips denoted the strong working of a settled
but stifled resolution. She spoke at length.
I have heard you to the close, Alfred Stevens. I
understand
you. You speak with sufficient boldness now.
Would to God you had only declared yourself thus boldly
in the groves of Charlemont. Could I have seen then, as
I do now, the tongue of the serpent, and the cloven foot of
the fiend, I had not been what I am now, nor would you
have dared to speak these accursed words in my ears.
Margaret
Stay, sirI have heard you patiently. The shame
which follows guilt required thus much of me. You shall
now hear
me!
Will I not, Margaret. Ah!though your words
continue thus bitter, still it is a pleasure to hearken to
your
words.
A keen, quick flash of indignation brightened in her
eyes.
I suppress, she said, I suppress much more than I
speak. I will confine my speech to that which seems
only necessary. Once more then, Col. Sharpe, I
understand
your meaning. I do not disguise from you the fact
that nothing more is necessary to a full comprehension of
the foul purposes which fill your breast. But my reply is
ready. I cannot second them. I hate you with the most
bitter loathing. I behold you with scorn and detestation;
as a creature equally malignant and contemptibleas a
villain beyond measureas a coward below contempt
as a traitor to every noble sentiment of humanity; having
the malice of the fiend without his nobleness; and with
every characteristic of the snake but his shape. Judge
then for yourself, with what prospect you pursue your
purpose with me when such are the feelings I bear you,
when such are the opinions which I hold you in.
I cannot believe you, Margaret!
God be witness that I speak the truth.
Margaret, it is you that trifle with your fate. If in
truth you despise my love, you cannot surely despise my
power. It is now my turn to give you warning. I do
not threaten, butbeware!
She started to her feet and confronted him with eyes
that flashed the defiance of a spirit above all apprehension.
Your power! your power! you give me warning
you threaten! Do I rightly hear you? Speak out! I
would not now misunderstand you! No! no! never
again must I misunderstand you! What is it you
threaten
?
You do misunderstand me, MargaretI do not
threaten
.
I seek to counsel onlyto warn you that I have
power; and that there can be no good policy in making
me your enemy!
You
are
mine enemyyou have ever been my
worst
enemy. Heaven forbid that I should again commit the
monstrous error of thinking you my friend.
I
am
your friend, and would be. Nay, more, in spite
of this scorn which you express for me, and which I
cannot
believe, I love you, Margaret, better, far better, than I
have ever loved woman.
You have a wife, Col. Sharpe?
Yesbut
And children?
Yes
For their sakesI do not plead for myselfnor for
youfor
their
sakes, once more, I implore you to forbear
this pursuit. Persecute me no longer. Do not deceive
yourself with the vain belief that I have any feeling for
you but that which I now express. I hate and loathe you
nay, am sworn, and again swear, to destroy you, unless
you desistunless you leave me and leave me for ever.
Her subdued tones again deceived him. He caught her
hand as she waved it in the utterance of the last sentence.
He carried it to his lips; but hastily withdrawing it from
his grasp, she smote him upon the mouth in the next
instant
,
and as he darted towards her threw open the drawer
of a table which stood within arm's length of her position,
and drawing from it a pistol, confronted him with its
muzzle
.
He recoiled, more perhaps with surprise than alarm.
She cocked the weapon, thrust it towards him with all the
manner of one determined upon its use, and with the ease
and air of one to whom the use of the weapon is familiar.
There was a pause of a single instant in which it was
doubtful whether she would draw the trigger or not
doubtful even to Sharpe himself. But, with that pause, a
more human feeling came to her bosom. Her arm sunk
the weapon was suffered to fall by her side, and she said,
with faltering voice
Go, I spare you for the sake of the unhappy woman,
your wife. Go, sirit is well for you that I remembered
her.
Margaret!this from you?
And from whom with more propriety! Know, Alfred
Stevens, that this weapon was prepared for you last night
nay, more, that mine is no inexpert hand in its use.
For five years, day by day, have I practised this very
weapon at a mark, thinking of you only as the object upon
whom it was necessary I should use it. Think you, then,
what you escape, and return thanks to Heaven that brought
to my thought, in the very moment when your life hung
upon the smallest movement of my finger, the recollection
of your wife and innocent children. Judge for yourself
who has most to fearyou or myself.
Still, Margaret, there is a cause of fear which you do
not seem to see.
What is that?
Not the loss of life, perhaps
that,
I can readily
imagine
is not likely to be a cause of much fear with a proud,
strong-minded woman like yourself. But there are
subjects
of apprehension infinitely more great than this
particularly
to a woman, a wife, and, to you more than all.
Your husband!
What of my husband!
A single word from me to him, and where is your
peace, your security? Ha! am I now understood? Do
you not see, Margaret, do you not feel, that I have power,
with a word, more effectually to destroy than even
pistol-bullet
could do it.
And this is your precious thought! she said with a
look of bitter, smiling contemptand with the baseness
which so completely makes your nature, you would lay
bare to my husband the unhappy guilt, in which, through
VOL. II. 18
your own foul arts, my girlish innocence was lost! What
a brave treachery would this be!
Nay, Margaret, but I do not threaten this. I only
declare
what might be the effect of your provoking me
beyond
patience.
Oh! you are moderatevery moderate. I look on
you, Alfred Stevens, from head to foot, and doubt my eyes
that tell me I behold a man. The shape is therethe
outside of that noble animal, but it is sure a fraud. The
beast-fiend has usurped the nobler carcass, himself being
all the while unchanged.
Margaret, this scorn
Is due, not less to your folly than your baseness, as
you will see when I have told you all. Know then, that
when I gave this hand to Orville Beauchampenay, before
it was given to him, and while he was yet at liberty to
renounce itI told him that it was a dishonoured hand.
You did not! You could not!
By the God that hears me, I did. I told him the
whole story of my folly and my shame. Oh! Alfred
Stevens, if in truth you had loved me as you professed,
you would have known that it was not in my nature to
stoop to fraud and concealment at such a time. Could
you think that I would avail myself of the generous ardour
of that noble youth to suffer him, unwittingly, to link
himself to possible shame? No! no! His magnanimity,
his love, the warmth of his affections, the loftiness of his
soul, his geniusallall demanded of me the most
perfect
confidence; and I gave it him. I withheld nothing,
except, it seems, the true name of my deceiver!
I cannot believe it, MargaretBeauchampe never
would have married you with this knowledge.
On my life, he did. Every syllable was spoken in
his ears. Nay, more, Colonel Sharpe,and let this be
another warning to you to forbear and flyI swore
Beauchampe on the Holy Evangelists, ere he made my
hand his own, to avenge my dishonour on my betrayer.
I made
that
the condition of my hand!
And why now would you forbear prosecuting this
vengeance? Why, if you were so resolved upon it,
why do you counsel me to fly from the danger? Do you
mean to declare the truth to Beauchampe when I am
gone?
No! not if you leave me, and promise me never
again to seek either me or him.
No! no! Margaret, this story lacks probability. I
cannot believe it. I am a lawyer, you must remember.
These inconsistencies are too strong. You swear your
husband on the Holy Evangelists to take my life, and the
next moment shield me from the danger? Now, the
ferocious
hate which induced the first proceeding cannot be
so easily quieted, as in a little month after, to effect the
second. The whole story is defective, Margaretit lacks
all probability.
Be it so! You are a lawyer, and no doubt a wise
one. The story may seem improbable to you, but it is
true nevertheless. However strange and inconsistent, it
is yet not unnatural. The human ties which bind me to
earth have grown stronger since my marriage, and, for
this reason, if for no other, I would have the hands of my
husband free from the stain of human blood, even though
that blood be yours! For this reason I have
condescended
to expostulate with youto implore you! For
this reason do I still implore and expostulate. Leave
me,leave this house the moment your friend returns.
Avoid Beauchampe as well as myself. There are a
thousand
easy modes for breaking off an intimacy. Adopt
any one of these which shall seem least offensive. Spare
me the necessity of declaring to my husband that the
victim he is sworn to slay, is the person who has
pretended
to be his friend.
The philosophical poet tells us, that he whom God
seeks to destroy he first renders a lunatic. In the
conceit
of his soul, in the plenitude of his legal subtlety, and
with that blinding assurance that he could not lose, by
any process, the affections he had once won, Sharpe
persisted
in believing that the story to which he listened,
was, in truth, nothing more than an expedient of the
woman to rid herself of the presence and the attentions
which she rather feared than disliked. He neither
believed
that she had told the truth to Beauchampe, nor
that she loathed him as she had declared. Himself of a
narrow and slavish mind, he could not conceive the
magnanimity
of soul, which, in such a case as that of Margaret
Cooper, would declare her dishonour to a lover seeking
her hand;still less was he willing to believe in the farther
stretch of magnanimity, on the part of Beauchampe, in
marrying any woman in the teeth of such a revelation.
We may add, that, with such a prodigious degree of
self-esteem
as he himself possessed, the improbability was
equally great that Margaret should ever cease to regard
him with t devotedness of love. He had taken for
granted that it was through the medium of her affections
that she became his victim, though all his arts were made
to bear upon other characteristics of her moral nature,
entirely different from those which belong to the tender
passion. A vain man finds it easy to deceive himself, if
he deceives nobody else. Here then, was a string of
improbabilities
which it required the large faith of a liberal
spirit to overcome. Sharpe was not a man of liberal spirit,
and such men are usually incredulous where the
magnanimity
of noble soul is the topic. Small wits are always
of this character. Scepticism is their shield and even
sevenfold coat of mail, and incredulity is the safe wisdom
of timidity and self-esteem. Such men neither believe in
their neighbours or in the novel truths which they happen
to teach. They pay the penalty in most cases by dying
in their blindness.
Will this be the case with the party before us? Time
will show. At all events, the earnest adjurations of the
passionate and full-souled woman were entirely thrown
away upon him. What she had said had startled him
at first; but with the usual obduracy of self-esteem, he
had soon recovered from his momentary discomposure.
He shook his head slowly, while a smile on his lips
declared
his doubts.
No, Margaret, it is impossible that you should have
told these things to Beauchampe. I know you better,
and I know well that he could never have married you,
having a knowledge of the truth. You cannot deceive
me, Margaret; and wherefore should you try? Why
would you reject the love which was so dear to you in
Charlemont; and if you can do this, I cannot? I love
you too well, Margaretremember too keenly the
delights
of our first union, and
will not
believe in the
necessity
that denies that we should meet. No! no! Once
found, I will not lose you again, Margaret. You are too
precious in my sight. We must see and meet each other
often. Beauchampe shall still be my friendhis
marriage
with you has made him doubly dear to me. So far
from cutting him, I shall find occasions for making his
household a place of my constant pilgrimage; and do
not sacrifice yourself by vain opposition to this intimacy.
It will do no good and may do harm. I can make his
fortune; and I will, if you will hear reason. But you must
remove to Frankfortbe a dutiful wife in doing so; and,
for this passion of revenge,believe that I was quite
as much afflicted as yourself by the necessity that tore
us asunderas was the truthand you will forgive the
involuntary crime, and forget every thing but the dear
delights of that happy period. Do you hear me,
Margaret
you
do not seem to listen!
She regarded him with a countenance of melancholy
scorn, which seemed also equally expressive of
hopelessness
and pity. It seemed as if she was at a loss which
sentiment most decidedly to entertain. Looking thus,
but in perfect silence, she rose, and taking the pistol from
the table where it had lain, she advanced towards the
door of the apartment. He would have followed her, but
she paused when at the door, and turning, said to him
If I knew, Colonel Sharpe, by what form of oath I
could make you believe what I have said, I would
asseverate
solemnly its truth. I am anxious for your sake,
for my sake, and the sake of my husband, that you should
believe me. As God will judge us all, I have spoken
nothing
but the truth. I would save you, and spare myself
the necessity of any farther revelations. Life is still dear
to mepeace is every thing to me now. It is to secure
this peace that I suppress my feelingsthat I still implore
you to listen to me and to believe. Be merciful. Spare
me! Spare yourself. Propose any form of oath which
you consider most solemn, most binding, and I will repeat
it on my knees, in confirmation of what I have said! for
on my soul I have spoken nothing but the truth!
He laughed and shook his head, as he advanced to
where she stood.
Nay, nay, Margaret,the value of oaths in such
cases is but small. No form of oath can be very binding.
Jove, you know, laughs at the perjuries of lovers; and if
we are lovers no longer,which I cannot easily believe,
the business between us, is so certainly a lover's
business
,
that Jove will laugh none the less at the vows we
18*
violate in carrying it on. You took it too seriously,
Margaretit is you that are not wise. You cannot
deceive
meyou are wasting labour.
She turned from him, mournfully, with a single look,
and in another moment was gone from sight.
CHAPTER XXV.
Mr. Barnabas
and Beauchampe returned from their
morning ride in excellent spirits; but there was some
anxiety and inquiry in the look of the former as his eye
sought that of his confederate. He gathered little from
this scrutiny, however, unless it were the perfect success
of the latter in the prosecution of his criminal object.
The face and manner of Colonel Sharpe wore all the
composure
and placid satisfaction of one equally at peace
with all the world and his own conscience. His headache
had subsided. He seemed to have nothing on his mind
to desire or to regret.
Lucky dog! was the mental exclamation of his
satellite
.
He never fails in any thing he undertakes. He
does as he pleases equally with men and women.
Beauchampe had his anxieties also, which were a little
increased as he noted a greater degree of sadness on his
wife's countenance than usual. But his anxiety had no
relation whatever to the real cause of fearto the real
source of that suffering which appeared in her looks. Not
the slightest suspicion of evil from his friend, Colonel
Sharpe, had ever crossed his mind, even for an instant.
Dinner came off, and Colonel Sharpe was in his
happiest
vein. His jests were of the most brilliant order;
but, unless in the case of Mr. Barnabas, his humour was
not contagious. Mrs. Beauchampe scarcely seemed to
hear what was addressed to her; and Beauchampe,
beholding
the increasing depth of shade on his wife's
countenance
,
necessarily felt a corresponding anxiety which
imparted similar shadows to his own.
At dinner, Mr. Barnabas said something across the
table to his companion, in reference to the probable time
of departure.
What say you,shall we ride to-morrow?
Why, how's your nag?
Betternot absolutely well, but able to go, when
going
homeward.
You
may go, said Sharpe, abruptly; but I shall
make a week of it with Beauchampe. The country, you
say, is worth seeing, and there may be votes to be won
in showing one's self. I see no reason even for you to
hurry; and I dare say Beauchampe's hospitality will
scarcely complain of our trespass for two days longer.
The speaker looked to Beauchampe, who, as matter of
course, professed his satisfaction at the prospect of
keeping
his friends. The eye of Sharpe glanced to the face
of the lady. A dark red spot was upon her forehead.
She met the glance of her enemy, and requited it with
one of deep signification; then, rising from the table, at
once left the apartment.
The things were removed, and Mr. Barnabas,
counselled
by a glance from his companion, proposed to
Beauchampe
to explore the farm.
I can't bear the house when I can leave itthat is,
when I'm in the country. A country-house seems to me
an intolerable bore. Won't you go, Sharpe?
But the person addressed had already disposed himself
in the rocking-chair, as if for the purpose of taking a nap.
He answered, drowsily
No! no! Barnabas,take yourself off. I would
enjoy
my siesta merely. With you I should be apt to sleep
soundly. Take him off, Beauchampe, and suffer me to
make myself at home.
Oh! certainly, if you prefer it.
I do! I take the world composedlydetest
sightseeing
,
and believe in Somnus. This habit of mine keeps
me out of mischief into which Barnabas is for ever falling.
Away now, my good boys, and enjoy the world and one
another.
The
rou
was alone. Ten minutes had not passed,
when Mrs. Beauchampe entered the apartment. This
was an event which Col. Sharpe had scarcely anticipated.
He had remained simply to be in the way of what he would
esteem some such fortunate chance; hoped for it; and,
believing that the lady was playing only a very natural
feminine game, did not think it improbable that the desired
opportunity would be afforded him. So early a realization
of his wishes was certainly unexpectednot undesired,
however. The surprise was a pleasurable one, and he
startled into instant vivacity on her appearance; rising
from his seat and approaching her with extended hand as
if to conduct her to it.
Stay, Col. SharpeI come but for a moment.
Do not say so, Margaret.
A moment, sir, will suffice for all that I purpose. You
speak of remaining here till the close of the week? Now,
hear me! Your horses must be saddled after breakfast
to-morrow, You must then depart. I must hear you
express this determination when we meet at the
breakfast-table
.
If I do not, sir,on the word of a woman whom
you have made miserable and still keep so, I declare to
Mr. Beauchampe the whole truth.
What! expel me from your house, Margaret! No!
no! I as little believe you can do this, as do the other.
This, my dear girl, is the merest perversity!
He offered to take her hand. She recoiled.
Col. Sharpe, your unhappy vanity deceives you.
What do you see in my looks, my conduct, to justify
these doubts of what I say, or this continued presumption
on your part. Do I look the wanton? Do I look the
pliant damsel whose grief looks temporary only, which a
smile of deceit, or a cunning word can dissipate in a
moment. Look at me well, sir,my peace, and your life
depends upon the wisdom which Heaven at this moment
may vouchsafe you. Oh! sir, be not blind! See, in these
wobegone cheeks and eyes, nothing but the misery,
approaching
to despair, which my bosom feels. See, and be
warned! You cannot surely doubt that I am in earnest.
For the equal sake of your body and soul, I implore you
to believe me.
Cassandra never looked more terribly true to her
utterance
to
the awful predictions which her lips poured forth
but like Cassandra, Margaret Cooper was fated not to
be believed. The unhappy man, blinded by that flattering
self-esteem which blinds so many, was insensible to her
expostulationsto the intense wo, expressing itself in
looks of the most severe majesty of her highly expressive
countenance! The effect of her intensity of feeling was
to elevate the style of her beauty, and this was something
against the success of her entreay. Vain and
dishonourable
as he was, Sharpe gazed on her with a sincere
admiration. Unhappily, he was not one to venerate.
That refining agent of moral worship was wanting to his
heart; and in its place a selfish lust after the pleasures of
the moment was the only divinity which he had set up.
It would be idle to repeat his answer to the imploring
prayer of the half-distracted woman. He had as little
generosity as veneration. He could not forbear. His
mind had become inflexible, from the too frequent
contemplation
of its lusts, and what he said was simply what
might have been said by any callous, clever man, who, in
the prosecution of a selfish purpose, regards nothing but
the end in view. He answered, with pleasantry, that wo,
which was so much more expressively shown in her looks
than in her utterance. Pleasantry at such a moment!
Pleasantry addressed to that painfully excited imagination
whose now familiar images were of death, and despair,
and blood! She answered him by clasping her hands
together.
We are doomed! she exclaimed, while a groan forced
its way at the close of her sentence, as if from the very
bottom of her heart.
Doomed, indeed, Margaret! How very idle unless
you
doom us!
And I do! You are doomed, and doomed by me,
Alfred Stevens, unless you leave this house to-morrow.
Be sure I shall do no such thing!
Your blood be upon your own head. I have warned
you, counselled you, implored youI can do no more!
Yes, Margaret, you can persuade mebeguile me,
subdue me, make me your captive, slave, worshipper,
every thingas you have done before, by only loving me
as you did then. Be not foolish and perversecome to
melet us renew those happy hours that we knew in
Charlemont, when you had none of these gloomy notions
to affright others and to vex yourself with!
Fool! fool! Blind and vain! With sense neither
to see nor to hear!Alfred Stevensthere is yet time!
But the hours are numbered. God be merciful, so that
they be not yours. We meet at the table to-morrow
morning
for the last time.
Stay, Margaret!he exclaimed seeing her about to
leave the room.
To-morrow morning for the last time! she repeated,
as she disappeared from sight.
Devilish strange! But they are all so!perverse as
the devil himself! There is nothing to be done here by
assault. We must have time, and make our approaches
with more caution. My desertion sticks in her gorge. I
must mollify her on that score. Work slowly, but surely.
I have been too boldtoo confident. I did not make
sufficient
allowances for her pride, which is diabolically strong.
I must ply her with the sedatives first; but one would
have thought that she had sufficient experience, to have
taken the thing more coolly. As for her blabbing to
Beauchampe
,
that's all in my eye. No, no! you cannot terrify
me by such a threat. I am too old a stager for that;
nay, indeed, how much of your wish to drive me off arises
from your dread that
I
shall blab! Ha! ha! ha! but you
too shall be safe from that. My policy is `mum,' like
your own. To be frightened off by such a threat would
prove a man as sorry a fool as coward. We shan't go
tomorrow
,
fair Mistress Margaret, doom or no doom!
Such were the muttered meditations of Col. Sharpe
after Mrs. Beauchampe had left him. Perhaps, they were
such as would be natural to most men of the same
character
.
His estimate of the woman, also, was no doubt a
very just estimate of the ordinary woman of the world,
placed in similar circumstances, after having committed
the same monstrous and scarcely remediable lapse from
virtue and place. But we have shown that Margaret
Cooper was no ordinary woman! He knew
that,
himself,
but he did not believe her equal to the course which she
threatened, nor did he believe her when she informed him
of the magnanimous course which she had already
pursued
in relation to Beauchampe. Could he have believed
that,
indeed! But it was not meant that he should believe.
The destiny that shapes our ends, was not to be diverted
in his case. As his victim had declared, with solemn
emphasis on leaving him,he was, indeed, doomed!
doomed! doomed!
CHAPTER XXVI.
We
pass, with hurried progress, over the proceedings of
that night. The reader will please believe that Col. Sharpe
was, as usual, happy in his dialogue, and fluent in his
humour. Indeed, by that strange contradiction in the work
of destiny, which sometimes so arranges it that death does
the work of tragedy in the very midst of the marriage
merriment, the spirits of the doomed man were never more
elastic and excitable than on that very night. He and
Barnabas kept his host, till a late hour, from his couch;
the sounds of their laughter penetrated the upper
apartments
,
and smote wofully upon the ears of the unhappy
wife, to whom all sounds, at that moment, came laden with
the weight of wo. One monotonous voice rang through
her senses and the house, as in the case of Macbeth, and
cried sleep no more! Such, at least, was the effect of
the cry upon her. Precious little had been her sleep, in
that house, from the moment that bad man entered it.
Was she ever to sleep again? She, herself, believed
not.
The guests at length retired to their chamber and
Beauchampe
sought his. At his approach, his wife rose from
her knees. Poor, striving, struggling, hopeless heartshe
had been striving to beat down thought and to wrestle with
prayer. But thought mingled with prayer, and obtained
the mastery. Such thoughts too! Such thoughts of the
terrible necessity before her! Oh! how criminal was the
selfish denial of that man. Life had become sweet and
precious. Her husband had grown dear to her in
proportions
he convinced her that she was dear to him.
Permitted
to remain in their obscurity, life might still be
retained and would continue, with length of days, to
become more and more precious. But the destroyer was
there, unwilling to spareunwilling to forego the ravages
he had begun. Not to tell her husband the whole truth
to listen to the criminal any longer without denouncing
him,would not only be to encourage him in his crime
but to partake of it. If he remained another day, she was
bound by duty, and sworn before the altar, to declare the
truth; and the truth, once told, was only another name for
utter desolationblood upon the hands, death upon the
soul! With such thoughts, prayer was not possible. But
she had striven in prayer, and that was something. Nay,
it was something gained, even to think, in the position of
humilityupon her knees.
She rose, when she heard her husband approachtook
a book, and seating herself beside the toilet, prepared to
read. She composed her countenance, with a very decided
effort of will, so as to disperse some of the storm-clouds
which had been hanging over it. Her policy was, at
present
,
not to alarm her husband's suspicions, if possible, in
relation to her guests. It might be that Sharpe would
grow wiser with the passage of the night. Sleep, and
quiet, and reflection, might work beneficial results; and if
he would only depart with the morning, she trusted to
time and to her own influence over Beauchampe, to break
off the intimacy between the parties without revealing
the fatal truth.
What! not abed, Anna? said Beauchampe. It is
late do you know the hour? It is nigh one!
Indeed, but I am not sleepy.
I am; what with riding and rambling with Barnabas
I am completely knocked up. Besides, he is such a dull
fellow. Now Sharpe has wit, humour, and other resources,
which make a man forgetful of the journey and the
progress
of time.
Has Col. Sharpe said any thing about going?
demanded
the wife with some abruptness.
Yes
Ah! with some eagernesswhen does he go?
At the close of the week. He is disposed to see
something
of the neighbourhood.
She drew a long breath, scarcely suppressing the deep
sigh which struggled for utterance; and once more fixed
her eyes on the book. It need not be said that she read
nothing.
Come to bed, dearest, said Beauchampe tenderly.
You hurt your eyes by night reading. They have been
looking red all day.
She promised him, and, overcome with fatigue, the
husband soon slept, but the wife did not rise. For more
than two hours she sat, the book still in her hands; but
her eyes were unconscious of its pages, her thoughts were
not in that volume. She thought only of that coming
morrow
,
and the duties and dangers which its coming would
involve. She was seeking to steel her mind with the
proper resolution, and this was no easy effort. Imagine
the task before herand the difficulty in the way of
acquiring
the proper hardihood will easily be understood.
Imagine yourself preparing for the doom which is to
follow
in twelve hours; and conjecture, if you can, the sort
of meditations which will come to you in that dreary but
short interval of time. Suppose yourself in health, too
young, beautiful, highly endowed, intensely ambitious,
with the prospectif those twelve hours can be passed in
safetyof love, long life, happiness, and possibly, troops
of friends all before you, smiling, beckoning, entreating
in the sunny distance! Imagine all this in the case of that
proud, noble-hearted, most lovely, highly intellectual, but
wo-environed woman, and you will not wonder that she
did not sleep. Still less will it be your wonder that she
could not pray. Life and hope were too strong for
sufficient
humility. The spirit and the energy of her heart
was not yet sufficiently subdued.
Dreary was the dismal watch she keptstill in the one
position. At length her husband moved and murmured in
his sleep. In his sleep he called her name, and coupled
with it an endearing epithet. Then the tide flowed. The
proper chords of human feeling were stricken in her heart.
The rock gushed. It was stubborn no longer. But the
waters were bitter, though the relief was sweet. Bitter
were the tears she wept, but they
were
tears, human tears;
and like the big drops that relieve the heat of the sky and
disperse its unbreathing vapours, they took some of the
mountain pressure from her heart, and left her free to
breathe, and hope, and pray.
She rose and stepped lightly beside the bed where
Beauchampe
slept. She hung over him. Still he murmured
in his sleep. Still he spoke her name, and still his words
were those of tenderness and love. Mentally she prayed
above him, while the big drops fell from her eyes upon
the pillow. One sentence alone became audible in her
prayerthat sentence of agonizing apostrophe, spoken by
VOL. II. 19
the Saviour in his prescience of the dreadful hour of trial
which was to come:If thou be willing, Father, let this
cup pass by me!
She had no other prayer, and in this vain and useless
repetition of the undirected thoughts, she passed a sad and
comfortless night. But she had been gaining strength. A
stern and unfaltering spiritit matters not whence derived
came to her aid, and with the return of sunrise she
arose, with a solemn composure of soul, prepared,
however
gloomily, to go forward in her terrible duties.
CHAPTER XXVII.
Beauchampe
rose refreshed and more cheerful than usual.
The plans for the day, which had been discussed by
himself
and friends the previous night, together with the lively
dialogue which had made them heedless of the progress of
the hours, were recalled to his memory, and he rose with
an unwonted spirit of elasticity and humour. But the
lively glance of his eye met no answering pleasure in that
of his wife. She was up before him. He did not dream
that she had not sleptthat for half the night she had
hung above his sleep engaged in mental prayer that such
slumbers might still be spared to him, even if the dreary
doom of such a watch was still allotted to her. He gently
reproached her for the settled sadness in her looks, and
she replied only by a sigh. He did not notice the intense
gleams which, at moments, issued from her eyes, or he
might have guessed that some terrible resolution was busy
at the forge within her brain. Could he guess the sort of
manufacture going on in that dangerous workshop! But
he did not.
The party was assembled at the breakfast-table; and, as
if with a particular design to apprise Mrs. Beauchampe,
that her warnings were not heeded, Col. Sharpe dwelt
with great deliberation upon the best modes before them of
consuming the rest of the week with profit.
What say you, Beauchampe, to a morning at your
friend Tiernan'she will give us a rouse, I'm thinking;
the next day with Coalter, and Saturday, what ho! for an
elk-hunt! at all events, Barnabas must go to Coalter's
he's a client of his, and will never forgive the omission;
and it is no less important that you should give him the
elk-hunt also; he has a taste for hard riding, and it will do
him good. He's getting stoutish, and a good shaking will
keep his bulk within proper bounds. Certainly, he must
have an elk-hunt.
A like reason will make it necessary that you should
share it also, Colonel, said Beauchampe. You partake,
in similar degree, of the infirmity of flesh which troubles
Mr. Barnabas.
Ay, ay, but I am no candidate for the red-hat, which
is the case with Barnabas, and which the conclave will
religiously refuse to a man with a corporation.
But you are after the seat of attorney general, said
Mr. Barnabas, with the placable smile of dulness.
Granted, and for such an office a good corporation
may be considered an essential, rather than any thing else.
It confers dignity, Hal. Now, the red-hatted gentry of the
club are not expected to be dignified. The humour of the
thing forbids it; and as a candidate for that communion, it
is necessary that you should live on
soup maigre,
and
`seek the chase with hawk and hound,' as Earl Percy
did. Besides, Beauchampe, he has a passion for it.
I a passion for it? said Barnabas.
Yes, to be surewhat were all those stories you used
to tell of hunting in Tennessee; stories that used to set
our hair on end at your hair breadth escapes. Either we
must suppose you to have grown suddenly old and timid,
or we must suppose, that, in telling those stories of your
prowess, you were amusing us with some pleasant
fictions
.
That's a dilemma for you, Barnabas, if you
disclaim
a passion for an elk-hunt now.
No! by Jupiter, I told you nothing but the truth,
said Barnabas, solemnly.
I believe it, said Sharpe, with equal solemnity, I
believe it, and believe that the passion continues.
Well, said the other, I can't altogether deny that it
does, but it has been somewhat cooled by other pursuits
and associations.
It must be warmed again, responded Sharpe.
Remember
,
Beauchampe, be sure to make up a party for
Saturday.
We include you in it? asked Beauchampe.
Ay, ay,if I happen to be `i' the vein.' But, you
know, like Corporal Nym, I'm a person of humours. I
may not have the fit upon me, or I may have some other
fit; and may prefer remaining at home to read poetry with
our fair hostess.
The speaker glanced significantly at Mrs. Beauchampe
as he said these words. Their eyes encountered. Hers
wore an expression of the soberest sadness. As if
provoked
by the speech and the glance, she said, in the most
deliberate language, while her look was full of the most
rebukeful and warning expression
I thought you were to leave this morning for
Frankfort
,
Col. Sharpe. I derived that impression somehow
from something that was said last evening.
Beauchampe turned full upon his wife with a stern look
of equal astonishment and inquiry. Mr. Barnabas was
aghast, and Col. Sharpe himself, for a moment, lost his
equilibrium, and was speechless, while his eyes looked
the incertitude which he felt. He was the first, however,
to recover; and with a sort of legal dexterity, assuming as
really having been his own, the determination which she
had suggested as being made by him, he replied
True, my dear madam, that was my purpose
yesterday
,
but the kind entreaties of our host, and the pleasant
projects which we discussed last night, persuaded me to
yield to the temptation, and to stay till Sunday.
The speaker bowed politely, and returned the severe
glance of the lady, with a look of mingled conciliation and
doubt. For the first time he began to feel apprehensive
that he had mistaken her, and perhaps himself. She was
a woman of prodigious strength of soulindomitable
resolution
,
and the courage of a gigantic man. Never did
words proceed more deliberatelymore evenly from
human
lipsthan did the reply from hers.
That cannot be, Col. Sharpe. It is necessary that
you should keep your first resolution. Mr. Beauchampe
can no longer accommodate you in his dwelling.
How, Mrs. Beauchampe! exclaimed the husband
starting to his feet, and confronting her. She had risen
while speaking, and was preparing to leave the room.
She looked on him with a countenance mournful and
humblevery different from that which she wore in
addressing
the other.
Speak, Anna,say, Mrs. Beauchampe! exclaimed
the husband. What does this mean?this to my guests
to my friend!
He is not your friend, Beauchampenor mine! But
let me passI cannot speak here!
She left the room, and Beauchampe, with a momentary
glance at Sharpe, full of bewilderment, hurried after his
wife.
What's this, Sharpe, in a devil's name? demanded
Barnabas in consternation.
The devil himself, Barnabas! said Sharpe. I'm
afraid the jezebel means to blow me and tell every thing.
But you told me last night that all was well and going
right.
So I thought! I fear I was mistaken! At all events
I must prepare for the worst. Have you any weapons
about you?
My dirk!
Give it memy pistols are in the saddle-bags.
But what shall I do?
You are in no danger. Give me the dirk, and hurry
out and have our horses ready. Dn the woman!
Who could have believed it!
Ah! you're always so sanguine! began Barnabas,
but the other interrupted him.
Pshaw! this is no time for lecturing! Your wisdom is
eleventh hour wisdom. It is too late here. Hurry and
prepare yourself and the horses, while I go to the room
and get the saddle-bags ready. If I am blown, my start
cannot be too sudden!
Barnabas, always pliant, disappeared instantly, and
Sharpe, concealing the dirk in his bosom, with the handle
convenient to his clutch, found himself unpleasantly alone.
Who the dl could have thought it! What a woman!
19*
But it may not be as bad as I fear. She may invent
something
to answer the purpose of getting me off. She
certainly
cannot tell the whole. No! no! That would be to
suppose her mad! And mad she may be! I had not thought
of that! Now, I think of it, she looks cursedly like an
insane
woman. That wild, fierce gleam of her eyethose
accentsand indeed, every thing since I have been here!
Certainly, had she not been mad, it must have been as I
wished. I could not have been deceivednever was
deceived
yet by a sane woman! It must be so, and if so, it
is
possible that she may blurt out the whole. I must be
prepared. Beauchampe's as fierce as a vulture when
roused. I've seen that in him before. I must get my
pistols
,
though, in going for them, I may meet him on the
stairs. Well, if I do! I am armed. He is scarcely more
powerful than myself. Yet I would not willingly have
him grapple with me, if only because he is
her
husband.
The very thought of
her
makes me half a coward! And
yet I must be prepared. It must be done!
Such were his reflections. He advanced to the entrance.
The footsteps of Beauchampe were heard rapidly striding
across the chamber overhead. The criminal recoiled as he
heard them. A tremor shot through his limbs. He
clutched
the dagger in his bosom, set his teeth firmly, and waited
for a moment at the entrance. The sounds subsided
above. He thrust his head through the doorway, into the
passage, and leaned forward in the act of listening. The
renewed silence which now prevailed in the house, gave
him fresh courage. He darted up the steps, sought his
chamber, and with eager trembling hands caught up and
examined his pistols. Both were loaded, and he thrust
them into the pockets of his coat; then seizing his own
and the saddle-bags of his companion, he darted out of the
chamber, and down the steps, with footsteps equally light
and rapid. Once more in the hall and well armed, he was
more composed but as little prepared, morally, for events
as before. There was a heavy fear upon his spirit. The
consciousness of guilt is a terrible queller of one's
manhood
.
He waited impatiently for the return of Barnabas.
At such a moment, even the presence of one whom he
estimated rather humbly, and with some feelings of
contempt
,
was grateful to his enfeebled spirit; and the
appearance
of the horses at the door, and the return of his
friend, had the effect of re-enlivening him to a degree
which made him blush for the feeling of apprehension
which he had so lately entertained.
All's ready!will you ride? demanded Barnabas,
picking up his saddle-bags. The worthy coadjutor was
by no means audacious in his courage. Sharpe hesitated.
It may be only a false alarm after all, said hewe
had better wait and see!
I think not, said the former. There was no
mistaking
the words, and as little the looks. She's a very
resolute woman.
Col. Sharpe was governed by the anxieties of guilt as
well as its fears. The painful desire to hear and know
to what extent the revelations of the wife had gonea half
confidence that
all
would not be toldthat some loophole
would be left for retreat;and the farther conviction, that,
at all events, whatever was the nature of her story to her
husband, it was quite as well that he should know it at one
moment as anotherencouraged him to linger; and this
resolve with the force of habitual will, he impressed upon
his reluctant companion.
Leaving them to their suspense below, let us join the
husband and wife above stairs.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
In
the name of God, Mrs. Beauchampe! such was
the address of her husband as he joined her in their
chamber
,what
is the meaning of all this?
She took from the toilet a pair of pistols and offered them
to him. What mean you by these,by this treatment
of my friends?
Your friends are villains! Col. Sharpe and Alfred
Stevens are the same person!
Impossible! he replied, recoiling with horror from
the proffered weapons.
True as gospel, Beauchampe!
True!
True! before Heaven, I speak the truth, my husband!
a dreadful, terrible truth, which I would not speak were
it possible not to do so!
And why has not this been told me before? Why
has he been suffered to remain in your presencenay, to
be alone with you, for hours since his coming? Did you
know him from the first to be the same man?
From the first!
Explain, then!for God's sake explain. You blind
me,you stun me! I am utterly unable to see this thing!
How, if you knew him from the first, suffer for a moment
the contagion of his presence?
This I can easily answer you, my husband. Bear
with me patiently while I do so! I will lay bare to you
my whole soul, and show you by what motives of
forbearance
I was governed, until driven to the course I have
pursued by the bold insolence of this uncompromising
villain.
She pausedpressed her head with her hands as if to
subdue the tumult which was striving within; then, with
an effort which seemed to demand her greatest energies,
she proceeded with her speech. She entered into an
explanation
of that change in her feelings and desires which
had been consequent to her marriage. She acknowledged
the force of those new domestic ties which she had formed,
in making her unwilling that any event should take place
which should commit herself or husband in the eyes of
the community, and bring about a disruption of those ties,
or a farther development of her story; which would be
certain to follow, in the event of an issue between her
husband and her seducer. With this change in her mood,
prior to the appearance of this person and his
identification
with Col. Sharpe, she had prayed that he might never
reappear; and when he didwhen he became the guest
of her husband, and was regarded as his friend, it was her
hope that a sense of his danger would have prompted him
to make his visit short, and prevent him from again
renewing
it. Her own deportment was meant to be such as
should produce this determination in his breast. But
when this failed of its effectwhen in despite of warning,
in defiance of danger,in the face of hospitality and
friendship, the villain presumed to renew his loathsome
overtures of guilt;when no hope remained that he would
forbearwhen it was seen that he was without generosity,
and that neither the rebuke of her scorn, nor the warnings
of her anger, could repel his insolent advancesthen it
was that she felt compelled to speakthen, and not before!
She had deferred this necessity to the last moment. She
had been purposely slow. She had given the seducer
every opportunity to withdraw in safety, and made the
condition of his future security easy, by asking only that
he would never seek nor see her again!She had striven
in vain;and failing to find the immunity she sought,
from her own strength and firmness,it was no longer
possible to evade the necessity which forced her to seek
it in the protection of her husband. It was now necessary
that he should comply with his oath, and for this reason
she had placed the weapons of death in his hands.
Henceforth
,
the struggle was his alone. Of the sort of duty to
be done, no doubt could abide in either mind!
Such was the narrative which, with the coherence not
only of a same but a strong mind, and a will that no pain
of body and pang of soul could overcome, she poured into
the ears of her husband. We will not attempt to describe
the agony, the utter recoil and shrinking of soul with
which he heard. There is a point to which human
passion
sometimes arrives when all language fails of
description
,
as in a condition of physical suffering, the intensity
of the pain is providentially relieved by utter
unconsciousness
and stupor. But, such was the surprise with which
Beauchampe received the information of that identity
between
Alfred Stevens and his friendhis friend!that the
impression which followed from what remained of his
wife's narrative, was comparatively slight. You might
trace the accumulation of pang upon pang, in his heart, as
the story went on, by a slight convulsive movement of the
lip,but the eye did not seem to speak. It was fixed and
glassy, and so vacant, that its expression might have
occasioned
apprehension in the mind of the wife, had her own
intensity of sufferinghowever kept downnot been of
so blinding and darkening a character.
When she had ended, he grasped the pistols, and
hurried
to the entrance, but as suddenly returned. He laid
the weapons down upon the toilet.
No! he exclaimednot here! It must not be in
this house. He has eaten at our boardhe is beneath our
roofthis threshold must not be stained with the blood
of the guest!
He looked at her as he spoke these words. But she did
not note his glance. Her eyes were fixedher hands
were claspedshe did not seem to note his presence, and
her head was bent forward as if she listened. A moment
was passed in this manner, when, as he still looked, she
turned suddenly and seemed only then to behold him.
You are here! she said; where are the pistols?
He did not answer, but following the direction of his
eye, she saw them on the toilet, and striding fierce and
rapidly, she caught them up from the place where they
lay.
What would you, Anna? he asked seizing her
wrists.
The wrong is mine! she exclaimed. My hand
shall avenge it. It is sworn to it. I am prepared for it.
Why should it be put upon another?
No! he criedwhile his brow gathered into a cloud
of wrinklesno, woman!
You
are mine, and
your
wrongs are minemine only! I will average them; but I
must avenge them as I think rightafter my own fashion
in my own time. Fear not that I will. Believe that I
am a man, with the feelings and the resolution of a man,
and do not doubt that I will execute my oath,ay, even
were it no oath!to the uttermost letter of the obligation.
Give me the weapons!
She yielded them. Her whole manner was subdued
her looksher words.
Oh, Beauchampewould that I could spare you
this!
Do I wish it, Anna! Would I be spared? No, my
wife! The duty is doubly incumbent on me now. This
reptile has made your wrong doubly that of your husband.
Has he not renewed his criminal attempt, under my own
roof. This, this alone, would justify me in denying him
its protection,but I will not. He shall not say he was
entrapped! As the obligation is a religious one, I shall
execute its laws with the deliberation of one who has a
task from God before him. I will not violate the holy
pledges of hospitality, though he has
done
so. While he
remains in my threshold, it shall protect him. But fear
not that vengeance shall be done. Before God, my wife,
I renew my oath!
He lifted his hand to heaven as he spoke, and she sunk
upon her knees, and with her hands clasped his. Her
lips parted in speech, and her murmurs reached his ears,
but what she spoke was otherwise inaudible. He gently
extricated himself from her embracewent to the basin,
and deliberately bathed his forehead in the cold water.
She remained in her prostrate position, her face clasped
in her hands and prone upon the floor. Having
performed
his ablutions, Beauchampe turned, and looked
upon her steadfastly, but did not seek to raise her; and,
after a moment's further delay, left the chamber and
descended
the stairs.
Then his wife started from her feet, and moved towards
the toilet where the weapons lay. Her hand was
extended
as if to grasp them, but she failed to do so, and
staggered forward with the manner of one suddenly dizzy
with blindness. With this feeling she turned towards the
bed, and reached it in time to save herself a fall upon the
floor. She sank forward upon it, and while a husky
sound, like feeble laughter, issued from her throat, she
lost the consciousness of the agony that filled her soul, in
the relief of present unconsciousness.
CHAPTER XXIX.
When
Col. Sharpe heard the descending footsteps of
Beauchampe as he came down the stairs, he asked
Barnabas
to go into the passage-way and meet hima
request
which made the other look a little blank.
There is no sort of danger to you, and you hear he
walks slowly, not like a man in a passion. I doubt if
she has told him all; perhaps, she has told him nothing.
At all events, you will be decidedly the best person to
receive intelligence of what she has told. I'm thinking
it's a false alarm after all; but, whether true or false, it
can in no manner affect you. You are safe,go out,
meet him, and learn how far I am so.
It has been seen that the will of the superior man, in
spite of all first opposition, usually had its way with the
inferior. Mr. Barnabas, however reluctant, submitted to
the wishes of his companion, and with some misgivings,
and with quite slow steps, left the room in order to meet
with the husband of whose rage such apprehensions were
formed in both their minds. Sharpe, though he had
expressed
himself so confidently, or at least so hopefully,
to Barnabas, was really full of apprehension. The
moment
that the latter left the room, he took out his pistols,
deliberately cocked them, and placing them behind his
back, moving backward a little farther from the entrance,
prepared himself in that manner for the encounter,if
that became inevitablewith the angry husband.
But the danger seemed to have passed away. Silence
followed. The steps of Beauchampe were no longer
heard, and, moving towards one of the front windows,
the criminal beheld the two already at a distance, and
about to disappear behind the copse of wood that spread
itself in front.
Sharpe breathed more freely, and began to fancy that
the cloud had dispersed, that the danger was overblown.
He was mistaken. Let us join Beauchampe and his
companion
.
Mr. Barnabas, said the former, I speak to you still
as to a gentleman, as I believe you have had no
knowledge
of the past crime of Col. Sharpe, and no
participation
in his present villany.
Such was the opening remark of Beauchampe, when
he had led the other from the house. Mr. Barnabas was
prompt of denial.
Crime Beauchampe,villany! Surely, you cannot
think I had any knowledgeany participationah!do
you supposedo you think I knew any thing about it
About
what?
demanded the suspicious Beauchampe,
coolly fixing his eyes, with a keen glance, upon the
embarrassed
speaker.
Nay, my dear Beauchampethat's the question,
said the other. You speak of some crime, some
villany
,
as I understand you, of which our friend Sharpe
has been guilty. If it be true, that he has been guilty of
any, you are right in supposing that I knew nothing about
it. Nay, my dear fellow, don't think it strange or
impertinent
,
on my part, if I venture a conjecturemark me,
my dear fellow, a mere suppositionthat there must be
some mistake in this matter. I can't think that Sharpe,
a fellow who stands so high, whom we both know so
well and have known so long, such an excellent fellow in
fact, so cursed smart, and so clever a companion, can
have been such a dd fool as to have practised any
villany
,
at least upon a gentleman whom we both love and
esteem so much as yourself.
There's no mistake, Mr. Barnabas! said the other,
gravely. This man is a villain, and has been practising
his villany to my dishonour, while in my house and
enjoying
my confidence and hospitality.
You don't say so! it's scarce possible, Beauchampe!
The crime's too monstrous. I still think, I mean, I still
hope, that there's some very strange mistake in the
matter
which can be explained.
VOL. II. 20
Unhappily, sir, there is none. There is no mistake,
and nothing needs explanation!
That's unfortunate, very unfortunate! May I ask,
my dear fellow, what's the offence?
Surely, of this I drew you forth to tell you, in order
that you might tell him. I do not wish to take his life in
my own dwelling, though his crime might well justify me
in forgetting the sacred obligations of hospitality,might
justify me, indeed, in putting him to death even though
his hands grasped the very horns of the altar. He has
busied himself, while in my dwelling, in seeking to
dishonour
its mistress. While we rode, sir, and in our
absence
,
he has toiled for the seduction of my wife. That's
his crime! You will tell him that I know all!
Great God! what madness, what folly, what could
have made him do so. But, my dear Mr. Beauchampe,
as he has failed, not succeeded, eh?
The speaker stopped. It was not easy to finish such a
sentence.
I cannot guess what you would say, Mr. Barnabas,
nor, perhaps, is it necessary. You will please to go back
to your companion, and say to him that he will instantly
leave the dwelling which he has endeavoured to dishonour.
I see that your horses are both readya sign, sir, that
Col. Sharpe has not been entirely unconscious of this
necessity. I would fain hope, Mr. Barnabas, that in
preparing
to depart yourself, you acknowledge no more
serious obligation to do so, than the words of my wife,
conveyed at the breakfast-table?
The sentence was expressed inquiringly, and the keen,
searching glance of Beauchampe, declared a lurking
suspicion
that made it very doubtful to Barnabas whether
the husband did not fully suspect the auxiliary agency
which he had really exhibited in the dishonourable
proceedings
of Sharpe. He felt this, and could not
altogether
conceal his confusion, though he saw the necessity
of a prompt reply.
My dear Beauchampe, was it not enough to make a
gentleman think of trooping, with bag and baggage, when
the lady of the house gives him notice to quit.
But the notice was not given to you, Mr. Barnabas.
Granted, but Sharpe and myself were friends, you
know, and came together, and being the spokesman in
the case, you see
Enough, Mr. Barnabas; I ask no explanations from
you. I do not say to you that it is necessary that you
should quit along with Col. Sharpe, but as your horse is
ready, perhaps it is quite as well that you should.
Hem! such was my purpose, Mr. Beauchampe.
Yes, sir; and you will do me the favour for which I
requested your company, to say to him that the whole
history of his conduct is known to me. In order that he
should have no further doubts on this subject, you will
suffer me to intrude upon you a painful piece of domestic
history.
My dear Beauchampe, if it's so very painful
I perceive, Mr. Barnabas, that what I am about to
relate
will not have the merit of novelty to you.
Indeed, sir, but it willI mean, I reckon it will. I
really am very ignorant of what you intend to mention.
I am, sir, upon my honour, I am!
Beauchampe regarded the creature with a cold smile of
the most outer contempt, and when he had ended,
resumed
:
Tell Col. Sharpe, if you please, that before I married
Mrs. Beauchampe, she herself told me the whole history
of Alfred Stevens and her own unhappy frailty, while she
swore me to avenge her dishonour. Tell him that I will
avenge it, and that he must prepare himself accordingly.
My house confers on him the temporary privilege of
safety. He will leave it as soon as convenient after you
return to it. I will seek him only after he has reached his
own; and when we meet it is with the one purpose of
taking his life or losing my own. There can be no half
struggle between us. There can be no mercy. Blood,
alone! the blood of lifethe life itselfcan acquit me of
my sworn obligation. It may be his life, or it may be
mine; but he must understand, that, while I live, the
forfeit
stands against him, not to be redeemed but in his
blood! This is all, sir, that I have to say.
But, my dear Beauchampe
No more, Mr. Barnabas, if you please. There can
be nothing more between us. You will understand me
farther, when I tell you that I am not assured of your
entire
freedom from this last contemplated crime of Col.
Sharpe. I well know your subserviency to his wishes,
and but for the superior nature of his crime, and that I do
not wish to distract my thoughts from the sworn and
solemn purpose before me, I should be compelled to show
you that I regard the weakness which makes itself the
minister of crime as a quality which deserves its
chastisement
also. Leave me, if you please, sir. I have subdued
myself with great difficulty, to the task I have gone through,
and would not wish to be provoked into a forgetfulness of
my forbearance. You are in possession of all that I mean
to sayyour horses are readyI suspect your friend is
ready also! Good morning, sir!
The speaker turned into the copse, and Mr. Barnabas
was quite too prudent a person to follow him with any
farther expostulations. The concluding warning of
Beauchampe
was not lost upon him, and glad to get off so well,
he hurried back to the house, where Sharpe was awaiting
him with an eagerness of anxiety which was almost
feverish
.
Wellwhat has he to say? You were long enough
about it!
The delay was mine. He was as brief as charity.
He knows all.
All! impossible!
All! every syllable. Nay, says he knew the whole
story of Alfred Stevens and of his wife's frailty before he
married her. Begs me particularly to tell you
that,
and
to say, moreover, that he was sworn to avenge her wrong
before marriage.
Then she told me nothing but the truth. What a
blind ass I have been not to have known it, and believed
her. I should have known that she was like no other
woman under the sun!
It's too late now for such reflectionsthe sooner we're
off the better!
Ay, ay, but what more does he say?
That you are safe till you reach your own home.
But after that never. It's your life or his! He swears
it!
But was he furious?
Noby no means.
Then I'm deceived in the man. If he lets me off
now, I suspect there's little to fear.
Don't deceive yourself. He looked ready to break
out at a moment's warning. It was evidently hard work
with him to contain himself. Some fantastic notion about
the obligations of hospitality, alone, prevented him from
seeking instant redress.
Fantastic or not, Barnabas, the reprieve is something.
I don't fear the cause, however bad, if I can stave it off
for a term or two. Witnesses may die, in the meantime;
principles become unsettlednew judges, with new dicta,
come in, and there is always hope in conflicting
authorities
.
To horse,
mon ami,
a reprieve is a long step to a
full pardon.
It's something, certainly, said the other, and I'm
sure I'm glad of it; but don't deceive yourself. Be on
your guardif ever there was a man seriously savage in
his resolution, Beauchampe is.
Pshaw! Barnabas! you were ever an alarmist!
replied
Sharpe, whose elasticity had returned to him with
the withdrawal of the momentary cause of apprehension.
We shall tame this monster, however savage, if you only
give us time. Let him come to Frankfort, and we'll set
the whole corps of Red-Hats, yours among 'em, at work
to get him to the conclave; and one Saturday's bout, well
plied, will mellow body and soul in such manner that he
will never rage afterwards, however he may roar. I tell
you, my lad, time is something more than money. It
subdues hate and anger, softens asperity, wakens up new
principles, makes old maids young onesay, my boy,
andhere, looking up over his horse, which he was
just about to mount, at the windows of Beauchampe's
chamber, and closing the sentence in a whisperay,
my boy, and may even enable me to overcome this
sorceress
tigress,
if you prefer itmake her forget that she
is a wifeforget every thing, but the days when I taught
her her first lessons in loving!
Sharpe! exclaimed the other in a sort of husky
horror
you
are a very dare-devil! To speak so in the very
den of the lion?
Ay, but it is while thinking of the lioness.
Keep me from the claws of both! ejaculated
Barnabas
,
20*
with an honest terror as he struck spurs into the
flanks of his horse.
I do not now feel as if I feared either! replied the
other.
Don't halloo till out of the woods!
No!but Barnabas, do you really think that his
woman is sincere in giving me up?
Surely!how can I think otherwise.
Ah! my boy, you know nothing of the sex.
Wellbut she has told him all. How do you explain
that?
She has had her reasons. She, perhaps, finds or
fancies
,
that Beauchampe suspects. She hopes to blind him
by this apparent frankness. She's not in earnest.
Dn such manuvring, say I?
Give us time, Barnabas! Time, my boy, and I shall
have her at my feet yet! I do not doubt that, with the
help of some of our boys, I shall baffle
him,
and I will
never lose sight of
her,
while I have sight. I have felt
more passion for that woman than I ever felt for any
woman
yet, or ever expect to feel for another; and if scheme
and perseverance will avail for any thing, she shall yet be
mine!
If such were your feelings for her, why didn't you
marry her in Charlemont?
So I would have done if it had been necessary; but
who pays for his fruit when he can get it for nothing?
True, replied the other, evidently struck by the force
of this dictum in moral philosophythat's very true;
but the fruit has its Argus now, if it had not thenand the
paws of Briareus may be upon your throat, if you look
too earnestly over the wall. My counsel to you is, briefly,
that you arrive with all possible speed at the faith of the
fox.
What! sour grapes? No! no! Barnabasthe grapes
are sweet
and I do not think them entirely out of reach.
As for the dragon, we shall yet contrive to `calm the
terrors
of his claws.'
So speaking they rode out of sight, the courage of both
rising as they receded from the place of danger. Whether
Sharpe really resolved on the reckless course which he
expressed to his companion, or simply sought, with the
inherent vanity of a small man, to excite the wonder of
the latter, is of no importance to our narrative. In either
case, his sense of morals and of society are equally and
easily understood.
CHAPTER XXX.
Colonel Sharpe
sat one pleasant forenoon in the snug
parlour of his elegant mansion in the good city of
Frankfort
.
It was a
dies non
with him. He had leisure, and
his leisure was a leisure which had its sauce. It was a
satisfactory leisure. The prospect of wealth with dignity
was before him. Clients were numerous; fees liberal;
his political party had achieved its triumph, and his own
commission as attorney-general of the state was made
out in the fairest characters. The world went on
swimmingly
.
Truly, it was a blessed world. So one may
fancy with the wine and walnuts before him. Ah! how
much of the beauty of this visible world depends on one's
dessertand digestion! Col. Sharpe's dessert was
excellent
,
but his digestion not so good. Nay, there were some
things that he could not digest; but of these, at the
pleasant
moment when we have thought proper to look in
upon him, he did not think. His thoughts were rather
agreeable than otherwise. Perhaps, we should say, rather
exciting than agreeable. They were less sweet than
piquant
;
but they were such as he did not seek to disperse.
A man of the world relishes his bitters occasionally. It is
your long-legged lad of eighteen who purses his lips
while his eyes run water, as he imbibes the acrid but spicy
flavour. Col. Sharpe was no such boy. He could linger
over the draught, and sip, with a sense of relish, from the
mingling but not discordant elements. He was no
milksop
.
He had renounced the natural tastes at a very early
day.
He thought of Margaret Cooperwe should say Mrs.
Beauchampebut that, when he recalled her to his
memory
,
she always came in the former, never in the latter
character. He did not like to think of her as the wife of
another. The reflection made him sore; though, to think
of her was always a source of pleasure in a greater or less
degree. But he had not forgotten the husband; and now,
in connexion with the wife, he felt himself unavoidably
compelled to think of him. His countenance assumed a
meditative aspect. There was a gathering frown upon his
brow in spite of his successes. At this moment a rap
was heard at the door, and Mr. Barnabas was announced.
Ha! Barnabashow d'ye do?
Wellwhen did you get back?
Last night, after dark.
YesI looked in yesterday and you were not here
then. What news bring you?
None! Have you any here?
As little. It's enough to know that all's right. We
are quite joyful herenothing to dash our triumph.
That's well, and our triumph's complete; but
with an air of abstractionwhat do you hear of
Beauchampe
?
Not a wordbut he's in Frankfort!
Ha! indeed!
Was here two days ago. Haven't you heard from
him.
Not a syllable.
But how could you?going to and fro, and so brief
a time in any place, it was scarcely possible to find you!
I doubt if he'll do any thing, Barnabas. The affair
will be made so much worse by stirring. He'll not think
of ithe's very proud,very sensitivevery sensible to
ridicule!
I don't know. I hope he won't. But he's as strange
an animal as the woman, his wife; and, I tell you, there
was a damned sour seriousness about him when he spoke
to me on the subject, that makes me apprehensive that
he'll keep his word. The ides of March are not over
yet.
Sharpe's gravity increased. His friend rose to depart.
Where do you go?
To Folker's. I have some business there. I just
heard that you were here, and looked in to say how
happy we all are in our successes.
You will sup with me to-night, Barnabas. I want
you;I feel dull.
The devil you do,what, and just made
attorney-general
!
Even so! Honours are weighty.
Not the less acceptable for that. Glamis thou art,
Cawdor shalt be,and let me be your weird sister, and
proclaim, yet further`thou shalt be king hereafter!'
governor, I mean.
Ah! you are sharp, this morning, Barnabas, said
Sharpe, his muscles relaxing into a pleasant smile. I
shall expect you to-night, if it be only to hear the
repetition
of these agreeable predictions.
I will not fail you! addio!
Col. Sharpe sat once more alone. Pleasant indeed
were the fancies which the words of Mr. Barnabas had
awakened in his mind. He murmured in the strain of
dramatic language which the quotation of his friend had
suggested, as he paced the apartment to and fro
`I know I'm thane of Glamis,
But how of Cawdor
And to be king,
Rests not within the prospect of belief.'
Ay, but it does; he proceeded in the more sober prose
of his own reflectionsthe steps are fair and easy.
Barnabas is no fool in such matters, though no wit. He
knows the people. He can sound them as well as any
man. This suggestion does not come from himself. No!
no! It comes from a longer head. It must be C!
Hem! this is to be thought upon!
His
word against a
thousand pound! If he thinks so, it is as good as done;
and Barnabas is only an echo, when he saysthou
shalt be king hereafter! Poor Barnabas! how readily
he takes his colour from his neighbour.
A rap at the door arrested these pleasant reflections.
The soliloquist started and grew pale. There was surely
a meaning in that rap. It was not that of an ordinary
acquaintance. It wanted freedom, rapidity. It was very
deliberate and measured. Onetwothree!you could
count freely in the intervals. A strange voice was heard
at the door.
Colonel Sharpe is in townis he at home?
The servant answered in the affirmative, and appeared
a moment after followed by a strangera gentleman of
dark, serious complexion, whose face almost declared his
business. The host felt an unusual degree of
discomposure
for which he could not so easily account.
Be seated, sir, if you please. I have not the pleasure
of your name.
Covington, sir, is my nameJohn A. Covington.
Covington,John A. Covington! I have the
pleasure
of knowing a gentleman whose name very much
resembles yours. I know John W. Covington.
I am a very different person; answered the stranger
I have not the honour of being ranked among your
friends.
The stranger spoke very coldly. A brief pause
followed
his words, in which Col. Sharpe's discomposure
rather underwent increase. The keen eye of Covington
observed his face, while he very deliberately drew from
his pocket a paper which he handed to Sharpe, who took
it with very sensible agitation of nerve.
Do me the favour, sir, to read that. It is from Mr.
Beauchampe. He tells me you are prepared for it. It is
open, you see;I am aware of its contents.
From Beauchampe
Mr.
Beauchampe, sir, said the visitedcoolly
correcting
the freedom of the speaker.
This paper, as you will see by the date, sir, has been
some time in my hands. Your absence in the country,
alone, prevented its delivery.
Yes, sirsaid Sharpe, slowly, and turning over the
envelope;yes, sirthis, I perceive, is a peremptory
challenge, sir?
It is.
But, Mr. Covington, there may be explanations, sir.
None, sir! Mr. Beauchampe tells me that this is
impossible
.
He adds, moreover, that you know it. There
is but one issue, he assures me between you, and that is
life or death.
Really, sir,there is no good reason for this. Mr.
Covington, you are a man of the world. You know what
is due to society. You will not lend yourself to any
measure of unnecessary bloodshed. You have a right, sir
surely you have a right, sir, to interpose, and accept
some more qualified atonementperhaps, siran apology
the expression of my sincere regret and sorrow, sir
The other shook his head coldly
My friend leaves me none.
But, sir, if you knew the cause of this hostilityif
I do, sir! was the stern reply.
Indeed! But are you sure that you have heard it
exactly as it is. There are causes which qualify
offence
I believe Mr. Beauchampe, sir, in preference to any
other witness. This offence, sir, admits of none. You
will permit me to add, though extra-official, that my friend
deals with you very magnanimously. The provocation
is of a sort which deprives you of any claim of courtesy.
May I have your answer, sir, to the only point to which
this letter relates? Will you refer me to your friend?
Sir,Mr. CovingtonI will not fight Mr.
Beauchampe
!
Indeed, sir!can it be possible! exclaimed
Covington
rising from his chair and regarding the speaker with
surprise.
No, sir,I
cannot
fight him. I have wronged him
too greatly. I cannot lift weapon against his life!
Col. Sharpe,this will never do! You are a
Kentuckian
!
You are regarded as a Kentucky gentleman!
I say nothing on the score of your claim to this character.
Let me remind you of the penalties which will follow this
refusal to do my friend justice.
I know them, sirI know them all. I defy them;
will bear them, but I cannot fight Beauchampe!
You will be disgraced, sirI must post you!
Sharpe strode the apartment hastily. His cheek was
flushed. He felt the humiliation of his position. In
ordinary
matters, in the usual spirit of society, he was no
coward. We have seen how readily he fought with
William Calvert. But he could not meet Beauchampe
he could not nerve himself to the encounter.
I cannot, will not fight Beauchampe! was his
muttered
ejaculation. No! I have wronged himwronged
her! I dare not meet him. I can never do it!
Be not rash, Col. Sharpe, said the other. Think
of it again before you give me such an answer. I will
give you three hours for deliberationI will call again at
four.
No, sirno, Mr. Covingtonthe wrongs I have done
to Beauchampe are knownprobably well known;the
world will understand that I cannot fight him;that my
offence is of such a nature, that, to lift weapon against
him,
would be monstrous. You may post me, sirbut
no one who knows me will believe that it is fear that
makes me deny this meeting. They will know allthey
will acquit me of the imputation of cowardice.
And how should they know? demanded Covington
sternly, unless you make them acquainted with the facts,
and thus add another to my friend's causes of
provocation
.
Nay, Mr. Covington,he himself told Mr. Barnabas.
True, sir,but that was in a special communication
to yourself, which implied confidence, and must have
secrecy. My friend will have his remedy against Mr.
Barnabas, if he does not against you, if
he
speaks what
he should not. There is a way, sir, to muzzle your
barking
dogs.
It is known to others,Mr. William Calvert, with
whom I fought on this very quarrel.
Ah! that is new to me; but as you fought in this very
quarrel with Mr. Calvert, it seems to me that your
objection
fails. You must fight with Mr. Beauchampe also on
the same quarrel.
Never, siryou have my answerI will not meet
him!
Do not mistake your position with the public, Col.
Sharpe. The extent of the wrong which you have done
to Beauchampe, only makes your accountability the
greater. Nobody will acquit you on this score,nay,
any effort to make known to the people the true cause of
Mr. Beauchampe's hostility, will make it obvious that you
seek rather to excuse your cowardice, than to show
forbearance
,
or to make atonement. Truly, they will regard
that as a very strange sort of remorse, which publishes
the shame of the wife, in order to justify a refusal to meet
the husband.
I will not publish itBeauchampe has already done
so.
It is known to two persons, sir, through him. It need
not be known to more. Col. Calvert is a friend of mine.
He is not the man to speak of the affair. Besides, I will
communicate to him on the subject, and secure his silence.
You shall have no refuge of this sort.
I have answered you, Mr. Covington, said Sharpe
doggedly.
I must post you then as a scoundrel and a coward!
Sharpe turned upon the speaker with a look of suddenly
roused fury in his face, but swallowing the word which
rose to his lips, he turned away. The other proceeded
coolly.
This shall be done, sir,and I must warn you that
the affair will not end here. Mr. Beauchampe will
disgrace
you in the public streets.
The sweat trickled from the brows of Sharpe in thick
drops such as precede the torrents of the thunder storm.
He strove to speak, but the convulsive emotions of his
bosom effectually baffled utterance; and with dilated eyes,
and labouring breast, he strode the floor, utterly incapable
of self-control. Covington lingered.
You will repent this, Col. Sharpe. You will recall
me when too late. Suffer me to see you this afternoon
for your answer.
The other advanced to him, then turned away; once
more approached and again receded. A terrible strife
was at work within him, but when he did find words,
they expressed no bolder determination than before,
Covington regarded him with equal pity and contempt,
as he turned away evidently dissatisfied and disappointed.
He was scarcely gone when the miserable man found
words.
God of Heaven! that I should feel thus! That I
should be so unmanned! Why is this! Why is the
strength denied methe couragewhich never failed
before? It is not too late. He has scarcely left the step!
I will recall him! He shall have another answer! and,
with this late resolution he darted to the entrance and
laid his hand upon the knob of the door; but the
momentary
VOL. II. 21
impulse had already departed. He left it unopened.
He recoiled from the entrance, and striking his hands
against his forehead, groaned in all the novel and
unendurable
bitterness of this unwonted humiliation.
And this is the man,Cawdor, Glamis, all!King
hereafter, too, as Mr. Barnabas promised;echoing, of
course, the language of that great political machinist, Mr.
C. Ha! ha! ha!
Did some devil growl this commentary in the ears of
the miserable man? He heard it, and shuddered from
head to foot.
CHAPTER XXXI.
Let
nobody imagine that a sense of shame implies
remorse
or repentance. Nay, let them not be sure that it
implies any thing like forbearance in the progress of
offence. It was not so with our attorney-general. The
moment he recovered, in any fair degree, his composure,
he despatched a messenger for his friend Barnabas. He,
good fellow, came at the first summons. We will not say
that his footsteps were not absolutely quickened by the
recollection
that it was just then the dinner hour; and,
possibly
,
some fancy took possession of his mind, leading
him to the strange, but pleasant notion, that Sharpe had
suddenly stumbled upon some
bonne bouche
in the
market-place
,
of particular excellence, of which he was very
anxious that his friend should partake. The supper, be it
remarked, was no less an obligation still! Conceptive
Mr. Barnabas! Certainly, he had some such idea. The
bonne bouche
quickened his movements. He came
seasonably
.
The dinner was not consumed; perhaps not quite
ready;but, for the
bonne bouche,
alas!
Sic transit
gloria mundi
. Such is the inscription, at least, upon this
one pleasant hope of our friendly philosopher. There
was a morsel for his digestion, or rather for that of his
friendly entertainer, but, unhappily, it was one that neither
was well prepared to swallow. Mr. Barnabas was struck
dumb by the intelligence which he heard. He was not
surprised that Beauchampe had sent a challenge; his
surprise
,
amounting to utter consternation, was that his friend
should have refused it. He was so accustomed to the
usual bold carriage of Colonel Sharpeknew so well his
ordinary promptnessnay, had seen his readiness on
former
occasions to do battle, right or wrong, with word or
weapon,that he was taken all aback with wonder at a
change so sudden and unexpected. Besides, it must be
recollected, that Mr. Barnabas was brought up in that
school of an earlier period, throughout the whole range of
southern and western country, which rendered it the point
of honour to yield redress at the first summons, and in
whatever form the summoner pleased to require. That
school was still one of authority, not merely with Mr.
Barnabas
,
but with the country, and the loss of caste was one
of those terrible social consequences of any rejection of
this authority, which he had not the courage to consider
without absolute horror. When he did speak, the friends
had changed places. They no longer stood in the old
relation
to each other. Instead of Colonel Sharpe's being the
superior will, while that of Barnabas was submission, the
latter grew suddenly strong, almost commanding.
But, Sharpe, you
must
meet him. By Jupiter! it
won't do. You're disgraced for ever, if you don't. You
can't escape. You must fight him.
I cannot, Barnabas! I was never so unnerved in my
life before. I cannot meet him. I cannot lift weapon
against the husband of Margaret Cooper.
Be it so; but, at all events, receive his fire.
Even for this I am unprepared. I tell you, Barnabas,
I never felt so like a cur in all my life. I never knew till
now what it was to fear.
Shake it off. It's only a passing feeling. When
you're up, and facing him, you will cease to feel so.
The other shook his head with an expression of utter
despair and self-abandonment.
By God, I know better! exclaimed Barnabas, warmly,
I've seen you on the groundI've seen you fight.
There was that chap, Calvert.
Barnabas,it is in vain that you expostulate. I
have
foughthave been in frequent strifes with men, and brave
men, too; but never knew such feelings as oppress me now
and have oppressed me ever since I had this message. Do
not suppose me insensible to the shame. It burns in my
brain with agonyit rives my bosom with a choking and
continual spasm. An hundred times since Covington has
been gone, have I started up with the view to sending him
a message, declaring myself ready to meet his friend, but
as often has this accursed feeling come upon me,
paralyzing
the momentary courage, and depriving me of all power
of action. I feel that I cannot meet Beauchampe;I feel
that I dare not.
Great God, what are we to do? Think, my dear
fellow
,
what is due to your stationto your position in the
party? Remember, you are just now made
attorney-general
you
are the observed of all observers. Every thing
depends upon what exhibition you make now. Get over
this difficultyman yourself for this meeting and the rest
is easy. Another year puts you at the very head of the
party.
I have thought of all these things, Barnabas; and one
poor month ago, had an angel of heaven come and
assured
me that they would have failed to provoke me to
the encounter with any foe, however terrible, I should
have flouted the idle tidings. Now, I cannot.
You must! What will they say at the club? You'll be
expelled, Sharpe,think of that! You'll be cut by every
member. Covington will post you. Nay, ten to one, but
Beauchampe will undertake to horsewhip you.
I trust I shall find courage to face him then, Barnabas,
though I could not now. Look you, Barnabas,
something
can be done in another way. Beauchampe can be
acted on.
Howhow can that be done?
Two or three judicious fellows can manage it. It is
only to show him that any prosecution of this affair
necessarily
leads to the public disgrace of his wife. It is easy
to show him, that, though he may succeed in
dishonouring
me, the very act that does it, is a public advertisement
of her shame.
So it is, said the other.
Something more, Barnabas. It might be intimated to
Convington, that, as Margaret Cooper had a child
Did she, indeed?
So I ascertained by accident. She had one before
leaving Charlemont.
Indeed!well?
Well,it might have the effect of making him quiet
to show him that this child was
The rest of the sentence was whispered in the ears of
his companion.
The dl it was!exclaimed the other. But is
that certain, Sharpe?for if so it acquits you altogether.
The colour alone would be conclusive.
Certainly it would. Now, some hint of this kind to
Covington, or to Beauchampe, himself.
By Jupiter! I shouldn't like to be the man to tell him,
however. He's such a bull-dog.
Through his friend, then. It might be done,
Barnabas
;
and it can't be doubted that the dread of such a report
would effectually discourage him from any prosecution of
this business.
So it mightso it would,but
Barnabas,you must get it done.
But, my dear colonel
You must save me, Barnabasrelieve me of this
difficulty
.
You know my powermy political poweryou
see my strength. I can serve you,you cannot doubt my
willingness to serve you: but if this power is lostif I
am disgraced by this fellow, we are all lost.
True,very true. It must be done. I will see to it.
Make yourself easy. I will set about it as soon as dinner's
over.
Here the politic Mr. Barnabas looked round with an
anxious questioning of the eye, which Colonel Sharpe
understood.
Ah! dinnerI had not thought of that, but it must be
ready. Of course you will stay and dine with me.
Why, yesthough I have some famous mutton-chops
awaiting me at home.
Mine are doubtlessly as good.
We shall leave the friends to their pottage, without any
unnecessary inquiry into the degree of appetite which they
severally brought to its discussion. It may not be
impertinent
however to intimate, as a mere probability, that
Mr. Barnabas, in the discussion of the affair, was the most
able analyst of the two. The digestion of Colonel Sharpe
was, at this period, none of the best. We have said as
much before.
For that matter, neither was Beauchampe's. The
return
21*
of Convington, with the wholly unexpected refusal of
Colonel Sharpe to meet and give him redress, utterly
confounded
him. Of course he had the usual remedies. There
was the poster,which may be termed a modern letter of
credita sort of certificate of character, in one sense
carrying with it some such moral odour, as in the physical
world, is communicated by the whizzing of a pullet's egg,
addled in June, directed at the lantern visage of a long
man, honoured with a high place in the public eye, though
scarcely at ease (because of his modesty) in the precious
circumference of the pillory. Beauchampe's friend was
bound to post Colonel SharpeBeauchampe himself had
the privilege of obliterating his shame, by making certain
cancelli
on the back of the wrong-doer, with the skin of a
larger but less respectable animal. But were these
remedies
to satisfy Beauchampe? The cowskin might draw
blood from the back of his enemy; but was this the blood
which he had sworn to draw? His oath! his oath! That
was the difficulty! The refusal of Colonel Sharpe to meet
him in personal combat, left his oath unobliterated
uncomplied
with. The young man was bewildered by his
rage and disappointment. This was an unanticipated
dilemma
.
What is to be done, Covington?
Post him, at the court-house, jail, and every hotel in
town.
Post him, and what's the good of that?
You disgrace him for ever!
That will not answerthat is nothing!
You can go farther. Horsewhip himcowskin him
cut his back to ribands, whenever you meet him in the
open thoroughfare!
Did you tell him that I would do so?
I did!
It did not move him? What said he then?
Still the same! He would not fight
you
could not
lift weapon against
your
life.
The villain!the black-hearted, base, miserable
villain
!
Convington, you will go with me?
Surely! You mean to post him,or cowhide him,
or both?
No, no! That's not what I mean. I must have his
bloodhis life!
That's quite another matter, Beauchampe. I do not see
that you can do more than I have told you. He is a coward
you must proclaim him as such. Your poster does that.
He is a villainhas wronged you. You will punish him
for the wrong. Your horsewhip does that! You can do
no more, Beauchampe.
Ay, but I must, Covington. Your poster is nothing,
and the whip is nothing. I am sworn to take his life or
lose my own!
I can do no more than I have told you. I will back
you to this extentno farther.
I can force him to fight me, said Beauchampe.
In what way?
By assaulting him with my weapon, after offering him
another.
How, if he refuses to receive it?
He cannotsurelyhe will not refuse.
He will! I tell you, he will refuse. The man is
utterly frightened. I never witnessed such unequivocal
signs of cowardice in any man.
Then is he wonderfully changed.
A servant entered at this moment, and handed
Beauchampe
a letter. It was from his wife. Its contents were
brief.
I do not hear from you, BeauchampeI do not see
you. You were to have returned yesterday. Come to
me. Let me see you once more. I tremble for your
safety.
The traces of an agony which the words did not express
were clearly shown in the irregular, sharp lines of the
epistle.
I will go to her at once. I will meet you to-morrow,
Covington, when we will discuss this matter farther.
The sooner you take the steps I propose, the better,
said Covington. The delay of a day to post him, is,
perhaps, nothing; but you must not permit the lapse of
more.
I shall not post him, Covingtonthat would seem to
mock my vengeance and to preclude it. No, no! posting
will not do. The scourging may; but even that does not
satisfy me
now
. To-morrowwe shall meet
to-morrow
.
Let us go with the husband and rejoin Mrs. Beauchampe.
A week had wrought great changes in her appearance.
Her eyes have sunken, and the glazed intensity of their
stare is almost that of madness. Her voice is low,
subdued
almost to a whisper.
It is not done! she said, her lip touching his ear
her hands clasping his convulsively.
No! the miserable wretch refuses to fight with me.
She recoiled as she exclaimed,
And did you expect that he would? Did you look for
manhood or manly courage at his hands?
Ay, but he
shall
meet me! exclaimed Beauchampe,
who perceived, in this short sentence, the true character of
the duty which lay before him. I will find him, at
least, and you shall be avenged! He shall not escape me
longer. His blood or mine.
Stay! go not, Beauchampe! Risk nothing. Let me
be the victim still. Your life is precious to memore
precious than my own name. Why should you forfeit
station, pride, peace, safety,every thing for me? Leave
me, dear Beauchampeleave me to my shameleave me
to despair!
Never! never!
You are
my life. Losing you I lose
more than lifeall that can make it precious! I will not
lose you. Whatever happens, you are mine to the
last.
To the last, Beauchampethine,only thineto the
lastthe lastthe last!
She sunk into his arms. He pressed his lips upon hers,
and drawing the dirk from his bosom, he elevated it above
her head, while he mentally renewed his oath of
retribution
.
This done, he released her from his grasp, placed
her in a seat, and, once more, pressing his lips to hers, he
darted from the dwelling. In a few seconds more the
sound of his horse's feet were heard, and she started from
her seat, and from the stupor which seemed to possess
her faculties. She hurried to the window. He had
disappeared
.
He is gone! she exclaimed, pressing her hand upon
her forehead, He is gone! gone for what!Ha!I
have sent him. I have sent him on this bloody work.
Oh! surely it is madness that moves me thus! It must
be madness. Why should he murder Alfred Stevens?
What good will come of it? What safety?What!
But why should he not? Are we never to be free? Is he
to thrust himself into our homes for everto baffle our
hopesdestroy our peacepoint his exulting finger to the
hills of Charlemont, and cry aloud,`rememberthere?'
No!better he should die, and we should all die! Strike
him, Beauchampe! Strike and fear nothing! Strike
deep! Strike to the very heart,strike! strike! strike!
Why should we look longer on this mournful spectacle.
Yet the world will not willingly account this madness. It
matters not greatly by what name you call a passion which
has broken bounds, and disdains the right angles of
convention
.
Let us leave the wife for the husband.
CHAPTER XXXII.
Was
Beauchampe any more sanewe should phrase it
otherwisewas he any less mad than his wife? Perhaps,
he was more so. The simple inquiry which Mrs.
Beauchampe
had made, when he told her that Sharpe refused
to fight him, had opened his eyes to all the terrible
responsibility to which his unhappy oath had subjected
him. When he had pledged himself to take the life of her
betrayer, he had naturally concluded that this pledge
implied
nothing more than the resolution to meet with his
enemy in the duel. That a Kentucky gentleman should
shrink from such an issue did not for a moment enter his
thoughts; and it is not improbable but that, if he could
have conjectured this possibility, he had not so readily
yielded to the condition which she had coupled with her
consent to be his wife. But, after this, when in his own
house, and under the garb of friendship, Col. Sharpe
laboured to repeat his crime, still less could he have
believed
it possible that the criminal would refuse the only
mode of atonement, which, according to the practices of
that society to which they both were accustomed, was left
within his power to make. Had he apprehended this, he
would have chosen the most direct mode of vengeance
such as the social sense every where would have justified
and put the offender to death upon the very hearth which
he had striven to dishonour. That he had not done so,
was now his topic of self-reproach. An idea, whether
true or false, of what was due to a guest, had compelled
him to forbear, and to send the criminal forth, with every
opportunity to prepare himself for the penalties which his
offences had incurred. Still, up to this moment, he had
not contemplated the necessity of lifting his weapon
except
on equal terms, with the enemy whose life he sought.
In fair fight he had no hesitation at this;but, as a
murderer
,
to strike the undefended bosom,however
criminal
however
deserving of deathwas a view of the case
equally unexpected and painful. It was one for which his
previous reflections had not prepared him; and, the
excitement
under which he laboured in consequence, was one,
that, if it did not madden him deprived him at least of all
wholesome powers of reflection. While he rode to
Frankfort
,
he went as one in a cloud. He saw nothing to the
right or the left. The farmer, his neighbour, spoke to him,
but he only turned as if impatient at some interruption,
but, without answering, put spurs again to the flanks of his
horse, and darted off with a wilder speed than ever. An
instinct, rather than a purpose, when he reached Frankfort,
carried him to the lodgings of his friend Covington.
And what do you mean to do? demanded the
latter.
Kill himthere is nothing else to be done!
My dear Beauchampeyou must not think of such a
thing.
Ay, but I mustwhy should I not? Tell me that.
Shall such a monster live?
There are good reasons why you should not kill him.
If you do, unless in very fair fight; you will not only be
tried, but found guilty of the murder.
I know not that.His crime
Deserves death and should have found it at the time!
Had you put him to death when he was in your house,
and made the true cause known, the jury must have
justified
you; but you allowed the moment of provocation to
pass.
Such a moment cannot pass.
Ay, but it can and does! Time, they say, cools the
blood!
Nonsense! When every additional moment of thought
adds to the fever.
They reason otherwise. Nay, more;just now that
feeling of party runs too high. Already, they have
trumpeted
it about that Calvert sought to kill Sharpe on the
score of his attachment to Desha. They made the grounds
of that affair political, when, it seems to have been purely
your own; and if you should attempt and succeed in such
a thing, he would be considered a martyr to the party, and
you would inevitably become its victim.
Covington, do you think that I am discouraged by
this? Do you suppose I fear death? No! If the gallows
were already raisedif the executioner stood by,if I
saw the felon cart, and the gloating throng around,
gathered
to behold my agonies, I would still strike, strike
fatally, and without fear!
I know you brave, Beauchampe; but such a death
might well appal the bravest man!
It does not appal me. Understand me, Covington, I
must
slay this man!
I cannot understand you, Beauchampe. As your
friend I will not. I counsel you against the deed. I
counsel you purely with regard to your own safety.
As a friend, would you have me live dishonoured?
No! I have already counselled you how to transfer
the dishonour from your shoulders to his. Denounce him
for his crimedisgrace him by the scourge!
No! no! Covingtonthis is no redressno remedy.
His blood only can wipe out
that
shame.
I will have nothing to do with it, Beauchampe.
Will you desert me?
Not if you adopt the usual mode. Take your
horsewhip
,
arm yourself; give Sharpe notice to prepare; and
it is not impossible, then, that he will be armed, and the
rencontre may be as fatal as you could desire it. I am ready
for you to this extent.
Be it so then! Believe me, Covington, I would rather
a thousand times risk my own life than be compelled to
take his without resistance. But, understand one thing.
He or I must perish. We cannot both survive.
I will strive to bring it about; said the other, and
urged by the impatience of Beauchampe, he proceeded, a
second time, to give Col. Sharpe the necessary notice.
But Sharpe was not to be found. He was denied at his
own dwelling as in town; and Covington took the way to
the house of his arch-vassal, Mr. Barnabas. The latter
gentleman confirmed the intelligence. He stated, not only
that Sharpe had left town, but had proceeded to Bowling
Green. Covington did not conceal his object. Knowing
the character of Barnabas and his relation to Sharpe, he
addressed himself to the fears of both.
Mr. Barnabas, it will be utterly impossible for Col.
Sharpe to avoid this affair. Beauchampe will force it upon
him. He will degrade him daily in the streets of
Frankfort
he
will brand him with the whip in the sight of the
people. You know the effect of this upon a man's
character
and position.
Certainly, sir,but, Mr. Covington, Mr. Beauchampe
will do so at his peril.
To be sure,he knows that; but with such wrongs
as Mr. Beauchampe has had to sustain, he knows no peril.
He will certainly do what I tell you.
But, Mr. Covington, my dear sir,cannot this be
avoided?is there no other remedy?will no apology
no atonement of Col. Sharpesuppose a written apology
most humble and penitent, to Mr. and Mrs.
Beauchampe
.
Impossible!How could you think that such an
apology could atone for such an offencefirst the
seduction
of this lady, while yet unmarried, and next the
abominable renewal of the attempt when she had become
a wife.
But nobody believes this, Mr. Covington. It is
generally understood that the first offence is the only one
to be laid at Sharpe's doors, and this is to be urged only
on political grounds. Beauchampe supported Tompkins
against Desha, and the friends of Tompkins revive this
stale offence only to discredit Sharpe as the friend of the
former.
Mr. Barnabas
you
know better. You
know
that
Beauchampe
was the friend of Sharpe and spoke against
Calvert in his defence.
We
also know, as well as you,
that Calvert and Sharpe fought on account of this very
lady; though Desha's friends have contrived to make it
appear that the combat had a political origin.
Well, Mr. Covington, my knowledge is one thing,
that of the people another. I can only tell you that it is
very generally believed that the true cause of the affair is
political.
And how has this general knowledge been obtained,
Mr. Barnabas? remarked Covington rather sternly. As
the friend of Beauchampe, and the only one to whom he
has confided his feelings and wishes, I can answer for it
that no publicity has been given to this affair by us.
I don't know, said Barnabas, hurriedly, how the
report has got abroad. I only know that it is very
general
.
Mr. Covington rose to depart.
Let me, before leaving you, Mr. Barnabas, advise you,
as one of the nearest friends of Col. Sharpe, what he is to
expect. Mr. Beauchampe will
take the road
of him
and will horsewhip him through the streets of Frankfort
on the first occasionnay, on every occasiontill he is
prepared to fight him. I am free to add, for the benefit of
any of Col. Sharpe's friends, that I will accompany him
whenever he proposes to make this attempt.
And with this knightly intimation, Mr. Covington took
his departure.
When Beauchampe heard that Sharpe had left town,
and gone to Bowling Green, he immediately jumped on his
horse and went off in the same direction. That very
afternoon
,
Mr. Barnabas sat with his friend, Col. Sharpe, over
a bottle, and at the town-house of the latter. It had been
a falsehood by which Beauchampe was sent on a
wild-goose
chase into the country. The object was to gain
time, so as to enable the friends of both parties, or rather
the friends of the criminal, who were members of the
club, to interpose and effect an arrangement of the affair,
if such a thing were possible; and in the natural
gratification
which Sharpe felt that the danger was parried, though
for a moment only, the spirits of the criminal rose into
vivacity. The two made themselves merry with the
unfruitful
VOL. II. 22
journey which the avenger was making; not
considering
the effect of such manuvring upon a temper so
excitable, nor allowing for the accumulation of those
passions
which, as they cannot sleep, and cannot be subdued,
necessarily become more powerful in proportion to the
delay in their utterance, and the restraints to which they
are subjected. Of course Mr. Barnabas made a full report
to his principal of all that Covington had told him. There
was little in this report to please the offender; but there
were other tidings which were more gratifying. The
members of the club were busy to prevent the meeting.
Mr. Barnabas had already sent a judicious and veteran
politician to see Covington; and having a great faith
himself
in the powers of the persons he had employed, to
bring the matter to a peaceable adjustment, he had infused
a certain portion of his own faith into the breast of his
superior. And the bowl went round merrily; and the
hearts of the twain were lifted up, for, in their political
transactions, there was much that had taken place of a
character to give both of them positive gratification. And
so the evening passed until about eight o'clock, when Mr.
Barnabas suddenly recollected that he had made an
appointment
with some gentleman which required his
immediate
departure. Sharpe was unwilling to lose him,
and his spirits sunk with the departure of his friend; nor
were much enlivened by the entrance of a lady, in whose
meek, sad countenance might be read the history of an
unloved, neglected, but uncomplaining wife. He did not
look up at her approach. She placed herself in the seat
which Mr. Barnabas had left.
You look unwell, Warham. You seem to have been
troubled, my husband, she remarked with some
hesitation
,
and in a faint voice. Is any thing the matter?
Nothing which you can help, Mrs. Sharpe, he
replied
in cold and repelling accents, crossing his legs, and
half wheeling his chair about so as to turn his back upon
her. She was silenced, and looked at him with an eye
full of a sad reproach, and a lasting disappointment. No
farther words passed between them, and a few moments
only elapsed when a rap was heard at the outer entrance.
Leave the room, he said, I suppose it is Barnabas
returned. I have private business with him. You had
better go to bed.
She rose meekly and did as she was commanded. He
also rose and went to the door.
Who's thatBarnabas? he demanded while
opening
the door. He was answered indistinctly; but he
fancied
that the words were in the affirmative, and the visiter
darted in the moment the door was opened. The
passage-way
being dark, he could not distinguish the person of the
stranger except to discover that it was not the man whom
he expected. But this discovery was made almost in the
very instant when the intruder entered, and with it came
certain apprehensions of danger, which, however vague,
yet startled and distressed him. Under their influence he
receded from the entrance, moving backward with his face
to the stranger till he re-entered the sitting apartment. The
moment that the light fell upon the face of the visiter his
knees knocked against one another. It was Beauchampe.
Beauchampe! he involuntarily exclaimed with a
hollow voice, while his dilated eyes regarded the fierce,
wild aspect of the visiter.
Ay! Beauchampe! were the echoed tones of the
othertones almost stifled in the deep intensity of mood
with which they were spoken. Tones, low, but deep,
like those of some dull convent bell, echoing at midnight
along the gray rocks and heights of some half-deserted
land. As deep and soul-thrilling as would be such sounds
upon the ear of some wanderer, unconscious of any
neighbourhood
,
did they fall upon the sudden sense of that
criminal
.
His courage instantly failed him. His knees smote
each otherhis tongue clove to his mouthhe had strength
enough only to recede as if with the instinct of flight.
Beauchampe caught his arm.
You cannot flyyou must stay! My business will
suffer no farther postponement.
Beauchampe forced him into a chair.
What is the matter, Beauchampe? What do you
mean to do? gasped the trembling criminal.
Does not your guilty soul tell you what I
should
do?
was the stern demand.
I
am
guilty! was the half choking answer.
Ay, but the confession alone will avail nothing. You
must atone for your guilt.
On my knees, Beauchampe?
No! with your blood!
Spare me, Beauchampe! oh! spare my life. Do not
murder mefor I cannot fight you on account of that
injured
woman!
This whining will not answer, Col. Sharpe. You
must fight me. I have brought weapons for both.
Choose!
The speaker threw two dirks upon the floor at the feet
of the criminal, while he stood back proudly.
Choose! he repeatedpointing to the weapons.
But the latter, though rising, so far from availing
himself
of the privilege, made an effort to pass his enemy and
escape from the room. But the prompt arm of
Beauchampe
arrested him and threw him back with some force
towards the corner of the apartment.
Col. Sharpe, you cannot escape me. The falsehood
of your friend, which sent me from the city, has resolved
me to suffer no more delay of justice. Will you fight me?
Choose of the weapons at your feet.
I cannot! spare me, Beauchampemy dear friend
for the pastin consideration of what we have been to
each otherspare my life!
You thought not of this, villain, when, in the
insolence
of your heart, you dared to bring your lust into my
dwelling.
Beauchampe, hear me for your own sake, hear me.
Speak! speak briefly. I am in no mood to trifle.
My crime was that of a young man
Stay!your crime was the invasion of my family
of its peace!
Ah!that
was
a crimeif it were so.
What, do you mean to deny! Dare you to impute
falsehood to my wife?
Beauchampe, she is your wife; and for this reason,
I will not say what I might say, but
Oh! speak allspeak all! I am curious to see by
what new invention of villany you hope to deceive me.
No villanyno invention, BeauchampeI speak only
the solemn truth. Before God, I assure you it is the truth
only which I will deliver.
You swear?
Solemnly.
Speak, thenbut take up the dirk.
No! If you will but hear me, I do not fear to
convince
you that there needs none either in your hands or
mine.
You are a good lawyer, keen, quick-witted and very
logical; but it will task better wits than yours to alter my
faith that you are a villain, and that you shall perish by
this hand of mine.
Beauchampe stooped and possessed himself of one of
the weapons.
Speak now! what have you to say? Remember, Col.
Sharpe, you have not only summoned God to witness
your truth, but you may be summoned in a few moments
to his presence to answer for your falsehood. I am sent
here, solemnly sworn, to take your life!
But only because you believed me a criminal in
respects
in which I am innocent. If I show you that I never
approached Mrs. Beauchampe, while your wife, except
with the respect due to herself and you
Liar! but you cannot show me
that!
I tell you, I
believe
what she has told me. I know her truth and your
falsehood.
She is prejudiced, my dear friend. She hates me
And with good reason; but hate you as she may, she
speaks, and can speak, nothing in your disparagement but
the truth.
She has misunderstoodmistaken me, in what I
said.
Stay! approaching him. Stay!do not deceive
yourself, Col. Sharpeyou cannot deceive me. She has
detailed the whole of your vile overturesthe very words
of shame and guilt, and villanous baseness which you
employed.
Beauchampemy dear friend!are you sure that she
has
told you all?
Here the criminal approached with extended hand,
while he assumed a look of mysterious meaning, which
left something for the other to anticipate.
Sure that she told me all? Ay! I
am
sure! What
remains? Speak outand leave nothing to these smooth,
cunning faces. Speak out, while the time is left you.
Did she tell you of our first meeting in Charlemont?
Ay, did she
that!
every thing!
22*
I seek not to excuse my crime,
there,
Beauchampe
but that was not a crime against
you!
I did not know you
then. I did not then fancy that you would ever be so
allied to
Cease thatand say what you deem needful.
Did she tell you of the child?
Child! what child? demanded Beauchampe with a
start of surprise.
The face of Sharpe put on a look of exultation. He felt
that he had gained a point.
Ah! ha! I could have sworn that she did not tell you
all!
The eyes of Beauchampe glared more fiercely, and the
convulsive twitching of the hand which held the dagger,
and the quivering of his lip, might have warned his
companion
of the danger which he incurred of trifling with
him longer. But Sharpe's policy was to induce the
suspicions
of Beauchampe in relation to his wife. He fancied,
from the unqualified astonishment which appeared in the
latter's face, as he spoke of the child, that he had secured
a large foothold in this respect, for it was very evident
that Mrs. Beauchampe, while relating every thing of any
substantial importance which concerned herself, had
evidently
omitted that portion of the narrative which concerned
the unhappy and short-lived offspring of her guilty error.
It does not need to inquire why she had forborne to
include
this particular in her statement to her husband.
There may have been some superior pang in the
recollection
of that gloomy period which had followed her fall;
and it was not necessary to the frank confession which she
had freely offered of her guilt. But, though unimportant,
Col. Sharpe very well knew, that there is a danger in the
suppression of any fact, in a case like this, where the
relations
are so nice and sensitive, which is like to invoke an
appearance of guilt, and to lead to its presumption. Like
an experienced practitioner at the sessions, he deemed it
important to dwell upon this particular.
I could have sworn! he repeated, that she had not
told you of that child. Ah! my dear friend,spare me
the necessity of telling you what she has forborne. She
is now your wife. Her reputation is yoursher shame
would be yours also. Believe me, I repent of all I have
donefor your sake, for hersbelieve me, moreover,
when I assure you that she mistook my language, when she
fancied that I meant indignity in what I said lately in your
house.
But
I
could not mistake that, Col. Sharpe.
No! but did you hear it rightly reported?
Ay! she would not deceive me. You labour in vain.
This dirty work is easy with you; but it does not blind
me! Col. Sharpe,what child is this that you speak of?
Her child, to be sure!
Her child! Had she a child?
To be sure she had. Ask her,she will not deny it,
perhapsand if she does I can prove it.
Her child!and yours?
No! no! No child of mine!
Ha! not your child! Whose,whose then?
Go to her, my dear friend! Ask her of that child.
Where is the child?
Dead!
Dead! well! what of it then?
Go to herask
her
whose it was? Ah! my dear
Beauchampe, let
me
say no more. Press
me
no farther to
speak. She is
your
wife!
The eye of Beauchampe settled upon him with a
suddenly
composed but stony expression.
Say
all!
he said deliberately. Disburthen yourself
of all! I request it particularly, Col. Sharpe,nay, I
command
it.
My dear friend, Beauchampe, I really would prefer not
ah! it is an ugly business.
Do not trifle, Col. Sharpespeakyou do not help
your purpose by this prevarication. What do you know
farther of this child. It was not yours, you say,whose
was it then?
It was not mine!but to say whose it was is scarce
so easy a matter, but and he drew nigh and
whispered
the rest of the sentence, some three syllables, into
the ears of the husband. The latter recoiled. His face
grew black, his hand grasped the dagger with nervous
rigidity, and, while the look of cunning confidence
mantled
the face of the criminal, and before he could recede
from the fatal proximity to which, in whispering, he had
brought himself with the avenger, the latter had struck.
The sharp edge of the dagger had answered the shocking
secret, whatever might have been its character, and the
solemn oath of the husband was redeemedredeemed in a
single moment, and by a single blow! The wrongs of
Margaret Cooper were at last avenged, but her sorrows
were not ended! How should they be? The hand that is
stained with human blood, in whatever cause, must bide a
dreary destiny, before the waters of heavenly mercy shall
cleanse and sweeten it! Col. Sharpe fell at the feet of the
avenger. A single blow had slain him!
CHAPTER XXXIII.
A murder
in a novel is a matter usually of a thousand
very thrilling minuti. In the hands of that excellent
historico-romancer of modern days, Mr. G. P. R. James,
you would see what he would make of it. You would be
confounded at the dilating substance, the accumulating
details
the
fact upon factwhether of moment or not, is
not necessary to be asked herewhich grows out of it on
every hand. You should see the good old butler of the
household, Saunders Maybin or Richard Swopp, by name,
going forth at morning, and suddenly encountering a
blood-spot
upon the grass. At which sight the said Saunders
starts, and shakes his head significantly; and says, with
native sagacity, this is miching malico; it means
mischief
.
And so saying, he goes on nosingall sense from
that momenttill he finds the fag end of a carcass jutting
out from a dung-heap. Nay, it may not be so easily found,
and it may not be in a dung-heap. It may be in the bushes
only, but they may be a good long summer day in finding
it, and by that time the nose of the seeker becomes of rare
service in the search. But, whatever may be the
particulars
,
you have 'em all; even to the very shape and size of
the woundmade by bowie-knife or bludgeon-stroke
under which the poor man perished. Then follows
crowner's quest, lawyer's arguments, difference of
opinion
,
and so forth; and there is always an innocent man
nigh, to look like the guilty one, and, by some cursed
stupidity
,
to get himself laid by the heels in prison to answer
the offence. This is a notable way to relate such an affair, if
it wasn't that some censorious people think it rather tedious.
Having seen how Sharpe was murdered, who was the
murderer
,
and how the blow was struckwe shall not fatigue the
reader in showing how many versions of the affair got abroad
among those who were, of course, more and more positive
in their conjectures in proportion to the small knowledge
which they possessed. We make short a story, which,
long enough already, we apprehend, might, by an ingenious
romancer, be made a great deal longer. Suspicion fell
instantly
on Beauchampe. On whom else should it fall? He
had announced his purpose to take the life of the criminal;
and wherever Sharpe's offence had got abroad, people
expected
that he would commit the deed. In our country a
great many crimes are committed to gratify public
expectation
.
Most of our duels are fought to satisfy the demands
of public opinion, by which is understood the opinions of
that little set, batch, or clique, of which some long-nosed
Solomonsome addle-pated leader of a score whose brains
are thrice addled, is the sapient lawgiver and head. Most
of the riots and mobs are instigated by half-witted
journalists
,
who first goad the offender to his crime, and, the next
day, rate him soundly for its commission. He who, in a
fit of safe valour, the day before, taunted his neighbour
with cowardice for submitting to an indignity; lifts up his
holy hands with horror when he hears that the nose-pulling
is avenged; and, as a conscientious juryman, hurries the
wretch to the halter who has only followed his own
suggestions
in braining the assailant with his bludgeon. All
this is certainly very amusing, and, with proper details,
makes a murder-paragraph in the newspaper which delights
the old ladies to as great an extent as a marriage does the
young ones. It produces that pleasurable excitement which
is the mental brandy and tobacco to all persons of the
Anglo-Saxon
breed, for which the appetite is tolerably equal in
both Great Britain and America.
In Beauchampe's case, the hue and cry knew, by a sort
of instinct, in which way to turn its sagacious nostrils.
Beauchampe returned to his dwelling, but not with the steps
of fear; not even with those of flight. His journey
homewards
was marked with the deliberation of one who feels
that he has performed a duty, the neglect of which had
long been burdensome and painful to his conscience. It is
of course to be understood that he was labouring under a
degree of excitement which makes it something like an
absurdity to talk of conscience at all. The fanaticism
which now governed his feelings, and had sprung from
them, possessed his mind also. With the air of one who
has gone through a solemn and severe ordeal, with the
feeling of a martyr, he presented himself before his wife.
The deliberation of monomania is one of its most
remarkable
features. It is singularly exemplified by one portion
of his proceedings. On leaving her to seek the interview
with Sharpe, he had informed her, not only on what day,
but at what hour, to look for his return; and he reached
his dwelling within fifteen minutes of the appointed
moment
.
Anxiously expecting his arrival, she had walked
down the grove to meet him. On seeing her he raised his
handkerchief, red with the bloody proofs of his crime, and
waved it in the manner of a flag. She ran to meet him,
and as he leapt from his horse, she fell prostrate on her
face before him. Her whole frame was convulsed, and
she burst into a flood of tears.
Why weep; why tremble? he exclaimed. Do
you weep that the deed is donethe shame washed out
in the blood of the criminalthat you are avenged at last?
His accents were stern and reproachful. She lifted her
hands and eyes to heaven as she replied
No! not for this I weep and tremble; or, if for this, it
is in gratitude to heaven that has smiled upon the deed.
But though she spoke this fearful language, she spoke
not the true feeling of her soul. We have already striven to
show that she no longer possessed those feelings which
would have desired the performance of the deed. She no
longer implored revenge. She strove to reject the memory
of the murdered man, as well as of the wanton crime by
which he had provoked his fate; and the emotion which
she expressed, when she beheld the bloody signal waving
from her husband's hands, had its birth in the revolting of
that feminine nature, which, even in her, after the long
contemplation
which had made her imagination familiar with
the crime, was still in the ascendant. But this she
concealed
.
This she denied, as we have seen. Her motive
was a noble one. It is soon expressed. He has done
the deed for mein my behalf! Shall I now refuse
approbation
shall
I withhold my sympathy? No! let his guilt
be what it may, he is mine, and I am his, for ever! And
with this resolve, she smiled upon the murderer, kissed his
bloody hands, and lifted her own to heaven in seeming
gratitude for its sanction of the crime.
But a new feeling was added to those which, however
conflicting, her words and looks had just expressed. She
rose from the ground in apprehension.
But are you safe, my husband? she demanded.
What matters it? he replied. Has he not fallen
beneath my arm?
Yes,but if you are not safe!
I know not what degree of safety I need, was his
reply. I have thought but little of that. If you mean,
however, to ask whether I am suspected or not, I tell you
I believe I am. Nay, moreI think the pursuers are after
me. They will probably be here this very night. But
what of this, dear wife? I have no fears. My heart is
light. I am really happynever more sosince the deed
is done. I could laugh, dance, sing,practise any mirth
or madnessjust as one who has been relieved of his
pain, throws by his crutch and feels his limbs and strength
free at last, after a bondage to disease for years.
And he caught her in his arms as he spoke, and his
eye danced with a strange fire, which made the woman
shudder to behold it. A cold tremor passed through her
veins.
Are you not happy toodo you not share with me
this joy? he demanded.
Oh, yes, to be sure I do!she replied with a husky
apprehension in her voice which, however, he did not
seem to see.
I knew it,I knew you would be! Such a relief,
ending in a triumph, should make us both so happy. I
never was more joyful, my dear wife. Never! never!
and he laughed,laughed until the woods resounded,
and did not heed the paleness of her cheek; did not feel
the faltering of her limbs as he grasped her to his breast,
did not note the wildness in her eye, as she looked
stealthily backward on the path over which he came.
She, at least, was now fully in her senses, whatever
she may have been before. She stopped him in his anties.
She drew him suddenly aside, into the cover of the grove
for, by this time, they had come in sight of the dwelling
and throwing herself on her knees, clasped his in her
arms, while she implored his instant flight. But he flatly
refused, and she strove in vain, however earnestly, to
change his determination. All that she could obtain from
him was a promise to keep silent, and not, by any act of
his own, to facilitate the progress of those who might seek
to discover the proofs of his criminality. Crime, indeed,
he had long ceased to consider his performance. The
change, in this respect, which had taken place in her
feelings and opinions had produced none in his. His
mind had been wrought up to something like a religious
frenzy. He regarded the action not only as something
due to justicean action appointed for himself
particularly
,but
as absolutely and intrinsically glorious.
Perhaps
,
indeed, such an act as his, should always be
estimated
with reference to the sort of world in which the
performer lives. What were those brave deeds of the
middle ages, the avenging of the oppressed, the widow,
and the orphan, by which stalwart chiefs made themselves
famous? Crimes, too, and sometimes of the blackest
sort, but that they had their value as benefits at a period
when society afforded no redress for injury, and
consequently
no protection for innocence. And what
protection
did society afford to Margaret Cooper, and what
redress for injury? Talk of your action for damages
your five thousand dollars,and of what avail to such a
woman; robbed of innocence; mocked, persecuted,
followed to the last refuge of her life, the home of her
mother and her husband; and afterwards, thrice
blackened
in fame by the wanton criminal by slanders of the
most shocking invention. Society never yet could
succeed
in protecting and redressing all its constituents, or
any one of them, in all his or her relations. There are a
thousand respects where the neighbours must step in
where to await for law, or to hope for law, is to leave the
feeble and the innocent to perish. You hear the cry of
murder? Do you stop, and resume your seat with the
comforting reflection that if John murders Peter, John,
after certain processes of evidence, will be sent to the
state prison or the gallows, and make a goodly show on
some gloomy Friday, for the curious of both sexes. Law
is a very good thing in its way, but it is not every thing;
and there are some honest impulses, in every manly
bosom, which are the best of all moral laws, as they are
the most certainly
human
of all laws. Give us, say I,
Kentucky practice, like that of Beauchampe, as a social
law, rather than that which prevails in some of our pattern
cities, where women are, in three-fourths the number of
instances, the victims,violated, mangled, murdered,
where men are the criminals, and where(Heaven kindly
having withdrawn the sense of shame)there is no one
guiltyat least none brave enough, or manly enough to
bring the guilty to punishment. What is said is not meant
to defend or encourage the shedding of blood. We may
not defend the taking of life, even by the laws. We
regard
life as an express trust from Heaven, of which, as
we should not divest ourselves, no act but that of Heaven
should divest us; but there is a crime beyond it, in the
shedding of that vital soul-blood, its heart of hearts, life
of all life, the fair fame, the untainted reputation; and the
one offence which provokes the other, should be placed
in the opposing balance, as an offset, in some degree, to
the crime by which it is avenged.
VOL. II. 23
CHAPTER XXXIV.
We
could tell a long story about the manner in which
Beauchampe was captured,but it will suffice to say that
when the pursuers presented themselves at his
threshold
,
he was ready, and with the high, confident spirit of
one assured that all was right in his own bosom, he
yielded himself up at their summons, and attended them
to Frankfort. Behold him there in prison. The cold,
gloomy walls are around him, and all is changed, of the
sweet, social outer world, in the aspects which meet his
eye. But the woman of his heart is there with him; and
if the thing that we love is left us, the dungeon has its
sunshine, and the prison is still a home. The presence
of the loved one hallows it into home. Amidst doubt, and
privation,the restraint he endures, and the penal doom
which he may yet have to suffer,her affection rises
always above his affliction, and baffles the ills that would
annoy, and soothes the restraint which is unavoidable.
She has a consolation such as woman alone knows to
administer, for the despondency that weighs upon him.
She can soothe the dark hours with her song, and the
weary ones with her caress and smile. But not to
ordinary
appeals like these does the wife of his bosom
confine
her ministry. Her soul rises in strength
corresponding
to the demands of his. Ardent in his nature, little
used to restraint, the circumscribed boundary of his prison
grows irksome, at moments, beyond his temper to
endure
.
At such moments his heart fails him, and doubts
ariseshadows of the solemn truth which always haunt
the soul of the wrong-doer, however righteous to his
diseased mind may seem his deeds at the moment of their
performance;doubts that distress him with the fear that
he may still have erred. To the pure heart,to the
conscientious
spiritthere is nothing more distressing than
such a doubt; and this very distress is the remorse which
religion loves to inspire, when it would promote the
workings
of repentance. It is misplaced kindness that the
wife of Beauchampe undertakes to fortify his faith, and
strengthen him in the conviction that all is right. We
cannot blame her, though pity 'tis 'twas so. She no
longer speaks,perhaps she no longer thinksof the
deed which he has done, as an event either to be
deplored
,
or to have been avoided. She speaks of it as a
necessary misfortune. As she found that he derived his
chief consolation from the conviction that the deed was
laudable, she toils, with deliberate ingenuity and industry,
to confirm his impressions. Through the sad, slow-pacing
moments of the midnight, she sits beside him and renews
the long and cruel story of her wrong. She suppresses
nothing now. That portion of the narrative relating to
the child, from her previous suppression of which, the
unhappy man whom he had slain, had striven to originate
certain doubts of her conduct, and to infuse them into the
mind of Beauchampe,was all freely told, and its
previous
suppression explained and accounted for. The
wife seemed to take a singular and sad pleasure in
reiterating
this painful narrative; and yet, every repetition of
the tale brought to her spirit the pang, as keenly felt as
ever, of her early humiliation. But she saw that the
renewal
of the story strengthened the feeling of
self-justification
in the mind of her husband! That was the rock
upon which he stood, and to confirm the solidity of that
support, was to lighten the restraints of his prison, and
all the terrors which might be inspired by the
apprehension
of his doom. Of the mere stroke of death, he had no
fears: but there is something in the idea of a felon death
by the halter, which distresses and subjugates the strongest
nerves. This idea sometimes came to afflict the prisoner,
but the keen instincts of his wife enabled her very soon
to discover the causes of his depression, and her quick
commanding intellect provided her with the arguments
which were to combat them.
Do not fear, my husband, she would say. I know
that they must acquit you. No jury of menmen who
have wives, and daughters, and sisters, but must not only
acquit of crime, but must justify you and applaud you
for the performance of a deed which protects their
innocence
,
and strikes terror into the heart of the seducer.
You have not been my champion merely, you are the
champion of my sex. The blow which your arm has
struck, was a blow in behalf of every unprotected female,
of every poor orphan; fatherless, brotherless, and
undefended
;
who otherwise would be the prey of the ruffian
and the betrayer. No, no! There can be no cause of
fear. I do not fear for you. I will myself go into the
court, and, if need be, plead your cause by telling the
whose story of my wrong. They shall hear me. I will
neither fear nor blushand they shall believe me when
they hear.
But to this course the husband objected. The heart of a
man is more keenly alive to the declared shame of one he
truly loves, than to the loss of life or of any other great
sacrifice which the social man can make. Besides,
Beauchampe
knew better than his wife what would be permitted,
and what denied, in the business of a court of justice.
Still, it was necessary that steps should be taken for his
defence. At first, he proposed to argue his own case; but
he was very soon conscious, after a few moments given
to reflection on this subject, that his feelings would enter
too largely into his mind to suffer it to do him, or itself
justice. While undetermined what course to pursue, or
who to employ, his friend Covington suggested the name
of Calvert, as that of a lawyer likely to do him more
justice
by far than any other that he could name.
I know, Col. Calvert, said the young manand I
can assure you he has no superior as a jury pleader in the
country. He is very popularmakes friends wherever he
goes, and is beginning to be accounted, every where, the
only man who could have taken the field against Sharpe.
But what was it that you told me of his fighting with
Sharpe on my account? was the inquiry of Beauchampe,
now urged with a degree of curiosity which he had neither
shown nor felt, when the fact was first mentioned to
him.
Of that I can tell you little. It is very well known
that Sharpe and Calvert quarrelled and fought, almost at
their first meeting. The friends of Sharpe asserted that
the quarrel arose on account of offensive words which
Calvert made use of in disparagement of Desha.
Yes, I heard
that
now I rememberfrom Barnabas
himself.
Such was the story; but Sharpe assured me that the
affair really took place on account of Mrs. Beauchampe.
Mrs. Beauchampe! exclaimed the husband. The
wife, who was present, looked up inquiringly, but said
nothing. Mr. Covington looked to the lady and remained
silent, while, with a face suddenly flushed, Beauchampe
motioned to his wife to leave them. When she had done
so, Covington repeated what had been said by Sharpe
concerning
his duel with Calvert.
It was only some lie of his, intended to help his
evasion
.
It was to secure the temporary object. I never
heard of Calvert from my wife.
Such was Beauchampe's opinion. But Covington thought
otherwise.
A rumour has reached me since, he added, which
leads me to think that the story is not altogether without
foundation. At all events, whether there be any thing or
not, Calvert will be your man for the defence. If any
thing is to be done, he will do it. But really, Beauchampe,
if you have stated all the particulars, they can establish
nothing against you.
Ah! the general persuasion that I ought to kill Sharpe,
will produce testimony enough. I think I shall escape,
Covington, but it will be in spite of the testimony. I will
escape, because of the sentiment of justice, which, in the
breast of every honest man, will say, that Sharpe ought to
die, and that no hand had a better right to take his life
than mine. But you know the faction. They are strong
his friends and relatives are numerous. They will strain
every nerve,spare no money, and suborn testimony
enough to effect their object. They will fail, I think;
I can scarcely say I hope, for, of a truth, my dear fellow,
it seems to me that I have done the great act of my life.
I feel as if I had performed the crowning achievement. I
could do nothing more meritorious if I lived a thousand
years; and death, therefore, would not be to me
now
such a misfortune as I should have regarded it a month
ago. Still, life has something for me. I should like to
live. The thought of losing
her,
is a worse pang than
any that the mere loss of life could inflict.
The prisoner was touched as he said these words. A
big tear gathered in his eye, and he averted his face from
23*
his companion. Covington rose to depart. As he did so
he asked
Shall I see Calvert for you, Beauchampe.
I will think of it and let you know to-morrow, was
the reply.
The sooner the better. Your enemies are busy, and
Calvert lives at some distance. He must be written to,
and time may be lost as he may be on the road now
somewhere
.
I will look in upon you in the morning.
Do so. I shall then be better able to say what should
be done. I will think of it to-night: but, of a truth,
Covington
,
I do not feel disposed to do any thing. I prefer to
remain inactive. For what should I say? Speak out?
That would be against all legal notions of making a
defence
.
And yet, I know no mode, properly, of defending
myself, than by declaring the act my own, and justifying
it as such. To myselfto my own soul, it is thus
justified
.
God! if it were not! But, in order to make this
justification felt by the jury, they must know my secret.
They must hear all that damning tale of
her
trial and
overthrow
,
and the serpent-like progress of him whose head I
have bruised for ever. How can
I
tell
that?
That is
impossible!
Covington agreed with the speaker, who proceeded
thus
Well then, I am silent. The general issue is one of
form, pleading which I am not supposed to be guilty of
any violation of the laws of morals,though what an
absurdity is that!I plead it, and keep silent. The
onus
probandi
lies with the state
And it can prove nothing, if your statement be
correct
.
Non sequilur,
my good fellow. My statement
is
correct. Nobody saw me commit the deed. The clothes
which I wore are sunk to the bottom of the Kentucky
riverthe dirk is buriedand I know, that, with the
exception
of the great Omniscient, my proceedings were
hidden from the eyes of all. But it does not follow from
this that there will be no evidence against me. I suspect
there will be witnesses enough. The friends and family
of Sharpe will suborn witnesses. There are hundreds of
people, too, who readily believe what they fancy; and
conjecture will make details fast enough, which the vanity
of seeming to know will prompt the garrulous to deliver.
I am convinced that vanity makes a great many witnesses,
who will lie for the sake of having something to say, and
will swear to the lie for the sake of having an audience
who are compelled to listen to them. With a little
management
,
you can get any thing sworn to. You have heard
of the philosopher, who, under a bet, with some previous
arrangement, collected a crowd in the street to see certain
stars at noonday, which soon became visible to as many
as looked. Some few did not see so many stars as others,
nor did they seem to these, so bright as the rest; but all
of them saw the starsthey were there,that was enough;
and some of your big mouthed observers looked a few
incipient moons or comets, and of course were more
conspicuous
themselves, in consequence of their conspicuous
sight-seeing. If I have any fear at all, it will be from
some such quarter. The friends of Sharpe have already
turned upon me as the criminal, and other eyes will follow
theirs. Those who know the crime of Sharpe will
conclude
that the deed is mine from a conviction which all
have felt that it should be mine; and not to look to the
political manuvres for interference. I make no question
but they will find the very dagger with which the deed is
done; perhaps, half a dozen daggers, each of which will
have its believer, and each believer will be possessed of as
many leading circumstances, to identify the murderer.
I believe that they will try to convict you,
Beauchampe
,
but I cannot think, with you, that witnesses are
so easy to be found.
We shall see. We shall see.
At all events, a good lawyer, who will test such
witnesses
to the quick will be the best security against their
frauds, whether these arise from vanity or malevolence;
and I cannot too earnestly recommend you to let me see or
write to Calvert.
On that point, I will give you my answer hereafter,
said Beauchampe evasively.
In the morning. Suggested the other.
Ay, perhaps so. At least, Covington, let me see you
then.
The other promised, and, taking a kind farewell,
departed
.
When he had gone, the wife of Beauchampe
reappeared
,
and with some earnestness of manner, he directed
her to sit beside him upon his pallet.
Anna, said he,you never told me any thing of a
Mr. Calvert. Do you know any such person, and how
are you interested in him?
I know but one person of the namean old gentleman
who taught school at Charlemont. But I have neither
seen or heard of him for years.
An old gentleman! How old?
Perhaps sixty or sixty-five.
Not the same! But, perhaps, he had a son? Now,
I remember, that when I went to Bowling Green, there
was an old gentleman, with a very white head, who seemed
intimate with Col. Calvert.
He had no sonnone, at least, that I ever saw.
It is strange.
What is strange, Beauchampe? she asked. He then
told her all that he had learned from Covington. She
concurred with him that it was strange, if true; but,
declared her belief that the story was an invention of
Sharpe by which he hoped to effect some object which he
might fancy favourable to his safety.
But, at all events, husband, employ this Col. Calvert
of whom Mr. Covington and the public seem to think so
highly. You have spoken very highly of him yourself.
Yes: was the reply:but somehow, Anna, I am
loath to do any thing in my defence. I hate to seek
evasion
from the dangers of an act which I performed
deliberately
,
and would again perform, were it again
necessary
.
But this is a strange prejudice, surely, Beauchampe.
Why should you not defend yourself?
I would, my wife, if defence, in this case, implied
justification.
And does it not? demanded the wife anxiously.
No, nothing like it. It implies evasion,the
suppression
of the truth if not the suggestion of the falsehood.
You are no lawyer, Anna. The truth would condemn
me.
What! the
whole
truth?
No! Perhaps notbut it would be difficult to get the
whole
truth before a jury, and even if this could be done,
could I
do it.
And why not, my husband? she demanded earnestly,
approaching him at the same moment, and laying her hand
impressively upon his shoulder, while her eyes were fixed
upon his own.
And why not? The day of shameshame from this
causehas gone by from us. We are either above or
below
the world. At least we depend not for the heart's
sustenance upon it. Suppose it scorns and reviles us
suppose it points to me as the miserable victim of that
viperous lust which crawled into our vallyes with a glozing
tongue; I, that know how little I was the slave of that foul
passion, in my own breast, will not madden, more than I
have done, at its contumelious judgment. They cannot
call me harlot. No! Beauchampe! I fellI was trampled
in the dust of shame; I was guilty of weakness and vanity
and wilfulnessbut, believe me, if ever spirit felt the
remorse
and the ignominy, which belongs to virtuous
repentance
of error, that spirit was mine!
I know itdo I not know it, dearest? he said
tenderly
taking her in his arms.
I believe you know and feel it, and this conviction,
Beauchampe, strengthens me against the world. In your
judgment I fixed my proper safety for the future. Let the
world know allthe whole truth,if that will any thing
avail for your justification. Let them speak of me
hereafter
as they please. Secure in myselfsecure from the
self-reproach of having fallen a victim to the harlot
appetite
though
the victim to my own miserable vanity and
follydoubly secure in your conviction of the truth of
what I say, and amI can smile at all that followsI can
do more, Beauchampe, endure it with patience and
fortitude
,
and without distressing you or myself with the
language
of complaint. Do not, therefore, dear Beauchampe,
refuse the justification which the truth may bring, through
any wish to save me from the farther exposure. Hear me,
when I assure you, solemnly, in this solemn midnight
with no eye upon us in this cold, gloomy dungeon, but
that of Heavenhear me solemnly affirm that though you
should resolve to spare me, I will not spare myself. If
need be, I will go into the court-housebefore the
assembled
judgesbefore the people, and with my own tongue
declare the story of my shame. Base should I be, indeed,
if, to save these cheeks from the scarlet which would
follow
such a recital, I could see them hale you to the
ignominious
gallows.
And sooner would I die a thousand deaths on that
gallows
,
than suffer you to do yourself such cruel wrong!
Such was the answer, spoken with effort, with husky
accents, which the criminal made to the strong-minded
woman, whose high-souled, and seemingly unnatural
resolution
however
opposed to hisyet touched him really
as a proof of the most genuine devotion. He did not say
morehe did not offer to dispute a resolution which he
well knew he could not overthrow; but he determined,
inly, to practice some becoming artifice, to deprive her,
when the crisis of his fate was at hand, of any opportunity
of meddling in its progress.
Thus the night wanedthe long, dark night in that
gloomy dungeon. Not altogether gloomy! Devotion makes
light in the dark places. Love cheers the solitude with its
own pure star-lighted countenance. Sincerity wins us
from the contemplation of the darkness; and with the
sweet word of the truthful comforter in our ear, the fever
subsides from the throbbing temples, and the downcast
heart is lifted into hope. That night, and every night, she
shared with him his dungeon!
CHAPTER XXXV.
The
arguments of Covington, to persuade Beauchampe
to employ the services of Calvert, were unavailing. He,
at length, gave it up in despair. The very suggestion
which Sharpe had made, that Calvert had some knowledge
already of the wife's character, and that the duel between
himself and Calvert had originated in the knowledge of his
wrong to herhowever curious it made Beauchampe to
learn what relation the latter could have had to his wife
was also a cause, why, in the general soreness of his
feelings
on this subject, he should studiously avoid his
professional
assistance. The wife, when Covington took his
departure, renewed the attempt. The arguments of the
latter had been more imposing to her mind than they were
to that of the husband; but, repeated by her, they did not
prove a jot more successful than when urged by
Covington
.
To these she added suggestions of her own, a
sample
of which we have seen in a previous chapter; but the
prisoner remained stubborn. The wife at length ceased to
persuade, having, with the quick perception and nice
judgment
which distinguished her character, observed the true
point of difficultyone not to be easily overcomeand
which was to be assailed in a manner much more indirect.
She resolved to engage the services of Calvert herself.
Her own curiosity had been raised in some degree by what
she had heard in respect to this person, and though she did
not believe the story which Covington got from Sharpe,
touching the causes of the duel between himself and rival,
yet the fact that they had fought, and that Calvert had been
wounded in the conflict with her enemy, of itself
commended
the former to her regard. As the period for her
husband's trial drew nigh, her anxieties naturally increased,
so as to strengthen her in the resolution which she had
already formed to secure those legal services which
Beauchampe
had rejected. Accordingly, concealing her purpose,
she absented herself from the prison, and, having secured
the necessary information, set forth on her mission.
Of the prosperous fortunes of William Calvert some
glimpses have already been given to the reader in the latter
half of this narrative. These glimpses, we trust, have
sufficed to satisfy any curiosity, which the story of his
youth and youthful disappointments might have occasioned
in any mind. We understand, of course, that, thrown
upon his own resources, driven from the maternal
petticoats
,
which enfeeble and destroy so many thousand sons,
the necessities to which he was subjected, in the rough
attrition of the world had brought into active exercise all
the materials of his physical and intellectual manhood. He
had plodded over the dusky volumes of the law with
unrelaxing
diligence. He had gone through his probationary
period without falling into any of those emasculating
practices
which too often enslave the moral sense and dissipate
the intellectual courage of young men. He had graduated
with credit; had begun practice with an unusual quantity
of business patronage, and had made his debut with a
degree
of eclat, which, while it put to rest all the
apprehensions
of the good old man who had adopted him, had
effectually
commended him to the public, as one of the strong
men to whom they could turn with confidence, to
represent
the characteristics and maintain the rights of the
people
.
Of his success, some idea may be formed, if we
remember the position in which he stood in the conflict
with Col. Sharpe. If the latter was the Coryphus of
one party, William Calvert was regarded by all eyes as the
most prominent champion of the other; and though the
other party might be in the minority, it was not the less
obvious to most, that, if the success of the party could be
made entirely to depend upon the relative strength of the
representative combatants, the result would have been very
far otherwise. The best friends of Sharpe, as we have
already seen, endeavoured to impress upon him the belief,
which they really felt, that, with such an opponent as
William Calvert in the field against him, it would require
the exercise of his very best talents in order to maintain
his ground. We need not dwell longer on this part of our
subject.
But with the prominence of position, taken of necessity
by William Calvert, in the political world, was an
accumulation
of legal business which necessarily promised
fortune
.
In the brief space of three years which followed his
admission to the bar, his clients became so numerous as to
render it necessary that he should concentrate his attentions
upon a more limited circuit of practice. Other effects
followed
,
and the good old man whose name he had taken,
leaving Charlemont, like his protg, for ever, had come to
live with him in the flourishing town where he had taken
up his abode. Here their united funds enabled them to
buy a fine house and furnish it with a taste, which, day by
day, added some object of ornament or use. The comforts
being duly considered, the graces were necessarily secured,
as the accumulation of means furnished the necessary
resources
.
Books grew upon the already groaning shelves;
sweet landscapes and noble portraits glowed from the
walls. With no wife to provide in those thousand trifles
for which no funds would be altogether adequate, in the
shocking and offensive style of expenditure which has
recently
covered our land with sores and spangles, shame and
frippery,the income of William Calvert was devoted to
the cultivation of such tastes as are legitimate in the eyes of
a truly philosophical judgment. He sought for no
attractions
but such as gave employment either to the sense of
beauty or the growth of the understanding. The
contemplation
of the forms of beauty produces in the mind a love
of harmony and proportion, which, in turn, establish a
nice moral sense, that revolts with loathing at what is
mean, coarse or brutal; and, with this impression, our
young lawyer, whenever his purse permitted such outlay,
despatched his commission to the Atlantic city for the
speaking
canvass or the eloquent and breathing bust. In tastes
like these his paternal friend fully sympathized with him.
In fact they had been first awakened in him by his
venerable
tutor, during the course of his boyish education. Thus
co-operating, and with habits, which, in other respects,
were singularly inexpensive, it is not surprising that the
dwelling of William Calvert should already be known,
among the people of,as the very seat of elegance
and art. His pictures formed a theme among his
acquaintance
,
and even those who were not, which every new
addition contributed to revive and enlarge; and, in the
innocent
pursuit of such objects of grace and beautywith
books, the philosophies and songs, of the old divines of
Natureher proper priesthoodthe days of the youth
began
to go by sweetly and with such soothing, that the
memory
of Margaret Cooper, though it never ceased to sadden,
yet failed entirely to sting. He had neither ceased to love
nor to regret; but his disappointment did not now occasion
a pang, nor was his regret such as to leave him insensible
to the genial influences which life every where spreads
generously around for the working spirit, and the just and
gentle heart.
We have formed a sufficient idea of the dwelling-house
of William Calvert. The reader will please go with us
while we enter it. We ascend the neat and always well
swept porch, and pass at once into the parlour. Old Mr.
Calvert is there alone. His hair has become thinner and
much more silvery since we last saw it. But, in other
respects
,
he seems to have undergone very trifling change.
His skin is quite as smooth as ever; but little wrinkled;
his eye is brightnay, brighter than it ever seemed to us
in Charlemont; his hopes and heart are liftedhe has
VOL. II. 24
realized the pride of a father without suffering all the trials
and apprehensions of one; and with heart and body
equally in health, he is still youngfor a gentle spirit in
age, is not a bad beginning of the soul's immortality. He
owes this state of mind and body, to a contemplative habit
acquired in youth; to the presence of a nice governing
sense of justice, and to that abstinence which would have
justified in him the brag of good old Adam, in As You
Like It.
For in my youth I never did apply
Hot and rebellious liquors in my blood;
Nor did not, with unbashful forehead, woo
The means of weakness and debility;
Therefore my age is as a lusty winter,
Frosty but kindly.
The old man sits in a snug well-cushioned armchair
with his eyes cast upward. A smile mantles upon his face.
His glance rests upon a portrait of his favourite; and as
he gazes upon the well-limned and justly drawn features
and as the mild and speaking eye seems to answer to his
ownthe unconscious words tremble out from his lips!
Good old man!he recalls the early lessons that he gave
the boy; how kindly they were takenwith what
readiness
they were acquired; and the sweet humility which
followed most of his rebukes. Then, he renews the story
of the first lessons in lawhis own struggles and defeats
he recallsonly, as it would seem, to justify the exultation
which announces, under
his
guidance, the better fortunes
of the youth. And thus soliloquizing, he rises, and
mounting
a chair, dusts the picture with his handkerchief, with
a solicitude that has seen a speck upon the cheek, and
fancies
a fly upon the hair! This was a daily task,
performed
unconsciously, and under the same course of
spiriting! While thus engaged a servant enters and speaks.
He answers, but without any thought of what he is
saying
.
The servant disappears, and the door is re-opened.
The old man is still busy at the heart-prompted duty. His
lips are equally busy in dilating upon the merits of his
favourite. He still wipes and rewipes the picture; draws
back to examine the outline; comments upon eye and
forehead; and dreams not, the while, what eye surveys
his toilswhat ear is listening to the garrulous eulogium
that is dropping from his lips. The intruder is Margaret
CooperMrs. Beauchampe we should have saidbut for
a silent preference for the former name, for which we can
give no reason and offer no excuse.
She stands in silenceshe watches the labour of the
good old man with mixed but not unpleasant feelings. She
recognises him at a glance. She does not mistake the
features
of that portrait which exacts his care. She gazes on
that, too, with a very melancholy interest. The features,
though the same, are yet those of another. The
expression
of the face is spiritualized and lifted. It is the face of
William Hinkleytruebut not the face of the rustic,
whom once she knew beneath that name. The salient
points of feature are subdued. The roughness has
disappeared
,
and is succeeded by the entreating sweetness and
placid self-subjection which shows that the moulding hand
of the higher civilization has been there. It is William
Hinkley, the gentlemanthe man of thought, and of the
worldwhose features meet her eye; and a sigh
involuntarily
escapes her lips. That sigh is the involuntary
utterance
of the self-reproach which she feels. Her
conscience
smites her for the past. She thinks of the young
man, worthy and gentle, whom she slighted for another
and that other!She remembers the youth's goodness
his fond devotedness; and, forgetting in what respect he
erred, she wonders at herself, with feelings of increasing
humiliation, that she should have repulsed and treated him
so harshly. But, in those days she was mad! It is her
only consolation that she now thinks so.
Her sigh arrests the attention of the old man and
awakens him from his grateful abstraction. He turns,
beholds the lady, and muttering something apologetically,
about the rapid accumulation of dust and cobwebs, he
descends
from the chair. A step nearer to the visiter
informs
him who she is. He starts, and trembles.
You, Miss Coopercan it be?
It is, Mr. Calvertbut there is some mistake. I
sought for Col. Calvert, the lawyer.
My sonno mistake at allbe seated, Miss Cooper.
Your son, Mr. Calvert?
Yes, my sonyour old acquaintancebut here he
is!
William Calvert, the younger, had now joined the party.
His entrance had been unobserved. He stood in the
doorway
his
eye fixed upon the object of his former passion.
His cheeks were very pale; his features were full of
emotion. Margaret turned as the old man spoke, and their
eyes encountered. What were their several emotions
then? Who shall tell them? What scenes, what a story,
did that one single glance of recognition recall. How much
strife and bitternesswhat overwhelming passionsand
what defeat, what shame, and sorrow to the one; and to
the otherwhat triumph over painwhat victory even
from defeat. To her, from pride, exultation and estimated
triumph, had arisen shame, overthrow, and certain fear.
Despair was not yetnot altogether. To the other, out
of the eater came forth meat, and out of the strong came forth
sweetness. From his defeat he was strengthened; and
from the very overthrow of his youthful passion, had
grown the vigour of his manhood.
The thought of William Calvert, as he surveyed the
woman of his first love, was a natural one:Had she
been mine!but with this thought he did not now repine
at the baffled dream and desire of his boyhood. If the
memory and reflection were not sweet, at least the bitter
was one to which his lips had become reconciled by time.
Recalling the mournful memory of the past, his sorrow
was now rather for her than for himself. His regret was
not that he had been denied, but that she had fallen. He
recollected the day of her pride. He recalled the flashes
of that eagle spirit, which, while it won his admiration,
had spurned his prayer. The bitter shame which followed,
when, by crawling, the serpent had reached the summits
where her proud soul kept in an aerie of its own, oppressed
his
soul as he gazed upon the still beautiful, still majestic
being before him. She too had kept something of that
noble spirit which was hers before she fell. We have
seen how she had sustained herself;
Not yet lost
All her original brightness, nor appeared
Less than archangel ruined, and th'
excess
Of glory obscured;
and still, as the youth gazed, he wonderedand as he
remembered
,
he could not easily restrain the impulse once
more to sink in homage. But all her story was now known
to him. Of Sharpe's murder he was aware; and that the
wife of the murderer was the same Margaret Cooper, in
whose behalf he had himself met the betrayer in single
combat, he was apprised by private letter from Covington.
While he thus stood beholding, with such evident
tokens
of emotion, the hapless woman who had been the
cause, and the victim, equally, of so much disasterwhat
were her reflections at the sight of him? At first, when
their eyes encountered, and she could no longer doubt the
identity of the Col. Calvert whom she sought, with the
William Hinkley whom she had so well and so little
known, her colour became heightenedher form
insensibly
rose, and her eye resumed something of that ancient
eagle-look of defiance, which was the more natural
expression
of her proud and daring character. She felt, in an
instant, all the difference between the present and the past;
between his fortune and her ownand, naturally assuming
that the same comparison was going on in his mind,
necessarily
leading to his exaltation at her expense, she was
prepared, with equal look and word, to resent the
insolence
of his triumph. But when, at a second glance, she
beheld the unequivocal grief which his looks expressed
when she saw still, that the fire in his heart had not been
quenchedthat the feeling there had nothing in it of
triumph
but
all of a deep abiding sorrow and a genuine
commiseration, her manner changedthe bright, keen
expression
parted from her glance, and her cheek grew
instantly
pale. But her firmness and presence of mind
returned sooner than his. She advanced and extended to
him her hand. The manner was so frank, so confiding,
that it seemed to atone for all the past. It evidently was
intended to convey the only atonement which, in her
situation
,
she could possibly offer. It said much more than
words, and his heart was satisfied. He took her hand and
conducted her to a seat. He was silent. It was with
great difficulty that he withheld the expression of his
tears.
You know me, Col. Calvert, she at length said. I
see you know me.
Could you think otherwise, Margaret? he succeeded
in replying. Could I forget?
24*
No! not forget, perhaps, she returned; but you
seem not to understand me. My person, of course, you
knowwho I wasbut not who I am?
Yeseven that too I know.
Then something is spared me! she replied with the
sigh of one who is relieved from a painful duty.
I know the whole sad story, MargaretMrs.
Beauchampe
.
The old man interrupted him with an exclamation of
surprise.
Mrs. Beauchampe!
YesI kept the truth from you, sir, remarked the
young man in side tones: I thought it would only
distress
you to hear it. It was communicated to me by Mr.
Covington. Can I serve you, Margaretis it for this you
seek me?
It is.
I am ready. I will do what I can. But it will be
necessary to see Mr. Beauchampe.
Cannot that be avoided! I confess, I come to you
without his sanction or authority. He is unwilling to
seek assistance from the law, and proposes, either to argue
his own case, or to leave it, unargued, to the just sense of
the community.
The youth mused in silence for a few moments, before
he replied. At length
I will not hide from you, Margaret,forgive me
Mrs. Beauchampe,the danger in which your husband
stands. The frequency of such deeds as that for which
he is indicted, has led to a general feeling on the part of
the community, that the laws must be rigorously enforced.
But
She interrupted him with some vehemence:But the
provocation of the villain he slew
She stopped suddenly. She trembled, for the truth had
been revealed in her inadvertence.
What have I said! she exclaimed.
Only what shall be as secret with us, Margaret, as
with yourself
Oh! more so, I trust! she ejaculated.
Do not distress yourself with this. Understand me.
It was to gather from Mr. Beauchampe the whole truth,
that I desired to see him. To do him justice, I must
know from him, what may be known by others, and which
might do him hurt. It is to prepare for the worst, that I
would seek to know the worst. I will return with you to
Frankfort. I will see him. He, as a lawyer, will better
understand my purpose than yourself.
Ah!I thank youI thank you, William HinkleyI
feel that I do not deserve this at
your
hands. You are
avengedamply avengedfor all the past!
She covered her face with her hands. Memories, bitter
memories, were rushing in upon her soul.
Speak not thus, Margaret; replied the youth in
subdued
and trembling accents. I need no such atonement
as this. Believe me, to know what you were and should
have been, Margaret, and see you thus, brings to me no
feelings but those of shame and sorrow. Such promise,
such pride of promise, Margaret
Ah! indeed! such pride,such pride!and what a
fall!there could not be a worse, Williamsurely not
a worse!
But there is hope still, Margaretthere is hope.
You will save him! she said, eagerly.
I trust, said he; that there is hope for him. I will
try to save him.
I know you will. I know you will! But, even then,
there is no hope. I feel like a wreck. Even if we founder
not in this stormeven if you save us, William,it will
be as if some once good ship, shattered and shivered, was
carried into port by some friendly prowonly to be
abandoned
as then no longer worth repair. These storms have
shattered me, Williamshattered me quite. I am no
longer what I was,strong, proud, confident. I fear,
sometimes, that my brain will go wild. I feel that my
mind is failing me. I speak now with an erring tongue.
I scarce know what I say. But I speak with a faith
in
you
. I believe, William, you were always true.
Ah! had you but believed so
then,
Margaret.
I did! I did believe so.
Ah! could it have been, Margaretcould you have
only thought
No moresay no more, she exclaimed hurriedly,
with a sort of shudder. Say no more!
Had it been, he continued, musinglycould it
have been, there had been now no wreck. Neither of us
had felt these storms. We had both been happy!
No, no! speak not thus, William Hinkley! she
exclaimed
,
rising, and putting on a stern look and freezing
accent. The past should beisnothing now to us.
Nor could it have been as you say. There was a fate to
humble
me;
and I am here now to sue for
your
succour.
You
have nothing to deplore. You have fortune which you
could not hope, fame which you did not seekevery thing
to make you proud, and keep you happy.
I am neither proud nor happy, Margaret. You
Enough! she exclaimed. You have promised to
strive in his behalf. Save
him,
William Hinkleyand if
prayer of mine can avail before Heaven, you will feel this
want no longer. You
must
be happy!
Happy, MargaretI do not hope for it.
She extended him her hand. He took it and instantly
released it, though not before a scalding tear had fallen
from his eyes upon it. Farther farewell than this they had
none. She locked round for old Mr. Calvert, but he was
no longer in the apartment.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
We
pass over the interviews between Beauchampe and
William Calvert. At none of these was the wife present.
The former was satisfied to accept the services of one
who approached him with the best manners of the
gentleman
,
and the happy union, in his address, of the sage and
lawyer; and he freely narrated to him all the particulars
of that deed for which he was held to answer. Calvert
was put in possession of all that was deemed necessary to
the defence, or rather of all that Beauchampe knew. But,
either the latter did not know
all,
or perjury was an easily
bought commodity upon his trial. There were witnesses
to swear to his footsteps, to his voice, his face, his words,
his knife and clothes; though he believed that no living
eye, save that of the Omniscient, beheld him in his
approaches
to commit the deed. The knife which struck
the blow was buried in the earth. The clothes which he
wore were sunk in the river. Yet a knife was produced
on the trial as that which had pierced the heart of the
victim, and witnesses identified him in garments which he
no longer possessed, and in which, according to his belief,
they had never seen him. It is possible that he deceived
himself. There can be no doubt that he was just enough
of the maniac, while carrying out the monomania which
made him so, to be conscious of little else but the one
stirring, all-absorbing passion in his mind. Such a man
walks the streets and sees no form save that which
occupies
his imaginationspeaks his purpose in soliloquy
which his own ears never heed; fancies himself alone
though surrounded by spectators. His microcosm is within.
He has, while the leading idea is busy in his soul, no
consciousness
of any world without.
Could we record the argument of Calvert,analyse for
the reader the voluminous and not always consorting
testimony
,
as he analysed it for the court,and repeat, word
for word, and look for look, the exquisite appeal which he
offered to the jury, we should be amply justified in
occupying
,
in these volumes, the considerable space which
such a record would require; but we dare not make the
attempt; the more particularly, as, however able and
admirable
,
it failed of its effect. Eyes were wet, sighs were
audible at its close; but the jury, if moved by the
eloquence
of the orator, were obdurate, so far as concerned the
prisoner. The verdict was rendered Guilty,and with
the awful word, Mrs. Beauchampe started to her feet, and
accused herself to the court, not only of participating in
the offence, but of prompting it. It was supposed to be a
merciful forbearance that Justice permitted herself to
become
deaf, as well as blind, on this occasion. Her wild
asseverations were not employed against her; and she
failed of the end she soughtto unite her fate, at the close,
with that of him, to whom, as she warned him in the
beginning
,
she herself was a fate.
But, though she failed to provoke justice to prosecution,
she was yet not to be baffled in her object. Her
resolution
was taken, to share the doom of her husband. For
her he had incurred the judgment of the criminal, and her
nature was too magnanimous to think of surviving him.
She resolved upon death in her own case, and at the same
time resolved on defeating, in his, that brutal exposure
which attends the execution of the laws. But of her
purpose
she said nothing,not even to him whom it most
concerned. With that stern directness of purpose which
formed so distinguishing a trait in her character, she made
her preparations in secret. The indulgence of the
authorities
permitted her to see her husband at pleasure, and to
share with him, when she would, the sad privilege of his
dungeon. This indulgence was not supposed to involve
any risk, since a guard was designated to maintain a
constant
watch upon the prisoner; and it does not seem to
have entered into the apprehensions of the jailer to provide
against any danger except that of the convict's escape.
The dungeon of the condemned was a close cell, the
only entrance to which was by a trap-door from above.
Escape from this place, with a guard in the upper chamber,
was not an easy performance, nor did it seem to enter for
a moment into the calculation or designs of either of the
Beauchampes. The husband was prepared to die, and
the solemn, though secret determination of the wife, had
prepared her also. The former considered his fate with
the feeling of a martyr; and every word of the latter, was
intended to confirm, in his mind, this strengthening and
consoling conviction. The few days which were left to
the criminal, were not otherwise unsoothed and unlighted
from without. Friends came to him in his dungeon, and
strove, with the diligence of love, to convert the remaining
hours of his life into profitable capital for the future grand
investment of immortality. Religion lent her aid to friend
ship; and whether Beauchampe did or did not persist in
the notion that the crime for which he stood condemned
was praiseworthy, at all events, he was persuaded by her
unremitting cares and counsels, that he was a sinner,
sinning in a thousand respects for which repentance was
the only grand remedy which could atone to God for the
wrongs done, and left unrepaired, to man.
Among the friends who now constantly sought the cell
of the criminal, William Calvert was none of the least
punctual. Beauchampe became very fond of him, and
felt, in a short time, the very vast superiority of his mind
and character over those of his late tutor. The wife,
meanwhile, with that fearless frankness which knows
thoroughly
the high value of the most superior truthfor
truth has its qualities and degrees, though each may be
intrinsically
purehad freely told her husband the whole
history of the early devotion of William Calvert, when she
knew him as the obscure William Hinkley; how, blinded
by her own vanity, and the obscurity to which the very
modesty of the young rustic had subjected him, she
despised
his pretensions, and, for the homage of the sly
serpent
by whom she had been deceived,beguiled with his
lying tongue and pleased with his gaudy coat,had
slighted the superior worth of the former, and treated his
claims with a scorn as little deserved by him as becoming
in her. Sometimes, Beauchampe spoke of this painful past
in the history of his wife and visiter, and the reference
now did not seem to give pain, at least to the former. The
reason was goodshe had done with the past. The
considerations
which now filled her mind were all of a
superior
nature; and she listened to her husband, even when
he spoke on this theme in the presence of William Calvert
himself, with an unmoved and unabashed countenance.
The latter possessed no such stoicism. At such moments
his heart beat with a wildly increased rapidity of
pulsation
;
and he felt the warm flush pass over his cheeks, as
vividly and quickly now, as in the days of his first
youthful
consciousness of love.
It was the evening preceding the day of execution.
The dark hours were at hand. The guard of the prison
had warned the visiters to depart. The divine had
already
gone. The drooping sisters of Beauchampe were
about to go for the night, moaning wildly as they went,
in anticipation of the day of awful moan which was
approaching
.
Fond and fervent, and very sad, was the
parting, though for the night only, which the condemned
gave to these dear twin-buds of his affections. It was a
pang spared to him that his poor old mother was too sick
to see him. When he thought of her, and of the
unspeakable
misery which would be hers were she present,
he felt the grief lessened which followed from the thought
that their eyes might never more encounter. But the
sisters went, all went but William Calvert, and he seemed
disposed to linger to the last permitted moment. His
thoughts were less with the condemned man than with
the wife. His eyes were fixed upon the same object.
His anxiety and surprise increased with each moment of
his gaze. Whence could arise that strange serenity
which appeared in her countenance? Where did she
find that strength which, at such an hour, could give her
composure? Nor was it serenity and composure alone,
which distinguished her air, look, and carriage. There
was a holy intentness, a sublime decision in her look,
which filled him with apprehension. He knew the daring
of her characterthe bold disposition which had always
possessed her to dare the dark and the unknownand
his prescient conjecture divined her intention. She sat
behind her husband on his lowly pallet. Calvert occupied
a stool at its foot. Beauchampe had been speaking freely
with all his visiters. He was only moved by the feeling of
his situation on separating from his sisters. At all other
periods he was tolerably calm, and sometimes his
conversation
ran into playfulness. When we say playfulness, we
do not mean to be understood as intimating his indulgence
of mere fun and jest, which would have been as
inconsistent
with his general character as with the solemn
responsibility
of his situation. But there was an ease of heart about
what he said, an elastic freedom, which insensibly coloured
with a freshness and vitality, the idea which he uttered.
Sit closer to me, Anna, he said to his wifesit
closer. We are not to be so long together that we can
spare these moments. We have no time for distance
and formality. Calvert will excuse this fondness,
however
annoying it might seem between man and wife at
ordinary periods.
He took her hand in his as she drew nigh, and passed his
arm fondly about her waist. She was silentand Calvert,
thinking of the conjecture which had been awakened in
his mind, by the deportment of the wife, was too full
of serious and startling thoughts to be altogether assured
of what Beauchampe was saying. The latter continued,
after a brief pause, by a reference of some abruptness to
the past history of the two:
It seems to me the strangest thing in the world,
Anna, that you should ever have refused to marry our
friend Calvert. My days, he said, turning to the latter
as he spoke, my days of idle speech and vain flattery
are numbered, Calvert; and you will do me the justice
to believe that I am not the man to waste words at any
time in worthless compliment. Certainly I will not now.
But, since I have known you, I feel that I could wish to
know no more desirable friend; and how my wife could
have rejected you for any other personI care not whom
I do not exclude myselfI cannot understand, unless
by supposing that there is a special fate in such matters,
by which our best judgments are set at nought, and our
wisest plans baffled. Had she married you, Calvert
Why will you speak of it? said Calvert with an
earnestness
of tone which yet faltered. The wife was still
silent. Beauchampe answered:
Because I speak as one to whom the business of life
is over. I am speaking as one from the grave. The
passions
are dumb within me. The strifes are over. The
vain delicacies of society seem a child's play to me
now. Besides, I speak regretfully. For her sake, how
much better had it been. Instead of being, as she is now,
the wife of a convict, doomed to a dog's deathinstead of
the long strife through which she has goneinstead of
the utter waste of that proud genius which might, under
other fortunes, have taken such noble flights and attained
such a noble eminence,
The wife interrupted him with a smile.
Ah, Beauchampe, you are supposing that the world
has but one serpentbut one Alfred Stevens! The eagle
in his flight may escape one arrow, but who shall insure
him against the second or the third? I suspect that few
persons at the end of lifeof a long lifelooking back,
with all their knowledge and experience, could
recommence
the journey and find it any smoother or safer than
at first. He is the best philosopher who, when the time
comes to die, can wash his hands of life the soonest, with
the least effort, and dispose his robes most calmlyand
so gracefullyaround him. Do not speak of what I have
lost, and of what I have suffered. Still less is it needful
that you should speak of our friend's affairs. We are all
chosen, I suspect. Our fortunes are assigned us. That
of our friend was never more favourable than when mine
prompted my refusal of his kind offer. I was not made
for him nor he for me. We might not have been happy
together; and for the best reason, since I was too blind
and ignorant to see what I should have seen, that the
VOL. II. 25
very humility which I despised in him, was the source of
his strength and would have been of my security. I now
congratulate him that I was blind to his merits. He will
live, he will grow stronger with each succeeding day,
fortune will smile upon his toils, and fame will follow
them. At least we will pray, Beauchampe, that such
will be the case. At parting, William HinkleyI cannot
call you by the other name
now
at parting, for ever,
believe this assurance. You shall have our prayers and
blessingssuch as they aretruly, fondly, my friend, for
we owe much to your help and sympathy.
For ever, Margaret!why should
you
say for ever?
Calvert fastened his eyes upon her as she spoke. She
met the glance unmoved, and replied
Will it not be for ever? To-morrow, which deprives
me of
him,
deprives me of the world. I must hide from
it. I have no more business with it, nor it with me. I
have still some sense of shamesome feelings of sacred
sorrowwhich I should be loth to expose to its busy
finger
.
Is not this enough, William Calvert?
But I am not the world. Friends you will still need;
my good, old father
She shook her head.
I know what you would say, WilliamI know all
your goodness of heart, and thank you from the very
bottom
of mine. Let it suffice that, should I need a friend
after to-morrow, I shall seek none other than you.
Margaret, said William, impressively, you cannot
deceive me. I know your object. I see it in your eyes
in those subdued tones. I am sure of what you
purpose
.
What purpose? what do you mean? demanded
Beauchampe.
Before he could be answered by Calvert the wife had
spoken. She addressed herself to the latter.
And if you do know it, William Hinkley, you know it
only by the conviction in your own heart of what, if not
unavoidable, is at least necessary. Speak not of itgive
it no thought, and only ask of yourself what, to me, to
such a soul as minewould be life after to-morrow's
sun has set! Go nowthe guard calls. You will see us
in the morning.
Margaretfor your soul's sake
The expostulation was arrested by the repeated
summons
of the guard. The wife put her finger on her lips
in sign of silence. He prepared to depart, but could not
forbear whispering in her ears the exhortation which he
had begun to speak aloud. She heard him patiently to
the end, and sweetly, but faintly smiling, she shook her
head, making no other answer. The hoarse voice of the
guard again summoned the visiter, who reluctantly rose
to obey. He shook hands with Beauchampe, and
Margaret
followed him to the foot of the ladder. When he
gave her his hand she carried it to her lips.
God bless you, William Hinkley! she murmured.
You are and have been a noble gentleman. Remember
me kindly, and oh! forgive me that I did you wrong, that
I did not do justice to your feelings and your worth.
Perhaps
it was better that I did not.
Let me pray to you, Margaret. Do notoh! do not
what you design. Spare yourself.
Ay, William, I will! Shame, certainly, the bitter
mock of the manythe silent derision of the fewdeceit
and fraudreproach without and withinall these will I
spare myself.
Come! come! said the guard gruffly, from above,
Will you never be done talking? Leave the gentleman
to his prayers. His time is short!
And thus they parted for the night.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
What
did Calvert mean, Anna, when he said he knew
your purpose? was the inquiry of Beauchampe, when
she returned to his sidewhat do you intend?what
purpose have you?
She put her hand upon her lips in sign of silence, then
looked up to the trap-door, which the guard was slowly
engaged in letting down. When this was done, she
approached him and drawing a phial from her bosom
displayed
it cautiously before his eyes.
For me! he exclaimedpoison!
A sort of rapturous delight gathered in his eyes as he
clutched the phial.
Enough for both of us! was the answer. It is
laudanum.
Enough for both, Anna! Surely you cannot mean
To share it with you, my husband. To die with you,
as you die for me.
Not so! This must not be. Speak notthink not
thus, my wife. Such a thought makes me wretched.
There is no need that you should die.
Ay, but there is, Beauchampe. I should suffer much
worse were I to live. Where could I live? How could
I live? To be the scorned, and the slanderedto
provoke
the brutal jest, or more brutal violence of the fopling
and the fool! For, who that knows my story, will believe
in my virtue; and who that doubts, will scruple to
approach
me as if he knew that I had none! If I have
neither joy nor security in life, why should I live; and if
death keeps us together, Beauchampe, why should I fear
to die? Should I not rather rejoice, my husband?
Ah, but of that we know nothing. That is the doubt
the curse, Anna!
I do not doubtI cannot. Our crime, if crime it be, is
oneour punishment will doubtless be one also.
It were then no punishment. No, Anna, live!you
have friends who will protect youwho will respect and
love you. There is Col. Calvert
Do not speak of him, Beauchampe. Speak of none.
I am resolute to share with you the draught. We tread
the dark valley together.
You shall not! It is in my grasp,no drop shall
pass your lips. It is enough for me only.
Ah, Beauchampe, would you be cruel?
Kind only, dear wife. I cannot think of you dying,
so young, so beautiful, and born with such endowments
so formed to shine, to bless
To kill ratherto blight, Beauchampe; to darken the
days of all whom I approach. This has ever been my
fate; it shall be so no longer. Beauchampe, you cannot
baffle me in my purpose. See!even if you refuse to
share with me the poison, I have still another resource.
She drew a knife from her sleeve and held it up before
his eyes, but beyond the reach of his arm.
Oh! why will you persist in this, my wife? Why
make these few moments, which are left me, as sad as they
are short and fleeting.
I seek not to do so, dear husband; nor should my
resolution have this effect. Would you have me live for
such sorrows, such indignities, as I have described to
you.
You would not suffer them! Give me the knife,
Anna.
No! my husband! She restored it to her sleeve. I
have sworn to die with you, and no power on earth shall
persuade me to survive.
Not
my
entreaties
my
prayers, Anna!
No! Beauchampe!not even
your
prayers shall
change my purpose.
Nay, then, I will call the guard!
And if you do, Beauchampe, the sound of your voice
shall be the signal for me to strike. Believe me, husband,
I do not speake idly!
The knife was again withdrawn from her sleeve as she
spoke, and the bared point placed upon her bosom.
Put it up, dearest; I promise not to call. Put it up,
from sight. Believe me,I will not call!
Do not, Beauchampe; and do not, I implore you,
again seek to disturb my resolution. Move me you
cannot
.
I have reached it only by calmly considering what
I am, and what would be left me when you are gone. I
have seen enough in this examination to make me turn
with loathing from the prospect. I know that it cannot be
more so behind the curtain; and we will raise it together.
The assurance, Anna, is sweet to my soul, but I would
still implore you against this resolution. To be undivided
even in death conveys a feeling to my heart like rapture,
and brings back to it a renewed hope; yet I dare not
think of your suffering and pain. I dread the idea of death
when it relates to you.
Think rather, my husband, that I share the hope and
the rapture of which you speak. Believe me only, that
I joy also in the conviction that in death we shall not be
divided. The mere bitter of the draught or the pain of
the stroke, is not worthy of a thought. The assurance
25*
that there will be no interruption in our progress together
that death, with us, will be nothing but a joint setting
forth in company on a new journey and into another
country
that
is worthy of every thought, and should be the
only one!
Ay, but that country, Anna?
Cannot be more full of wo and bitter than this hath
been to us.
It may! I have read somewhere, my wife, a vivid
description
of two fond lovers,fondest among the fond
born, as it were, for each other,devoted, as few have
been to one another; who, by some cruel tyrant were
thrown into a dungeon, and ordered to perish by the
gnawing
process of hunger. At first, they smiled at such a
doom. They believed that their tyrant lacked ingenuity
in his capacity for torture, for he had left them
together!
Together, they were strong and fearless. Love made them
light-hearted even under restraint; and they fancied a
power or resistance in themselves, so united, to endure
the worst forms of torment. For a few days they did so.
They cheered each other. They spoke the sweetest,
soothing words. Their arms were linked in constant
embrace. She hung upon his neck, and he bore her head
upon his bosom. Never had they spoken such sweet
truths,such dear assurances. Never had their
tendernesses
been so all-compensating. Perhaps, they never had
been so truly happy together, at least for the first brief day
of their confinement. Their passion had been refined by
severity, and had acquired new vigour from the pressure
put upon it. But as the third day waned, they ceased to
link their arms together. They recoiled from the mutual
embrace. They shrunk apart. They saw in each other's
eyes, a something rather to be feared than loved. Famine
was there, glaring like a wolf. The god was transformed
into a demon; and in another day the instinct of hunger
proved itself superior to the magnanimous sentiment of
love. The oppressor looked in on the fourth day, through
the grated-window upon his victims;and lo! the lips of
the man were dripping with the blond, drawn from the
veins of his beloved one. His teeth were clenched in her
white shoulder; and he grinned and growled above his
unconscious victim, even as the tiger, whom you have
disturbed
ere he has finished with his prey.
Horrible! But
she
submitted
she
repined not. Her
moans were unheard.
She
sought not, in like manner, to
pacify the baser, beastly cravings, at the expense of him
she loved. Hers
was
love, Beauchampehis was
passion
.
Alas! my wife, what matters it by what name we seek
to establish a distinction between the sentiments and
passions
?
In those dreadful extremes of situation, from which
our feeble nature recoils, all passions and sentiments run
into one.
We
love!Before Heaven, my wife, I
conscientiously
say, and as conscientiously believe, that I love
you as passionately as I can love, and as truly as woman
ever was beloved by man. It is not our love that fails us,
in the hour of physical and mental torment. It is our
strength. Thought and principle, truth and purity, are
poor defences, when the frame is agonized with a torture
beyond what nature was intended to endure. Then the
strongest man deserts his faith and disavows his principles.
Then the purest becomes profligate, and the truest dilates
in falsehood. It is madness, not the man, that speaks.
It was madness, not the man, that drunk from the blue
veins of the beloved one, and clenched his dripping teeth
in her soft white shoulder. The very superior strength of
his blood, was the cause of his early overthrow of
reflection
.
As, in this respect, she was the weaker, so her
mind, and consequently, the sweet pure sentiments which
were natural to her mind, the longest maintained its and
their ascendency, and preserved her from the loathsome
frenzy to which the man was driven!Ah, of this future,
dear wife! This awful, unknown future! Fancy some
penal doom like thisfancy some tiger rage in me
depriving
me of the reason, and the sentiments which have
made me love you, and made me what I amfancy, in
place of the man, the frenzied beast, raging in his bloody
thirst, rending in his savage hungerdrinking the blood
from the beloved one's veins,tearing the flesh from her
soft white shoulder! This thoughtthis fear, Anna
Is neither thought nor fear of mine! God is good
and gracious. I am not bold to believe in my own purity
of heart, or propriety of conduct. I am a sinner,
Beauchampe
a
proud, stern, fierce sinner. I feel that I am
I would that I were otherwise, and I pray for Heaven's
help to become otherwise;but, sinner as I am, I neither
fear nor believe, that such penal dooms are reserved for
any degree of sin. The love of physical torture is an
attribute with which man has dressed the Deity. As such
torture cannot be human, so it cannot be godlike. I can
believe that we may be punished by privation,by denial
of trust,by degradation to inferior offices,but it is the
brutal imagination that ascribes to God a delight in brutal
punishments. Nowhere do we see in nature such a
feelling
manifested. Life is every where a thing of beauty.
Smiles are in heaven, sweetness on earth, the winds bring
it, the airs breathe it, stars smile it, blossoms store and
diffuse it;man, alone, defaces and destroys, usurps,
vitiates, and overthrows. It was man, not God, who, in
your story, was the oppressor. He made the prison, and
thrust the victims into it. It was not God! And shall
God be likened to such a monster? What idea can we
have of the Deity to whom such characteristics are
ascribed
!
I go yet farther, she added, after a pause. I do
not think, even if our sins incur the displeasure of God,
that his treatment of us, however harsh, will be meant as
punishment. That it will be punishment, I doubt not;
but this will be with him a secondary consideration. We
are
his
subjects, in
his
world, employed to carry out his
various purposes, and set to various tasks. Failing in
these, we are set to such as are inferior,perhaps, not
employed at all, as being no longer worthy of trust. I
cannot think of a severer moral infliction. Where all are
busy,triumphantly busy,pressing forward in the
glorious
tasks of a life which is all soul, to be the only idle
spiritdenied to share in any mighty consummation,
pitied, but abandoned by the restthe proffer of service
rejected,the sympathy of joint action and enterprise
denieda spirit without wingsa sluggish personification
of moral sloth, and that too, in such an empire as
God's
own
in his very sight,millions speeding beneath his
eye at his bidding,all bid, all chosen, all beloved but one!
Ah! Beauchampe, to a soul like mine,so earnest, so
ambitious as mine has been, and iscould there be a worse
doom?
No, dearest!but the subject is dark, and such
speculations
may be boldtoo bold!
Why? Do I disparage God in them? Does it not
seem that such a future could alone be worthy of such a
presentof such a God, as has made a world so various
and so wondrous? methinks, the disparagement is in him
who ascribes to the Deity such tastes and passions as
preside over the Inquisitions and the thousand other plans
of mortal torture, which have made man the hateful
monster that we so frequently find him.
Let us speak no more of this, Anna. The subject
startles me. It is an awful one!
Hers was the bolder spirit.
And should not our thoughts be awful thoughts?
What other should we have? The future, alone, is ours
will be ours in a short time. A few hours will bring
us to the entrance. A few hours will lift the curtain, and
the voice that we may not disobey will command us to
enter.
Not, you, Annaoh! not you! Let me brave it
alone. I cannot bear to think that you too should be
cut off in your youthwith all that vigorous mind,that
beautythat noble heartall crushed, blighted,now,
when blooming brightestburied in the dust,no more
to speak, or sing, or feel.
But they do not perish, Beauchampe. I might grow
cowardI might cling to this lifecould I fancy there
were no other. But this faith is one of my strongest
convictions
.
It is an instinct. No reasoning will reach the
point and establish it, if the feeling be not in our heart of
hearts. I know that I cannot perish quite. I know that
I must live; and that poison-draught, or the thrust of this
sudden knife, I regard as the plunge which one makes,
crossing a frail trembling bridge, or hurrying through
some dark and narrow passage. Do not waste the
moments
,
which are so precious, in the vain endeavour to
dissuade me from a sworn and settled purpose.
Beauchampe
,
we die together!
Lie down by me, Anna. You should sleepyou are
fatigued. You must be weary.
No! I am not weary. At such moments as these we
become all soul. We do not need sleep. With the
passage
of this night we shall never need it again. Think of
that, Beauchampe! What a thought it is.
Terrible!
Glorious, rather! Sleep was God's gift to an
animal
,to
restore limbs that could be weariedto refresh
spirits that could be dull! What a godlike feeling to
know that we shall need it no longer!no more yawning
no more drowsinessand that feebleness and
blindness
,
which, without any of the securities of death, has all
of its incompetencieswhen the merest coward might
bind, and the commonest ruffian abuse, and trample on
us. Ah! the immunities of death! How numerous
how great! What blindness to talk of its terrorsto
shrink from its glorious privileges of unimpeded space,
of undiminishing time. Already, Beauchampe, it seems
to me as if my wings are growing. I fancy, I should not
feel any hurt from the knifeperhaps, not even taste the
poison on my lips.
Sit by me, at least, if you will not sleep, Anna.
I will sit by you, Beauchampe,nay, I wish to do so,
but you must promise not to attempt to dispossess me of
the knife. I suspect you, my husband.
Why suspect me?
I perceive it in the tones of your voice; I know what
you intend. But, believe me, I have taken my resolution
from which nothing will move me. Even were you now
to deprive me of the weapon, nothing would keep me
from it long. I should follow you soon, my husband,
and the only effect of present denial would be to deprive
me of the pleasure of dying with you!
Come to me, my wife. I will not attempt to disarm
you. I promise you.
On your love, Beauchampe?
With my full heart, dearest. You shall die with me.
It will be a sweet moment instead of a bitter one. For
your sake only, my wife, would I have disarmed you
But my selfish desires triumph. I will no longer oppose
you.
Thanks! thanks!
She sprang to him and clung to his embrace.
Will you sleep? he asked as her head seemed to sink
upon his bosom.
No, no! I had not thought of that! I thought only
of the momentthe moment when we should leave this
prison.
Leave it?
By death! I am tired, very tired, of these walls
these walls of life,that keep us in bonds,put us at the
mercy of the false and the cruel, the base and the
malicious
oh!
my husband, we have tried them long enough.
There is time enough! he said. I would see the
daylight once more.
You can only see it through those bars.
Still, I would see it. We can free ourselves a moment
after.
Even while they spoke together, Beauchampe sunk into
a pleasant slumber. She pillowed his head upon her
bosom, but had no feeling or thought of sleep. Through
the grated bars, she saw a few flitting stars. One by
one, they came into her sphere of vision, gleamed a little
while, and passed, like the bright spiritual eyes of the
departed dear ones. When she ceased to behold them,
then she knew that the day was at hand, and the interval
of time between the disappearance of the stars, and the
approach of dawn, though brief was dark.
Such, she mused, will be that brief period of
transition
,
when, passing from the dim, deceptive starlight of
this life, we enter into the perfect day. That will be
momentarily
dark, perhaps. It must be. There may be a
state of childhoodan imperfect consciousness of the
things around usof our own wants,and among these,
possibly, a lack of utterance. Strange, indeed, that the
inevitable, should still be the inscrutable. But of what
use the details. The great fact is clear to me. Even now
things are becoming clearer while I gaze. My whole soul
seems to be one great thought. How strange that he
should sleep,so soundly tooso like an infant! He
does not fear death, that is certain, but he loves life. I,
too, love life, but it is not this. Oh, of that other! Could
I get some glimpses,but this is childish. I shall see it
all very soon!
Beauchampe slept late, and bearing his head still on
her bosom, the sleepless wife did not seek to awaken
him. Through the intensity of her thought, she acquired
an entire independence of bodily infirmities. The physical
nature, completely controlled by the spiritual, was passive
at her mood. But the soundness of Beauchampe's sleep,
continued as it was after day had fairly dawned,
awakened
her suspicions. She searched for the phial of laudanum
where she had seen him place it. It was no longer there.
She found it beside him on the couchit was empty!
But his breathing was not suspended. His sleep was
natural, and while she anxiously bent over him in doubt
whether to strike at once, or wait to see what farther
effects might be produced on him by the potion, he
awakened. His first words at awakening, betrayed the
still superior feelings of attachment with which he
regarded
her. His voice was that of exultation.
It is over, and we are still together. We are not
divided!
No! but the hour is at hand!
What mean you, my love! I have swallowed the
laudanum! where am I?
His question was answered as his eyes encountered
the bleak walls of his dungeon and beheld the light
through the iron bars of his window.
God! the poison has failed of its effect. His look
was that of consternation. Her glance and words
reassured
him.
We have still the knife, my husband!
Ah! we shall defeat them still!
On the morning of the fifth of June, eighteen hundred
and twenty-six; says the chronicle, the drums were
heard beating in the streets of Frankfort, and a vast
multitude
was hurrying toward the gibbet which was erected
on a hill without the town.
At the sound of this ominous music, and the clamours
of that hurrying multitude, Beauchampe smiled sadly.
Strange! that men should delight in such a spectacle
the cruel deaththe miserable exposure,of a fellow
man. That they should look on his writhingshis
distortions
his
shame, and pain, with composure and desire.
It will be cruel to disappoint them, Anna! Will it not?
I think not of them, my husband. Oh! my husband,
could we crowd the few remaining moments with thoughts
of goodness, with prayers of penitence! Oh! that I had
not urged you to the death of Stevens!
It was right! he answered sternly. I tell you,
Anna, the wives and daughters of Kentucky will bless the
name of Beauchampe!
They should, my husband, for your blow has saved
many from shame and suffering,has terrified many a
wrongdoer from his purpose. But though right in you to
strike, I feel that it was wrong in me to counsel.
That cannot be! Do not speak thus, my wife. Let
not our last moments be embittered by reproach. Let us
die in prayer rather. Hark! I hear visitersvoices
some one approaches.
It is William Hinkley, she exclaimed.
The guard was heard about to remove the trap door.
Beauchampe looked up, and, a moment after, he heard
his wife sigh deeply. She then spoke to him, faintly but
quickly,
Take it, my husband. It is not painful.
He turned to her, while a sudden coldness seized upon
his heart. She presented him the knife.
Have you struck? he asked in a husky whisper.
The wet blade of the knife, already clotty with the
coagulating
blood, answered his question.
Take me in your arms,quickly, quickly, dear
husband
,do
not leave me. I lose you,oh! I lose you.
No, never! I come! I am with you. Nothing shall
part us. This unites us for ever!
And with the words he struck the fatal blow, laid his
lips on hers, and covered her and himself with the blanket.
This is sweet;she murmured. I feel you, but I
cannot see you, husband. Who is it comes?
Calvert!
The young man descended a moment after. His
apprehensions
were realized. Margaret Cooper was dying
dying by her own hands.
Was this well done, Margaret? he asked
reproachfully
.
Ay, William, she answered, firmly, but in feeble
tones. It was well done. It could not be otherwise,
and I find dying sweeter than living. You will forgive
me, William?
But God, Margaret?
Ah! Pray for mepray for me. HusbandI am
losing you. I feel you not. This is death!it was for
me,it was all for me! Oh! Beauchampe!
She is gone!cried the husband.
Calvert, who had assisted to support her, now laid the
inanimate form softly upon the couch. He was dumb.
But the cry of Beauchampe had drawn the attention of
the guard.
What is thiswhat's the matter? he demanded.
Ha! ha! we laugh at youwe defy you! was the
exclamation of Beauchampe, holding up the bloody knife
with which he had inflicted upon himself a second wound.
We have slain ourselves.
God forbid! cried the officer, wresting the weapon
from the hands of the criminal.
You are too late, my friend;we shall spoil your
sport. You shall enjoy no agonies of mine to-day.
They brought relief,surgical help,stimulants and
bandages. They succoured the fainting man, cruelly
kind, in order that the stern sentence of the laws might
be carried into effect. The hour of execution, meanwhile,
had arrived. They brought him forth in the sight of the
assembled crowd. The fresh air revived the dying man,
awakening him into full but momentary consciousness.
He looked up, and beheld where the windows of some of
the neighbouring houses were filled with female forms.
He lifted his hands to them with a graceful but last effort,
while he murmured
Daughters of Kentucky, you, at least, will bless the
name of Beauchampe!
This was all. He then sunk back as they strove to
lift him into the cart. Before his feet had pressed the
felon-vehicle his eyes closed. He was unconscious of
the rest. Earth and its little life was nothing more to
him. He had also passed behind the curtain.
THE END.